C H A P T E R E L E V E N
THE SORTING HAT’S NEW SONG

Harry did not want to tell the others that he and Luna were
having the same hallucination, if that was what it was, so he
said nothing about the horses as he sat down inside the carriage and
slammed the door behind him. Nevertheless, he could not help
watching the silhouettes of the horses moving beyond the window.
“Did everyone see that Grubbly-Plank woman?” asked Ginny.
“What’s she doing back here? Hagrid can’t have left, can he?”
“I’ll be quite glad if he has,” said Luna. “He isn’t a very good
teacher, is he?”
“Yes, he is!” said Harry, Ron, and Ginny angrily.
Harry glared at Hermione; she cleared her throat and quickly said,
“Erm . . . yes . . . he’s very good.”
“Well, we think he’s a bit of a joke in Ravenclaw,” said Luna,
unfazed.
“You’ve got a rubbish sense of humor then,” Ron snapped, as the
wheels below them creaked into motion.
Luna did not seem perturbed by Ron’s rudeness; on the contrary,
she simply watched him for a while as though he were a mildly interesting television program.
Rattling and swaying, the carriages moved in convoy up the road.
When they passed between the tall stone pillars topped with winged
boars on either side of the gates to the school grounds, Harry leaned
forward to try and see whether there were any lights on in Hagrid’s
cabin by the Forbidden Forest, but the grounds were in complete
darkness. Hogwarts Castle, however, loomed ever closer: a towering
mass of turrets, jet-black against the dark sky, here and there a window
blazing fiery bright above them.
The carriages jingled to a halt near the stone steps leading up to the
oak front doors and Harry got out of the carriage first. He turned
again to look for lit windows down by the forest, but there was definitely no sign of life within Hagrid’s cabin. Unwillingly, because he
had half hoped they would have vanished, he turned his eyes instead
upon the strange, skeletal creatures standing quietly in the chill night
air, their blank white eyes gleaming.
Harry had once before had the experience of seeing something that
Ron could not, but that had been a reflection in a mirror, something
much more insubstantial than a hundred very solid-looking beasts
strong enough to pull a fleet of carriages. If Luna was to be believed,
the beasts had always been there but invisible; why, then, could Harry
suddenly see them, and why could Ron not?
“Are you coming or what?” said Ron beside him.
“Oh . . . yeah,” said Harry quickly, and they joined the crowd hurrying up the stone steps into the castle.
The entrance hall was ablaze with torches and echoing with footsteps as the students crossed the flagged stone floor for the double
doors to the right, leading to the Great Hall and the start-of-term
feast.
The four long House tables in the Great Hall were filling up under
the starless black ceiling, which was just like the sky they could
glimpse through the high windows. Candles floated in midair all
along the tables, illuminating the silvery ghosts who were dotted
about the Hall and the faces of the students talking eagerly to one another, exchanging summer news, shouting greetings at friends from
other Houses, eyeing one another’s new haircuts and robes. Again
Harry noticed people putting their heads together to whisper as he
passed; he gritted his teeth and tried to act as though he neither noticed nor cared.
Luna drifted away from them at the Ravenclaw table. The moment
they reached Gryffindor’s, Ginny was hailed by some fellow fourth
years and left to sit with them; Harry, Ron, Hermione, and Neville
found seats together about halfway down the table between Nearly
Headless Nick, the Gryffindor House ghost, and Parvati Patil and
Lavender Brown, the last two of whom gave Harry airy, overly
friendly greetings that made him quite sure they had stopped talking
about him a split second before. He had more important things to
worry about, however: He was looking over the students’ heads to the
staff table that ran along the top wall of the Hall.
“He’s not there.”
Ron and Hermione scanned the staff table too, though there was
no real need; Hagrid’s size made him instantly obvious in any lineup.
“He can’t have left,” said Ron, sounding slightly anxious.
“Of course he hasn’t,” said Harry firmly.
“You don’t think he’s . . . hurt, or anything, do you?” said Hermione
uneasily.
“No,” said Harry at once.
“But where is he, then?”
There was a pause, then Harry said very quietly, so that Neville,
Parvati, and Lavender could not hear, “Maybe he’s not back yet. You
know — from his mission — the thing he was doing over the summer for Dumbledore.”
“Yeah . . . yeah, that’ll be it,” said Ron, sounding reassured, but
Hermione bit her lip, looking up and down the staff table as though
hoping for some conclusive explanation of Hagrid’s absence.
“Who’s that?” she said sharply, pointing toward the middle of the
staff table.
Harry’s eyes followed hers. They lit first upon Professor Dumbledore, sitting in his high-backed golden chair at the center of the long
staff table, wearing deep-purple robes scattered with silvery stars and
a matching hat. Dumbledore’s head was inclined toward the woman
sitting next to him, who was talking into his ear. She looked, Harry
thought, like somebody’s maiden aunt: squat, with short, curly,
mouse-brown hair in which she had placed a horrible pink Alice band
that matched the fluffy pink cardigan she wore over her robes. Then
she turned her face slightly to take a sip from her goblet and he saw,
with a shock of recognition, a pallid, toadlike face and a pair of prominent, pouchy eyes.
“It’s that Umbridge woman!”
“Who?” said Hermione.
“She was at my hearing, she works for Fudge!”
“Nice cardigan,” said Ron, smirking.
“She works for Fudge?” Hermione repeated, frowning. “What on
earth’s she doing here, then?”
“Dunno . . .”
Hermione scanned the staff table, her eyes narrowed.
“No,” she muttered, “no, surely not . . .”
Harry did not understand what she was talking about but did not
ask; his attention had just been caught by Professor Grubbly-Plank
who had just appeared behind the staff table; she worked her way
along to the very end and took the seat that ought to have been Hagrid’s. That meant that the first years must have crossed the lake and
reached the castle, and sure enough, a few seconds later, the doors
from the entrance hall opened. A long line of scared-looking first years
entered, led by Professor McGonagall, who was carrying a stool on
which sat an ancient wizard’s hat, heavily patched and darned with a
wide rip near the frayed brim.
The buzz of talk in the Great Hall faded away. The first years lined
up in front of the staff table facing the rest of the students, and Professor McGonagall placed the stool carefully in front of them, then
stood back.
The first years’ faces glowed palely in the candlelight. A small boy
right in the middle of the row looked as though he was trembling.
Harry recalled, fleetingly, how terrified he had felt when he had stood
there, waiting for the unknown test that would determine to which
House he belonged.
The whole school waited with bated breath. Then the rip near the
hat’s brim opened wide like a mouth and the Sorting Hat burst into
song:
In times of old when I was new
And Hogwarts barely started
The founders of our noble school
Thought never to be parted:
United by a common goal,
They had the selfsame yearning,
To make the world’s best magic school
And pass along their learning.
“Together we will build and teach!”
The four good friends decided
And never did they dream that they
Might someday be divided,
For were there such friends anywhere
As Slytherin and Gryffndor?
Unless it was the second pair
Of Huffepuff and Ravenclaw?
So how could it have gone so wrong?
How could such friendships fail?
Why, I was there and so can tell
The whole sad, sorry tale.
Said Slytherin, “We’ll teach just those
Whose ancestry is purest.”
Said Ravenclaw, “We’ll teach those whose
Intelligence is surest.”
Said Gryffindor, “We’ll teach all those
With brave deeds to their name,”
Said Hufflepujf, “I’ll teach the lot,
And treat them just the same.”
These differences caused little strife
When first they came to light,
For each of the four founders had
A House in which they might
Take only those they wanted, so,
For instance, Slytherin
Took only pure-blood wizards
Of great cunning, just like him,
And only those of sharpest mind
Were taught by Ravenclaw
While the bravest and the boldest
Went to daring Gryffindor.
Good Hufflepujf she took the rest,
And taught them all she knew,
Thus the Houses and their founders
Retained friendships firm and true.
So Hogwarts worked in harmony
For several happy years,
But then discord crept among us
Feeding on our faults and fears.
The Houses that, like pillars four,
Had once held up our school,
Now turned upon each other and,
Divided, sought to rule.
And for a while it seemed the school
Must meet an early end,
What with dueling and with fighting
And the clash of friend on friend
And at last there came a morning
When old Slytherin departed
And though the fighting then died out
He left us quite downhearted.
And never since the founders four
Were whittled down to three
Have the Houses been united
As they once were meant to be.
And now the Sorting Hat is here
And you all know the score:
I sort you into Houses
Because that is what I’m for,
But this year I’ll go further,
Listen closely to my song:
Though condemned I am to split you
Still I worry that it’s wrong,
Though I must fulfill my duty
And must quarter every year
Still I wonder whether sorting
May not bring the end I fear.
Oh, know the perils, read the signs,
The warning history shows,
For our Hogwarts is in danger
From external, deadly foes
And we must unite inside her
Or we’ll crumble from within.
I have told you, I have warned you. . . .
Let the Sorting now begin.
The hat became motionless once more; applause broke out, though
it was punctured, for the first time in Harry’s memory, with muttering and whispers. All across the Great Hall students were exchanging
remarks with their neighbors and Harry, clapping along with everyone else, knew exactly what they were talking about.
“Branched out a bit this year, hasn’t it?” said Ron, his eyebrows
raised.
“Too right it has,” said Harry.
The Sorting Hat usually confined itself to describing the different
qualities looked for by each of the four Hogwarts Houses and its own
role in sorting them; Harry could not remember it ever trying to give
the school advice before.
“I wonder if it’s ever given warnings before?” said Hermione,
sounding slightly anxious.
“Yes, indeed,” said Nearly Headless Nick knowledgeably, leaning
across Neville toward her (Neville winced, it was very uncomfortable
to have a ghost lean through you). “The hat feels itself honor-bound
to give the school due warning whenever it feels —”
But Professor McGonagall, who was waiting to read out the list of
first years’ names, was giving the whispering students the sort of look
that scorches. Nearly Headless Nick placed a see-through finger to his
lips and sat primly upright again as the muttering came to an abrupt
end. With a last frowning look that swept the four House tables, Professor McGonagall lowered her eyes to her long piece of parchment
and called out,
“Abercrombie, Euan.”
The terrified-looking boy Harry had noticed earlier stumbled
forward and put the hat on his head; it was only prevented from
falling right down to his shoulders by his very prominent ears. The hat
considered for a moment, then the rip near the brim opened again
and shouted, “GRYFFINDOR!”
Harry clapped loudly with the rest of Gryffindor House as Euan
Abercrombie staggered to their table and sat down, looking as though
he would like very much to sink through the floor and never be
looked at again.
Slowly the long line of first years thinned; in the pauses between
the names and the Sorting Hat’s decisions, Harry could hear Ron’s
stomach rumbling loudly. Finally, “Zeller, Rose” was sorted into Hufflepuff, and Professor McGonagall picked up the hat and stool and
marched them away as Professor Dumbledore rose to his feet.
Harry was somehow soothed to see Dumbledore standing before
them all, whatever his recent bitter feelings toward his headmaster.
Between the absence of Hagrid and the presence of those dragonish
horses, he had felt that his return to Hogwarts, so long anticipated,
was full of unexpected surprises like jarring notes in a familiar song.
But this, at least, was how it was supposed to be: their headmaster rising to greet them all before the start-of-term feast.
“To our newcomers,” said Dumbledore in a ringing voice, his arms
stretched wide and a beaming smile on his lips, “welcome! To our old
hands — welcome back! There is a time for speech making, but this is
not it. Tuck in!”
There was an appreciative laugh and an outbreak of applause as Dumbledore sat down neatly and threw his long beard over his shoulder so as
to keep it out of the way of his plate — for food had appeared out of
nowhere, so that the five long tables were groaning under joints and pies
and dishes of vegetables, bread, sauces, and flagons of pumpkin juice.
“Excellent,” said Ron, with a kind of groan of longing, and he
seized the nearest plate of chops and began piling them onto his plate,
watched wistfully by Nearly Headless Nick.
“What were you saying before the Sorting?” Hermione asked the
ghost. “About the hat giving warnings?”
“Oh yes,” said Nick, who seemed glad of a reason to turn away
from Ron, who was now eating roast potatoes with almost indecent
enthusiasm. “Yes, I have heard the hat give several warnings before,
always at times when it detects periods of great danger for the school.
And always, of course, its advice is the same: Stand together, be strong
from within.”
“Ow kunnit nofe skusin danger ifzat?” said Ron.
His mouth was so full Harry thought it was quite an achievement
for him to make any noise at all.
“I beg your pardon?” said Nearly Headless Nick politely, while
Hermione looked revolted. Ron gave an enormous swallow and said,
“How can it know if the school’s in danger if it’s a hat?”
“I have no idea,” said Nearly Headless Nick. “Of course, it lives in
Dumbledore’s office, so I daresay it picks things up there.”
“And it wants all the Houses to be friends?” said Harry, looking
over at the Slytherin table, where Draco Malfoy was holding court.
“Fat chance.”
“Well, now, you shouldn’t take that attitude,” said Nick reprovingly.
“Peaceful cooperation, that’s the key. We ghosts, though we belong to
separate Houses, maintain links of friendship. In spite of the competitiveness between Gryffindor and Slytherin, I would never dream of
seeking an argument with the Bloody Baron.”
“Only because you’re terrified of him,” said Ron.
Nearly Headless Nick looked highly affronted.
“Terrified? I hope I, Sir Nicholas de Mimsy-Porpington, have never
been guilty of cowardice in my life! The noble blood that runs in my
veins —”
“What blood?” asked Ron. “Surely you haven’t still got — ?”
“It’s a figure of speech!” said Nearly Headless Nick, now so annoyed
his head was trembling ominously on his partially severed neck. “I
assume I am still allowed to enjoy the use of whichever words I like,
even if the pleasures of eating and drinking are denied me! But I am
quite used to students poking fun at my death, I assure you!”
“Nick, he wasn’t really laughing at you!” said Hermione, throwing
a furious look at Ron.
Unfortunately, Ron’s mouth was packed to exploding point again
and all he could manage was “node iddum eentup sechew,” which
Nick did not seem to think constituted an adequate apology. Rising
into the air, he straightened his feathered hat and swept away from
them to the other end of the table, coming to rest between the
Creevey brothers, Colin and Dennis.
“Well done, Ron,” snapped Hermione.
“What?” said Ron indignantly, having managed, finally, to swallow
his food. “I’m not allowed to ask a simple question?”
“Oh forget it,” said Hermione irritably, and the pair of them spent
the rest of the meal in huffy silence.
Harry was too used to their bickering to bother trying to reconcile
them; he felt it was a better use of his time to eat his way steadily
through his steak-and-kidney pie, then a large plateful of his favorite
treacle tart.
When all the students had finished eating and the noise level in the
hall was starting to creep upward again, Dumbledore got to his feet
once more. Talking ceased immediately as all turned to face the headmaster. Harry was feeling pleasantly drowsy now. His four-poster bed
was waiting somewhere above, wonderfully warm and soft. . . .
“Well, now that we are all digesting another magnificent feast, I beg
a few moments of your attention for the usual start-of-term notices,”
said Dumbledore. “First years ought to know that the forest in the
grounds is out of bounds to students — and a few of our older students
ought to know by now too.” (Harry, Ron, and Hermione exchanged
smirks.)
“Mr. Filch, the caretaker, has asked me, for what he tells me is the
four hundred and sixty-second time, to remind you all that magic is
not permitted in corridors between classes, nor are a number of other
things, all of which can be checked on the extensive list now fastened
to Mr. Filch’s office door.
“We have had two changes in staffing this year. We are very pleased
to welcome back Professor Grubbly-Plank, who will be taking Care of
Magical Creatures lessons; we are also delighted to introduce Professor Umbridge, our new Defense Against the Dark Arts teacher.”
There was a round of polite but fairly unenthusiastic applause during which Harry, Ron, and Hermione exchanged slightly panicked
looks; Dumbledore had not said for how long Grubbly-Plank would
be teaching.
Dumbledore continued, “Tryouts for the House Quidditch teams
will take place on the —”
He broke off, looking inquiringly at Professor Umbridge. As she
was not much taller standing than sitting, there was a moment when
nobody understood why Dumbledore had stopped talking, but then
Professor Umbridge said, “Hem, hem,” and it became clear that she
had got to her feet and was intending to make a speech.
Dumbledore only looked taken aback for a moment, then he sat
back down smartly and looked alertly at Professor Umbridge as
though he desired nothing better than to listen to her talk. Other
members of staff were not as adept at hiding their surprise. Professor
Sprout’s eyebrows had disappeared into her flyaway hair, and Professor McGonagall’s mouth was as thin as Harry had ever seen it. No
new teacher had ever interrupted Dumbledore before. Many of the
students were smirking; this woman obviously did not know how
things were done at Hogwarts.
“Thank you, Headmaster,” Professor Umbridge simpered, “for
those kind words of welcome.”
Her voice was high-pitched, breathy, and little-girlish and again,
Harry felt a powerful rush of dislike that he could not explain to himself; all he knew was that he loathed everything about her, from her
stupid voice to her fluffy pink cardigan. She gave another little throatclearing cough (“Hem, hem”) and continued: “Well, it is lovely to be
back at Hogwarts, I must say!” She smiled, revealing very pointed
teeth. “And to see such happy little faces looking back at me!”
Harry glanced around. None of the faces he could see looked
happy; on the contrary, they all looked rather taken aback at being
addressed as though they were five years old.
“I am very much looking forward to getting to know you all, and
I’m sure we’ll be very good friends!”
Students exchanged looks at this; some of them were barely concealing grins.
“I’ll be her friend as long as I don’t have to borrow that cardigan,”
Parvati whispered to Lavender, and both of them lapsed into silent
giggles.
Professor Umbridge cleared her throat again (“Hem, hem”), but
when she continued, some of the breathiness had vanished from her
voice. She sounded much more businesslike and now her words had a
dull learned-by-heart sound to them.
“The Ministry of Magic has always considered the education of
young witches and wizards to be of vital importance. The rare gifts
with which you were born may come to nothing if not nurtured and
honed by careful instruction. The ancient skills unique to the Wizarding community must be passed down through the generations lest
we lose them forever. The treasure trove of magical knowledge
amassed by our ancestors must be guarded, replenished, and polished
by those who have been called to the noble profession of teaching.”
Professor Umbridge paused here and made a little bow to her
fellow staff members, none of whom bowed back. Professor McGonagall’s dark eyebrows had contracted so that she looked positively
hawklike, and Harry distinctly saw her exchange a significant glance
with Professor Sprout as Umbridge gave another little “Hem, hem” and
went on with her speech.
“Every headmaster and headmistress of Hogwarts has brought
something new to the weighty task of governing this historic school,
and that is as it should be, for without progress there will be stagnation
and decay. There again, progress for progress’s sake must be discouraged, for our tried and tested traditions often require no tinkering. A
balance, then, between old and new, between permanence and change,
between tradition and innovation . . .”
Harry found his attentiveness ebbing, as though his brain was slipping in and out of tune. The quiet that always filled the Hall when
Dumbledore was speaking was breaking up as students put their heads
together, whispering and giggling. Over at the Ravenclaw table, Cho
Chang was chatting animatedly with her friends. A few seats along
from Cho, Luna Lovegood had got out The Quibbler again. Meanwhile at the Hufflepuff table, Ernie Macmillan was one of the few still
staring at Professor Umbridge, but he was glassy-eyed and Harry was
sure he was only pretending to listen in an attempt to live up to the
new prefect’s badge gleaming on his chest.
Professor Umbridge did not seem to notice the restlessness of her
audience. Harry had the impression that a full-scale riot could have
broken out under her nose and she would have plowed on with her
speech. The teachers, however, were still listening very attentively, and
Hermione seemed to be drinking in every word Umbridge spoke,
though judging by her expression, they were not at all to her taste.
“. . . because some changes will be for the better, while others will
come, in the fullness of time, to be recognized as errors of judgment.
Meanwhile, some old habits will be retained, and rightly so, whereas
others, outmoded and outworn, must be abandoned. Let us move
forward, then, into a new era of openness, effectiveness, and accountability, intent on preserving what ought to be preserved, perfecting
what needs to be perfected, and pruning wherever we find practices
that ought to be prohibited.”
She sat down. Dumbledore clapped. The staff followed his lead,
though Harry noticed that several of them brought their hands together only once or twice before stopping. A few students joined in,
but most had been taken unawares by the end of the speech, not having listened to more than a few words of it, and before they could start
applauding properly, Dumbledore had stood up again.
“Thank you very much, Professor Umbridge, that was most illuminating,” he said, bowing to her. “Now — as I was saying, Quidditch
tryouts will be held . . .”
“Yes, it certainly was illuminating,” said Hermione in a low voice.
“You’re not telling me you enjoyed it?” Ron said quietly, turning a
glazed face upon Hermione. “That was about the dullest speech I’ve
ever heard, and I grew up with Percy.”
“I said illuminating, not enjoyable,” said Hermione. “It explained
a lot.”
“Did it?” said Harry in surprise. “Sounded like a load of waffle to me.”
“There was some important stuff hidden in the waffle,” said Hermione grimly.
“Was there?” said Ron blankly.
“How about ‘progress for progress’s sake must be discouraged’? How
about ‘pruning wherever we find practices that ought to be prohibited’?”
“Well, what does that mean?” said Ron impatiently.
“I’ll tell you what it means,” said Hermione ominously. “It means
the Ministry’s interfering at Hogwarts.”
There was a great clattering and banging all around them; Dumbledore had obviously just dismissed the school, because everyone was
standing up ready to leave the Hall. Hermione jumped up, looking
flustered.
“Ron, we’re supposed to show the first years where to go!”
“Oh yeah,” said Ron, who had obviously forgotten. “Hey — hey
you lot! Midgets!”
“Ron!”
“Well, they are, they’re titchy. . . .”
“I know, but you can’t call them midgets. . . . First years!” Hermione
called commandingly along the table. “This way, please!”
A group of new students walked shyly up the gap between the
Gryffindor and Hufflepuff tables, all of them trying hard not to lead
the group. They did indeed seem very small; Harry was sure he had
not appeared that young when he had arrived here. He grinned at
them. A blond boy next to Euan Abercrombie looked petrified,
nudged Euan, and whispered something in his ear. Euan Abercrombie
looked equally frightened and stole a horrified look at Harry, who felt
the grin slide off his face like Stinksap.
“See you later,” he said to Ron and Hermione and he made his way
out of the Great Hall alone, doing everything he could to ignore more
whispering, staring, and pointing as he passed. He kept his eyes fixed
ahead as he wove his way through the crowd in the entrance hall, then
he hurried up the marble staircase, took a couple of concealed shortcuts, and had soon left most of the crowds behind.
He had been stupid not to expect this, he thought angrily, as he
walked through much emptier upstairs corridors. Of course everyone
was staring at him: He had emerged from the Triwizard maze two
months ago clutching the dead body of a fellow student and claiming
to have seen Lord Voldemort return to power. There had not been
time last term to explain himself before everyone went home, even if
he had felt up to giving the whole school a detailed account of the terrible events in that graveyard.
He had reached the end of the corridor to the Gryffindor common
room and had come to a halt in front of the portrait of the Fat Lady
before he realized that he did not know the new password.
“Er . . .” he said glumly, staring up at the Fat Lady, who smoothed
the folds of her pink satin dress and looked sternly back at him.
“No password, no entrance,” she said loftily.
“Harry, I know it!” someone panted from behind him, and he
turned to see Neville jogging toward him. “Guess what it is? I’m actually going to be able to remember it for once —” He waved the
stunted little cactus he had shown them on the train. “Mimbulus
mimbletonia!”
“Correct,” said the Fat Lady, and her portrait swung open toward
them like a door, revealing a circular hole in the wall behind, through
which Harry and Neville now climbed.
The Gryffindor common room looked as welcoming as ever, a cozy
circular tower room full of dilapidated squashy armchairs and rickety
old tables. A fire was crackling merrily in the grate and a few people
were warming their hands before going up to their dormitories; on the
other side of the room Fred and George Weasley were pinning something up on the notice board. Harry waved good night to them and
headed straight for the door to the boys’ dormitories; he was not in
much of a mood for talking at the moment. Neville followed him.
Dean Thomas and Seamus Finnigan had reached the dormitory
first and were in the process of covering the walls beside their beds
with posters and photographs. They had been talking as Harry
pushed open the door but stopped abruptly the moment they saw
him. Harry wondered whether they had been talking about him, then
whether he was being paranoid.
“Hi,” he said, moving across to his own trunk and opening it.
“Hey, Harry,” said Dean, who was putting on a pair of pajamas in
the West Ham colors. “Good holiday?”
“Not bad,” muttered Harry, as a true account of his holiday would
have taken most of the night to relate and he could not face it. “You?”
“Yeah, it was okay,” chuckled Dean. “Better than Seamus’s anyway,
he was just telling me.”
“Why, what happened, Seamus?” Neville asked as he placed his
Mimbulus mimbletonia tenderly on his bedside cabinet.
Seamus did not answer immediately; he was making rather a meal
of ensuring that his poster of the Kenmare Kestrels Quidditch team
was quite straight. Then he said, with his back still turned to Harry,
“Me mam didn’t want me to come back.”
“What?” said Harry, pausing in the act of pulling off his robes.
“She didn’t want me to come back to Hogwarts.”
Seamus turned away from his poster and pulled his own pajamas
out of his trunk, still not looking at Harry.
“But — why?” said Harry, astonished. He knew that Seamus’s
mother was a witch and could not understand, therefore, why she
should have come over so Dursley-ish.
Seamus did not answer until he had finished buttoning his pajamas.
“Well,” he said in a measured voice, “I suppose . . . because of you.”
“What d’you mean?” said Harry quickly. His heart was beating
rather fast. He felt vaguely as though something was closing in on him.
“Well,” said Seamus again, still avoiding Harry’s eyes, “she . . . er
. . . well, it’s not just you, it’s Dumbledore too . . .”
“She believes the Daily Prophet?” said Harry. “She thinks I’m a liar
and Dumbledore’s an old fool?”
Seamus looked up at him. “Yeah, something like that.”
Harry said nothing. He threw his wand down onto his bedside
table, pulled off his robes, stuffed them angrily into his trunk, and
pulled on his pajamas. He was sick of it; sick of being the person who
was stared at and talked about all the time. If any of them knew, if any
of them had the faintest idea what it felt like to be the one all these
things had happened to . . . Mrs. Finnigan had no idea, the stupid
woman, he thought savagely.
He got into bed and made to pull the hangings closed around him,
but before he could do so, Seamus said, “Look . . . what did happen
that night when . . . you know, when . . . with Cedric Diggory and all?”
Seamus sounded nervous and eager at the same time. Dean, who
had been bending over his trunk, trying to retrieve a slipper, went
oddly still and Harry knew he was listening hard.
“What are you asking me for?” Harry retorted. “Just read the Daily
Prophet like your mother, why don’t you? That’ll tell you all you need
to know.”
“Don’t you have a go at my mother,” snapped Seamus.
“I’ll have a go at anyone who calls me a liar,” said Harry.
“Don’t talk to me like that!”
“I’ll talk to you how I want,” said Harry, his temper rising so fast he
snatched his wand back from his bedside table. “If you’ve got a problem sharing a dormitory with me, go and ask McGonagall if you can
be moved, stop your mummy worrying —”
“Leave my mother out of this, Potter!”
“What’s going on?”
Ron had appeared in the doorway. His wide eyes traveled from
Harry, who was kneeling on his bed with his wand pointing at Seamus, to Seamus, who was standing there with his fists raised.
“He’s having a go at my mother!” Seamus yelled.
“What?” said Ron. “Harry wouldn’t do that — we met your mother,
we liked her. . . .”
“That’s before she started believing every word the stinking Daily
Prophet writes about me!” said Harry at the top of his voice.
“Oh,” said Ron, comprehension dawning across his freckled face.
“Oh . . . right.”
“You know what?” said Seamus heatedly, casting Harry a venomous
look. “He’s right, I don’t want to share a dormitory with him anymore, he’s a madman.”
“That’s out of order, Seamus,” said Ron, whose ears were starting to
glow red, always a danger sign.
“Out of order, am I?” shouted Seamus, who in contrast with Ron
was turning paler. “You believe all the rubbish he’s come out with
about You-Know-Who, do you, you reckon he’s telling the truth?”
“Yeah, I do!” said Ron angrily.
“Then you’re mad too,” said Seamus in disgust.
“Yeah? Well unfortunately for you, pal, I’m also a prefect!” said
Ron, jabbing himself in the chest with a finger. “So unless you want
detention, watch your mouth!”
Seamus looked for a few seconds as though detention would be a
reasonable price to pay to say what was going through his mind; but
with a noise of contempt he turned on his heel, vaulted into bed, and
pulled the hangings shut with such violence that they were ripped
from the bed and fell in a dusty pile to the floor. Ron glared at Seamus, then looked at Dean and Neville.
“Anyone else’s parents got a problem with Harry?” he said
aggressively.
“My parents are Muggles, mate,” said Dean, shrugging. “They
don’t know nothing about no deaths at Hogwarts, because I’m not
stupid enough to tell them.”
“You don’t know my mother, she’ll weasel anything out of anyone!”
Seamus snapped at him. “Anyway, your parents don’t get the Daily
Prophet, they don’t know our headmaster’s been sacked from the Wizengamot and the International Confederation of Wizards because he’s
losing his marbles —”
“My gran says that’s rubbish,” piped up Neville. “She says it’s the
Daily Prophet that’s going downhill, not Dumbledore. She’s canceled
our subscription. We believe Harry,” he said simply. He climbed into
bed and pulled the covers up to his chin, looking owlishly over them
at Seamus. “My gran’s always said You-Know-Who would come back
one day. She says if Dumbledore says he’s back, he’s back.”
Harry felt a rush of gratitude toward Neville. Nobody else said
anything. Seamus got out his wand, repaired the bed hangings, and
vanished behind them. Dean got into bed, rolled over, and fell silent.
Neville, who appeared to have nothing more to say either, was gazing
fondly at his moonlit cactus.
Harry lay back on his pillows while Ron bustled around the next
bed, putting his things away. He felt shaken by the argument with
Seamus, whom he had always liked very much. How many more people were going to suggest that he was lying or unhinged?
Had Dumbledore suffered like this all summer, as first the Wizengamot, then the International Confederation of Wizards had thrown
him from their ranks? Was it anger at Harry, perhaps, that had
stopped Dumbledore getting in touch with him for months? The two
of them were in this together, after all; Dumbledore had believed
Harry, announced his version of events to the whole school and then
to the wider Wizarding community. Anyone who thought Harry was
a liar had to think that Dumbledore was too or else that Dumbledore
had been hoodwinked. . . .
They’ll know we’re right in the end, thought Harry miserably, as Ron
got into bed and extinguished the last candle in the dormitory. But he
wondered how many attacks like Seamus’s he would have to endure
before that time came.

C H A P T E R T W E L V E
PROFESSOR UMBRIDGE

Seamus dressed at top speed next morning and left the dormitory
before Harry had even put on his socks.
“Does he think he’ll turn into a nutter if he stays in a room with me
too long?” asked Harry loudly, as the hem of Seamus’s robes whipped
out of sight.
“Don’t worry about it, Harry,” Dean muttered, hoisting his schoolbag onto his shoulder. “He’s just . . .” But apparently he was unable to
say exactly what Seamus was, and after a slightly awkward pause followed him out of the room.
Neville and Ron both gave Harry it’s-his-problem-not-yours looks,
but Harry was not much consoled. How much more of this was he
going to have to take?
“What’s the matter?” asked Hermione five minutes later, catching
up with Harry and Ron halfway across the common room as they all
headed toward breakfast. “You look absolutely — oh for heaven’s
sake.”
She was staring at the common room notice board, where a large
new sign had been put up.
GALLONS OF GALLEONS!
Pocket money failing to keep pace with your outgoings?
Like to earn a little extra gold?
Contact Fred and George Weasley,
Gryffindor common room,
for simple, part-time, virtually painless jobs
(WE REGRET THAT ALL WORK IS UNDERTAKEN AT APPLICANT’S OWN RISK)
 “They are the limit,” said Hermione grimly, taking down the sign,
which Fred and George had pinned up over a poster giving the date of
the first Hogsmeade weekend in October. “We’ll have to talk to them,
Ron.”
Ron looked positively alarmed.
“Why?”
“Because we’re prefects!” said Hermione, as they climbed out
through the portrait hole. “It’s up to us to stop this kind of thing!”
Ron said nothing; Harry could tell from his glum expression that
the prospect of stopping Fred and George doing exactly what they
liked was not one that he found inviting.
“Anyway, what’s up, Harry?” Hermione continued, as they walked
down a flight of stairs lined with portraits of old witches and wizards,
all of whom ignored them, being engrossed in their own conversation.
“You look really angry about something.”
“Seamus reckons Harry’s lying about You-Know-Who,” said Ron
succinctly, when Harry did not respond.
Hermione, whom Harry had expected to react angrily on his behalf,
sighed.
“Yes, Lavender thinks so too,” she said gloomily.
“Been having a nice little chat with her about whether or not I’m a
lying, attention-seeking prat, have you?” Harry said loudly.
“No,” said Hermione calmly, “I told her to keep her big fat mouth
shut about you, actually. And it would be quite nice if you stopped
jumping down Ron’s and my throats, Harry, because if you haven’t
noticed, we’re on your side.”
There was a short pause.
“Sorry,” said Harry in a low voice.
“That’s quite all right,” said Hermione with dignity. Then she
shook her head. “Don’t you remember what Dumbledore said at the
end-of-term feast last year?”
Harry and Ron both looked at her blankly, and Hermione sighed
again.
“About You-Know-Who. He said, ‘His gift for spreading discord and
enmity is very great. We can fight it only by showing an equally strong
bond of friendship and trust —’ ”
“How do you remember stuff like that?” asked Ron, looking at her
in admiration.
“I listen, Ron,” said Hermione with a touch of asperity.
“So do I, but I still couldn’t tell you exactly what —”
“The point,” Hermione pressed on loudly, “is that this sort of thing
is exactly what Dumbledore was talking about. You-Know-Who’s
only been back two months, and we’ve started fighting among ourselves. And the Sorting Hat’s warning was the same — stand together,
be united —”
“And Harry said it last night,” retorted Ron, “if that means we’re
supposed to get matey with the Slytherins, fat chance.”
“Well, I think it’s a pity we’re not trying for a bit of inter-House
unity,” said Hermione crossly.
They had reached the foot of the marble staircase. A line of fourthyear Ravenclaws was crossing the entrance hall; they caught sight of
Harry and hurried to form a tighter group, as though frightened he
might attack stragglers.
“Yeah, we really ought to be trying to make friends with people like
that,” said Harry sarcastically.
They followed the Ravenclaws into the Great Hall, looking instinctively at the staff table as they entered. Professor Grubbly-Plank
was chatting to Professor Sinistra, the Astronomy teacher, and Hagrid
was once again conspicuous only by his absence. The enchanted ceiling above them echoed Harry’s mood; it was a miserable rain-cloud
gray.
“Dumbledore didn’t even mention how long that Grubbly-Plank
woman’s staying,” he said, as they made their way across to the
Gryffindor table.
“Maybe . . .” said Hermione thoughtfully.
“What?” said both Harry and Ron together.
“Well . . . maybe he didn’t want to draw attention to Hagrid not
being here.”
“What d’you mean, draw attention to it?” said Ron, half laughing.
“How could we not notice?”
Before Hermione could answer, a tall black girl with long, braided
hair had marched up to Harry.
“Hi, Angelina.”
“Hi,” she said briskly, “good summer?” And without waiting for an
answer, “Listen, I’ve been made Gryffindor Quidditch Captain.”
“Nice one,” said Harry, grinning at her; he suspected Angelina’s
pep talks might not be as long-winded as Oliver Wood’s had been,
which could only be an improvement.
“Yeah, well, we need a new Keeper now Oliver’s left. Tryouts are on
Friday at five o’clock and I want the whole team there, all right? Then
we can see how the new person’ll fit in.”
“Okay,” said Harry, and she smiled at him and departed.
“I’d forgotten Wood had left,” said Hermione vaguely, sitting down
beside Ron and pulling a plate of toast toward her. “I suppose that will
make quite a difference to the team?”
“I s’pose,” said Harry, taking the bench opposite. “He was a good
Keeper. . . .”
“Still, it won’t hurt to have some new blood, will it?” said Ron.
With a whoosh and a clatter, hundreds of owls came soaring in
through the upper windows. They descended all over the Hall, bringing letters and packages to their owners and showering the breakfasters
with droplets of water; it was clearly raining hard outside. Hedwig was
nowhere to be seen, but Harry was hardly surprised; his only correspondent was Sirius, and he doubted Sirius would have anything new
to tell him after only twenty-four hours apart. Hermione, however,
had to move her orange juice aside quickly to make way for a large
damp barn owl bearing a sodden Daily Prophet in its beak.
“What are you still getting that for?” said Harry irritably, thinking
of Seamus, as Hermione placed a Knut in the leather pouch on the
owl’s leg and it took off again. “I’m not bothering . . . load of
rubbish.”
“It’s best to know what the enemy are saying,” said Hermione
darkly, and she unfurled the newspaper and disappeared behind it,
not emerging until Harry and Ron had finished eating.
“Nothing,” she said simply, rolling up the newspaper and laying it
down by her plate. “Nothing about you or Dumbledore or anything.”
Professor McGonagall was now moving along the table handing
out schedules.
“Look at today!” groaned Ron. “History of Magic, double Potions,
Divination, and double Defense Against the Dark Arts . . . Binns,
Snape, Trelawney, and that Umbridge woman all in one day! I wish Fred
and George’d hurry up and get those Skiving Snackboxes sorted. . . .”
“Do mine ears deceive me?” said Fred, arriving with George and
squeezing onto the bench beside Harry. “Hogwarts prefects surely
don’t wish to skive off lessons?”
“Look what we’ve got today,” said Ron grumpily, shoving his
schedule under Fred’s nose. “That’s the worst Monday I’ve ever seen.”
“Fair point, little bro,” said Fred, scanning the column. “You can
have a bit of Nosebleed Nougat cheap if you like.”
“Why’s it cheap?” said Ron suspiciously.
“Because you’ll keep bleeding till you shrivel up, we haven’t got an
antidote yet,” said George, helping himself to a kipper.
“Cheers,” said Ron moodily, pocketing his schedule, “but I think
I’ll take the lessons.”
“And speaking of your Skiving Snackboxes,” said Hermione, eyeing
Fred and George beadily, “you can’t advertise for testers on the
Gryffindor notice board.”
“Says who?” said George, looking astonished.
“Says me,” said Hermione. “And Ron.”
“Leave me out of it,” said Ron hastily.
Hermione glared at him. Fred and George sniggered.
“You’ll be singing a different tune soon enough, Hermione,” said
Fred, thickly buttering a crumpet. “You’re starting your fifth year,
you’ll be begging us for a Snackbox before long.”
“And why would starting fifth year mean I want a Skiving Snackbox?” asked Hermione.
“Fifth year’s O.W.L. year,” said George.
“So?”
“So you’ve got your exams coming up, haven’t you? They’ll be keeping your noses so hard to that grindstone they’ll be rubbed raw,” said
Fred with satisfaction.
“Half our year had minor breakdowns coming up to O.W.L.s,” said
George happily. “Tears and tantrums . . . Patricia Stimpson kept coming over faint. . . .”
“Kenneth Towler came out in boils, d’you remember?” said Fred
reminiscently.
“That’s ’cause you put Bulbadox Powder in his pajamas,” said
George.
“Oh yeah,” said Fred, grinning. “I’d forgotten. . . . Hard to keep
track sometimes, isn’t it?”
“Anyway, it’s a nightmare of a year, the fifth,” said George. “If you
care about exam results anyway. Fred and I managed to keep our spirits up somehow.”
“Yeah . . . you got, what was it, three O.W.L.s each?” said Ron.
“Yep,” said Fred unconcernedly. “But we feel our futures lie outside
the world of academic achievement.”
“We seriously debated whether we were going to bother coming
back for our seventh year,” said George brightly, “now that we’ve
got —”
He broke off at a warning look from Harry, who knew George had
been about to mention the Triwizard winnings he had given them.
“— now that we’ve got our O.W.L.s,” George said hastily. “I mean,
do we really need N.E.W.T.s? But we didn’t think Mum could take us
leaving school early, not on top of Percy turning out to be the world’s
biggest prat.”
“We’re not going to waste our last year here, though,” said Fred,
looking affectionately around at the Great Hall. “We’re going to use it
to do a bit of market research, find out exactly what the average Hogwarts student requires from his joke shop, carefully evaluate the results
of our research, and then produce the products to fit the demand.”
“But where are you going to get the gold to start a joke shop?”
asked Hermione skeptically. “You’re going to need all the ingredients
and materials — and premises too, I suppose. . . .”
Harry did not look at the twins. His face felt hot; he deliberately
dropped his fork and dived down to retrieve it. He heard Fred say
overhead, “Ask us no questions and we’ll tell you no lies, Hermione.
C’mon, George, if we get there early we might be able to sell a few Extendable Ears before Herbology.”
Harry emerged from under the table to see Fred and George walking away, each carrying a stack of toast.
“What did that mean?” said Hermione, looking from Harry to
Ron. “ ‘Ask us no questions . . .’ Does that mean they’ve already got
some gold to start a joke shop?”
“You know, I’ve been wondering about that,” said Ron, his brow
furrowed. “They bought me a new set of dress robes this summer, and
I couldn’t understand where they got the Galleons. . . .”
Harry decided it was time to steer the conversation out of these
dangerous waters.
“D’you reckon it’s true this year’s going to be really tough? Because
of the exams?”
“Oh yeah,” said Ron. “Bound to be, isn’t it? O.W.L.s are really
important, affect the jobs you can apply for and everything. We get
career advice too, later this year, Bill told me. So you can choose what
N.E.W.T.s you want to do next year.”
“D’you know what you want to do after Hogwarts?” Harry asked
the other two, as they left the Great Hall shortly afterward and set off
toward their History of Magic classroom.
“Not really,” said Ron slowly. “Except . . . well . . .”
He looked slightly sheepish.
“What?” Harry urged him.
“Well, it’d be cool to be an Auror,” said Ron in an offhand voice.
“Yeah, it would,” said Harry fervently.
“But they’re, like, the elite,” said Ron. “You’ve got to be really good.
What about you, Hermione?”
“I don’t know,” said Hermione. “I think I’d really like to do something worthwhile.”
“An Auror’s worthwhile!” said Harry.
“Yes, it is, but it’s not the only worthwhile thing,” said Hermione
thoughtfully. “I mean, if I could take S.P.E.W. further . . .”
Harry and Ron carefully avoided looking at each other.
History of Magic was by common consent the most boring subject
ever devised by Wizard-kind. Professor Binns, their ghost teacher, had
a wheezy, droning voice that was almost guaranteed to cause severe
drowsiness within ten minutes, five in warm weather. He never varied
the form of their lessons, but lectured them without pausing while
they took notes, or rather, gazed sleepily into space. Harry and Ron
had so far managed to scrape passes in this subject only by copying
Hermione’s notes before exams; she alone seemed able to resist the soporific power of Binns’s voice.
Today they suffered through three quarters of an hour’s droning on
the subject of giant wars. Harry heard just enough within the first ten
minutes to appreciate dimly that in another teacher’s hands this
subject might have been mildly interesting, but then his brain
disengaged, and he spent the remaining thirty-five minutes playing
hangman on a corner of his parchment with Ron, while Hermione
shot them filthy looks out of the corner of her eye.
“How would it be,” she asked them coldly as they left the classroom
for break (Binns drifting away through the blackboard), “if I refused
to lend you my notes this year?”
“We’d fail our O.W.L.s,” said Ron. “If you want that on your conscience, Hermione . . .”
“Well, you’d deserve it,” she snapped. “You don’t even try to listen
to him, do you?”
“We do try,” said Ron. “We just haven’t got your brains or your
memory or your concentration — you’re just cleverer than we are —
is it nice to rub it in?”
“Oh, don’t give me that rubbish,” said Hermione, but she looked
slightly mollified as she led the way out into the damp courtyard.
A fine misty drizzle was falling, so that the people standing in huddles around the yard looked blurred at the edges. Harry, Ron, and
Hermione chose a secluded corner under a heavily dripping balcony,
turning up the collars of their robes against the chilly September air
and talking about what Snape was likely to set them in the first lesson
of the year. They had got as far as agreeing that it was likely to be
something extremely difficult, just to catch them off guard after a
two-month holiday, when someone walked around the corner toward
them.
“Hello, Harry!”
It was Cho Chang and what was more, she was on her own again.
This was most unusual: Cho was almost always surrounded by a gang
of giggling girls; Harry remembered the agony of trying to get her by
herself to ask her to the Yule Ball.
“Hi,” said Harry, feeling his face grow hot. At least you’re not covered
in Stinksap this time, he told himself. Cho seemed to be thinking along
the same lines.
“You got that stuff off, then?”
“Yeah,” said Harry, trying to grin as though the memory of their
last meeting was funny as opposed to mortifying. “So did you . . . er
. . . have a good summer?”
The moment he had said this he wished he hadn’t: Cedric had been
Cho’s boyfriend and the memory of his death must have affected her
holiday almost as badly as it had affected Harry’s. . . . Something
seemed to tauten in her face, but she said, “Oh, it was all right, you
know. . . .”
“Is that a Tornados badge?” Ron demanded suddenly, pointing at
the front of Cho’s robes, to which a sky-blue badge emblazoned with
a double gold T was pinned. “You don’t support them, do you?”
“Yeah, I do,” said Cho.
“Have you always supported them, or just since they started winning the league?” said Ron, in what Harry considered an unnecessarily
accusatory tone of voice.
“I’ve supported them since I was six,” said Cho coolly. “Anyway . . .
see you, Harry.”
She walked away. Hermione waited until Cho was halfway across
the courtyard before rounding on Ron.
“You are so tactless!”
“What? I only asked her if —”
“Couldn’t you tell she wanted to talk to Harry on her own?”
“So? She could’ve done, I wasn’t stopping —”
“What on earth were you attacking her about her Quidditch team
for?”
“Attacking? I wasn’t attacking her, I was only —”
“Who cares if she supports the Tornados?”
“Oh, come on, half the people you see wearing those badges only
bought them last season —”
“But what does it matter?”
“It means they’re not real fans, they’re just jumping on the
bandwagon —”
“That’s the bell,” said Harry listlessly, because Ron and Hermione
were bickering too loudly to hear it. They did not stop arguing all the
way down to Snape’s dungeon, which gave Harry plenty of time to reflect that between Neville and Ron he would be lucky ever to have two
minutes’ conversation with Cho that he could look back on without
wanting to leave the country.
And yet, he thought, as they joined the queue lining up outside
Snape’s classroom door, she had chosen to come and talk to him, hadn’t
she? She had been Cedric’s girlfriend; she could easily have hated Harry
for coming out of the Triwizard maze alive when Cedric had died, yet
she was talking to him in a perfectly friendly way, not as though she
thought him mad, or a liar, or in some horrible way responsible for
Cedric’s death. . . . Yes, she had definitely chosen to come and talk to
him, and that made the second time in two days . . . and at this
thought, Harry’s spirits rose. Even the ominous sound of Snape’s dungeon door creaking open did not puncture the small, hopeful bubble
that seemed to have swelled in his chest. He filed into the classroom behind Ron and Hermione and followed them to their usual table at the
back, ignoring the huffy, irritable noises now issuing from both of them.
“Settle down,” said Snape coldly, shutting the door behind him.
There was no real need for the call to order; the moment the class
had heard the door close, quiet had fallen and all fidgeting stopped.
Snape’s mere presence was usually enough to ensure a class’s silence.
“Before we begin today’s lesson,” said Snape, sweeping over to his
desk and staring around at them all, “I think it appropriate to remind
you that next June you will be sitting an important examination, during which you will prove how much you have learned about the
composition and use of magical potions. Moronic though some of
this class undoubtedly are, I expect you to scrape an ‘Acceptable’ in
your O.W.L., or suffer my . . . displeasure.”
His gaze lingered this time upon Neville, who gulped.
“After this year, of course, many of you will cease studying with
me,” Snape went on. “I take only the very best into my N.E.W.T.
Potions class, which means that some of us will certainly be saying
good-bye.”
His eyes rested on Harry and his lip curled. Harry glared back, feeling a grim pleasure at the idea that he would be able to give up Potions
after fifth year.
“But we have another year to go before that happy moment of
farewell,” said Snape softly, “so whether you are intending to attempt
N.E.W.T. or not, I advise all of you to concentrate your efforts upon
maintaining the high-pass level I have come to expect from my
O.W.L. students.
“Today we will be mixing a potion that often comes up at Ordinary
Wizarding Level: the Draught of Peace, a potion to calm anxiety and
soothe agitation. Be warned: If you are too heavy-handed with the
ingredients you will put the drinker into a heavy and sometimes irreversible sleep, so you will need to pay close attention to what you are
doing.” On Harry’s left, Hermione sat up a little straighter, her expression one of the utmost attentiveness. “The ingredients and method”
— Snape flicked his wand — “are on the blackboard” — (they appeared there) — “you will find everything you need” — he flicked his
wand again — “in the store cupboard” — (the door of the said cupboard sprang open) — “you have an hour and a half. . . . Start.”
Just as Harry, Ron, and Hermione had predicted, Snape could
hardly have set them a more difficult, fiddly potion. The ingredients
had to be added to the cauldron in precisely the right order and quantities; the mixture had to be stirred exactly the right number of times,
firstly in clockwise, then in counterclockwise directions; the heat of
the flames on which it was simmering had to be lowered to exactly the
right level for a specific number of minutes before the final ingredient
was added.
“A light silver vapor should now be rising from your potion,” called
Snape, with ten minutes left to go.
Harry, who was sweating profusely, looked desperately around the
dungeon. His own cauldron was issuing copious amounts of dark gray
steam; Ron’s was spitting green sparks. Seamus was feverishly prodding the flames at the base of his cauldron with the tip of his wand, as
they had gone out. The surface of Hermione’s potion, however, was a
shimmering mist of silver vapor, and as Snape swept by he looked
down his hooked nose at it without comment, which meant that he
could find nothing to criticize. At Harry’s cauldron, however, Snape
stopped, looking down at Harry with a horrible smirk on his face.
“Potter, what is this supposed to be?”
The Slytherins at the front of the class all looked up eagerly; they
loved hearing Snape taunt Harry.
“The Draught of Peace,” said Harry tensely.
“Tell me, Potter,” said Snape softly, “can you read?”
Draco Malfoy laughed.
“Yes, I can,” said Harry, his fingers clenched tightly around his
wand.
“Read the third line of the instructions for me, Potter.”
Harry squinted at the blackboard; it was not easy to make out the
instructions through the haze of multicolored steam now filling the
dungeon.
“ ‘Add powdered moonstone, stir three times counterclockwise, allow to simmer for seven minutes, then add two drops of syrup of
hellebore.’ ”
His heart sank. He had not added syrup of hellebore, but had proceeded straight to the fourth line of the instructions after allowing his
potion to simmer for seven minutes.
“Did you do everything on the third line, Potter?”
“No,” said Harry very quietly.
“I beg your pardon?”
“No,” said Harry, more loudly. “I forgot the hellebore. . . .”
“I know you did, Potter, which means that this mess is utterly
worthless. Evanesco.”
The contents of Harry’s potion vanished; he was left standing foolishly beside an empty cauldron.
“Those of you who have managed to read the instructions, fill one
flagon with a sample of your potion, label it clearly with your name,
and bring it up to my desk for testing,” said Snape. “Homework:
twelve inches of parchment on the properties of moonstone and its
uses in potion-making, to be handed in on Thursday.”
While everyone around him filled their flagons, Harry cleared away
his things, seething. His potion had been no worse than Ron’s, which
was now giving off a foul odor of bad eggs, or Neville’s, which had
achieved the consistency of just-mixed cement and which Neville was
now having to gouge out of his cauldron, yet it was he, Harry, who
would be receiving zero marks for the day’s work. He stuffed his wand
back into his bag and slumped down onto his seat, watching everyone
else march up to Snape’s desk with filled and corked flagons. When at
long last the bell rang, Harry was first out of the dungeon and had already started his lunch by the time Ron and Hermione joined him in
the Great Hall. The ceiling had turned an even murkier gray during
the morning. Rain was lashing the high windows.
“That was really unfair,” said Hermione consolingly, sitting down
next to Harry and helping herself to shepherd’s pie. “Your potion
wasn’t nearly as bad as Goyle’s, when he put it in his flagon the whole
thing shattered and set his robes on fire.”
“Yeah, well,” said Harry, glowering at his plate, “since when has
Snape ever been fair to me?”
Neither of the others answered; all three of them knew that Snape
and Harry’s mutual enmity had been absolute from the moment
Harry had set foot in Hogwarts.
“I did think he might be a bit better this year,” said Hermione in a
disappointed voice. “I mean . . . you know . . .” She looked carefully
around; there were half a dozen empty seats on either side of them and
nobody was passing the table. “. . . Now he’s in the Order and
everything.”
“Poisonous toadstools don’t change their spots,” said Ron sagely.
“Anyway, I’ve always thought Dumbledore was cracked trusting
Snape, where’s the evidence he ever really stopped working for YouKnow-Who?”
“I think Dumbledore’s probably got plenty of evidence, even if he
doesn’t share it with you, Ron,” snapped Hermione.
“Oh, shut up, the pair of you,” said Harry heavily, as Ron opened
his mouth to argue back. Hermione and Ron both froze, looking angry and offended. “Can’t you give it a rest?” he said. “You’re always
having a go at each other, it’s driving me mad.” And abandoning his
shepherd’s pie, he swung his schoolbag back over his shoulder and left
them sitting there.
He walked up the marble staircase two steps at a time, past the
many students hurrying toward lunch. The anger that had just flared
so unexpectedly still blazed inside him, and the vision of Ron and
Hermione’s shocked faces afforded him a sense of deep satisfaction.
Serve them right, he thought. Why can’t they give it a rest? . . . Bickering
all the time . . . It’s enough to drive anyone up the wall. . . .
He passed the large picture of Sir Cadogan the knight on a landing;
Sir Cadogan drew his sword and brandished it fiercely at Harry, who
ignored him.
“Come back, you scurvy dog, stand fast and fight!” yelled Sir Cadogan in a muffled voice from behind his visor, but Harry merely walked
on, and when Sir Cadogan attempted to follow him by running into
a neighboring picture, he was rebuffed by its inhabitant, a large and
angry-looking wolfhound.
Harry spent the rest of the lunch hour sitting alone underneath the
trapdoor at the top of North Tower, and consequently he was the first
to ascend the silver ladder that led to Sibyll Trelawney’s classroom
when the bell rang.
Divination was Harry’s least favorite class after Potions, which was
due mainly to Professor Trelawney’s habit of predicting his premature
death every few lessons. A thin woman, heavily draped in shawls and
glittering with strings of beads, she always reminded Harry of some
kind of insect, with her glasses hugely magnifying her eyes. She was
busy putting copies of battered, leather-bound books on each of the
spindly little tables with which her room was littered when Harry entered the room, but so dim was the light cast by the lamps covered by
scarves and the low-burning, sickly-scented fire that she appeared not
to notice him as he took a seat in the shadows. The rest of the class arrived over the next five minutes. Ron emerged from the trapdoor,
looked around carefully, spotted Harry and made directly for him, or
as directly as he could while having to wend his way between tables,
chairs, and overstuffed poufs.
“Hermione and me have stopped arguing,” he said, sitting down
beside Harry.
“Good,” grunted Harry.
“But Hermione says she thinks it would be nice if you stopped taking out your temper on us,” said Ron.
“I’m not —”
“I’m just passing on the message,” said Ron, talking over him. “But
I reckon she’s right. It’s not our fault how Seamus and Snape treat
you.”
“I never said it —”
“Good day,” said Professor Trelawney in her usual misty, dreamy
voice, and Harry broke off, feeling both annoyed and slightly
ashamed of himself again. “And welcome back to Divination. I have,
of course, been following your fortunes most carefully over the holidays, and am delighted to see that you have all returned to Hogwarts
safely — as, of course, I knew you would.
“You will find on the tables before you copies of The Dream Oracle,
by Inigo Imago. Dream interpretation is a most important means of divining the future and one that may very probably be tested in your
O.W.L. Not, of course, that I believe examination passes or failures are
of the remotest importance when it comes to the sacred art of divination. If you have the Seeing Eye, certificates and grades matter very
little. However, the headmaster likes you to sit the examination, so . . .”
Her voice trailed away delicately, leaving them all in no doubt that
Professor Trelawney considered her subject above such sordid matters
as examinations.
“Turn, please, to the introduction and read what Imago has to say
on the matter of dream interpretation. Then divide into pairs. Use
The Dream Oracle to interpret each other’s most recent dreams. Carry
on.
The one good thing to be said for this lesson was that it was not a
double period. By the time they had all finished reading the introduction of the book, they had barely ten minutes left for dream interpretation. At the table next to Harry and Ron, Dean had paired up with
Neville, who immediately embarked on a long-winded explanation of
a nightmare involving a pair of giant scissors wearing his grandmother’s best hat; Harry and Ron merely looked at each other glumly.
“I never remember my dreams,” said Ron. “You say one.”
“You must remember one of them,” said Harry impatiently.
He was not going to share his dreams with anyone. He knew perfectly well what his regular nightmare about a graveyard meant, he did
not need Ron or Professor Trelawney or the stupid Dream Oracle to
tell him that. . . .
“Well, I had one that I was playing Quidditch the other night,”
said Ron, screwing up his face in an effort to remember. “What d’you
reckon that means?”
“Probably that you’re going to be eaten by a giant marshmallow or
something,” said Harry, turning the pages of The Dream Oracle without interest.
It was very dull work looking up bits of dreams in the Oracle and
Harry was not cheered up when Professor Trelawney set them the task
of keeping a dream diary for a month as homework. When the bell
went, he and Ron led the way back down the ladder, Ron grumbling
loudly.
“D’you realize how much homework we’ve got already? Binns set
us a foot-and-a-half-long essay on giant wars, Snape wants a foot on
the use of moonstones, and now we’ve got a month’s dream diary from
Trelawney! Fred and George weren’t wrong about O.W.L. year, were
they? That Umbridge woman had better not give us any. . . .”
When they entered the Defense Against the Dark Arts classroom
they found Professor Umbridge already seated at the teacher’s desk,
wearing the fluffy pink cardigan of the night before and the black velvet bow on top of her head. Harry was again reminded forcibly of a
large fly perched unwisely on top of an even larger toad.
The class was quiet as it entered the room; Professor Umbridge
was, as yet, an unknown quantity and nobody knew yet how strict a
disciplinarian she was likely to be.
“Well, good afternoon!” she said when finally the whole class had
sat down.
A few people mumbled “Good afternoon,” in reply.
“Tut, tut,” said Professor Umbridge. “That won’t do, now, will it? I
should like you, please, to reply ‘Good afternoon, Professor Umbridge.’ One more time, please. Good afternoon, class!”
“Good afternoon, Professor Umbridge,” they chanted back at her.
“There, now,” said Professor Umbridge sweetly. “That wasn’t too
difficult, was it? Wands away and quills out, please.”
Many of the class exchanged gloomy looks; the order “wands away”
had never yet been followed by a lesson they had found interesting.
Harry shoved his wand back inside his bag and pulled out quill, ink,
and parchment. Professor Umbridge opened her handbag, extracted
her own wand, which was an unusually short one, and tapped the
blackboard sharply with it; words appeared on the board at once:
Defense Against the Dark Arts
A Return to Basic Principles.
“Well now, your teaching in this subject has been rather disrupted
and fragmented, hasn’t it?” stated Professor Umbridge, turning to face
the class with her hands clasped neatly in front of her. “The constant
changing of teachers, many of whom do not seem to have followed
any Ministry-approved curriculum, has unfortunately resulted in
your being far below the standard we would expect to see in your
O.W.L. year.
“You will be pleased to know, however, that these problems are now
to be rectified. We will be following a carefully structured, theorycentered, Ministry-approved course of defensive magic this year.
Copy down the following, please.”
She rapped the blackboard again; the first message vanished and
was replaced by:
Course aims:
1.Understanding the principles underlying defensive magic.
2.Learning to recognize situations in which defensive magic
can legally be used.
3.Placing the use of defensive magic in a context for
practical use.
For a couple of minutes the room was full of the sound of scratching quills on parchment. When everyone had copied down Professor
Umbridge’s three course aims she said, “Has everybody got a copy of
Defensive Magical Theory by Wilbert Slinkhard?”
There was a dull murmur of assent throughout the class.
“I think we’ll try that again,” said Professor Umbridge. “When I
ask you a question, I should like you to reply ‘Yes, Professor Umbridge,’ or ‘No, Professor Umbridge.’ So, has everyone got a copy of
Defensive Magical Theory by Wilbert Slinkhard?”
“Yes, Professor Umbridge,” rang through the room.
“Good,” said Professor Umbridge. “I should like you to turn to
page five and read chapter one, ‘Basics for Beginners.’ There will be
no need to talk.”
Professor Umbridge left the blackboard and settled herself in the
chair behind the teacher’s desk, observing them all with those pouchy
toad’s eyes. Harry turned to page five of his copy of Defensive Magical
Theory and started to read.
It was desperately dull, quite as bad as listening to Professor Binns.
He felt his concentration sliding away from him; he had soon read the
same line half a dozen times without taking in more than the first few
words. Several silent minutes passed. Next to him, Ron was absentmindedly turning his quill over and over in his fingers, staring at the
same spot on the page. Harry looked right and received a surprise to
shake him out of his torpor. Hermione had not even opened her copy
 of Defensive Magical Theory. She was staring fixedly at Professor Umbridge with her hand in the air.
Harry could not remember Hermione ever neglecting to read when
instructed to, or indeed resisting the temptation to open any book
that came under her nose. He looked at her questioningly, but she
merely shook her head slightly to indicate that she was not about to
answer questions, and continued to stare at Professor Umbridge, who
was looking just as resolutely in another direction.
After several more minutes had passed, however, Harry was not the
only one watching Hermione. The chapter they had been instructed
to read was so tedious that more and more people were choosing to
watch Hermione’s mute attempt to catch Professor Umbridge’s eye
than to struggle on with “Basics for Beginners.”
When more than half the class were staring at Hermione rather
than at their books, Professor Umbridge seemed to decide that she
could ignore the situation no longer.
“Did you want to ask something about the chapter, dear?” she
asked Hermione, as though she had only just noticed her.
“Not about the chapter, no,” said Hermione.
“Well, we’re reading just now,” said Professor Umbridge, showing
her small, pointed teeth. “If you have other queries we can deal with
them at the end of class.”
“I’ve got a query about your course aims,” said Hermione.
Professor Umbridge raised her eyebrows.
“And your name is — ?”
“Hermione Granger,” said Hermione.
“Well, Miss Granger, I think the course aims are perfectly clear if
you read them through carefully,” said Professor Umbridge in a voice
of determined sweetness.
“Well, I don’t,” said Hermione bluntly. “There’s nothing written
up there about using defensive spells.”
There was a short silence in which many members of the class
turned their heads to frown at the three course aims still written on
the blackboard.
“Using defensive spells?” Professor Umbridge repeated with a little
laugh. “Why, I can’t imagine any situation arising in my classroom
that would require you to use a defensive spell, Miss Granger. You
surely aren’t expecting to be attacked during class?”
“We’re not going to use magic?” Ron ejaculated loudly.
“Students raise their hands when they wish to speak in my class,
Mr. — ?”
“Weasley,” said Ron, thrusting his hand into the air.
Professor Umbridge, smiling still more widely, turned her back on
him. Harry and Hermione immediately raised their hands too. Professor Umbridge’s pouchy eyes lingered on Harry for a moment before
she addressed Hermione.
“Yes, Miss Granger? You wanted to ask something else?”
“Yes,” said Hermione. “Surely the whole point of Defense Against
the Dark Arts is to practice defensive spells?”
“Are you a Ministry-trained educational expert, Miss Granger?”
asked Professor Umbridge in her falsely sweet voice.
“No, but —”
“Well then, I’m afraid you are not qualified to decide what the
‘whole point’ of any class is. Wizards much older and cleverer than
you have devised our new program of study. You will be learning
about defensive spells in a secure, risk-free way —”
“What use is that?” said Harry loudly. “If we’re going to be attacked
it won’t be in a —”
“Hand, Mr. Potter!” sang Professor Umbridge.
Harry thrust his fist in the air. Professor Umbridge promptly
turned away from him again, but now several other people had their
hands up too.
“And your name is?” Professor Umbridge said to Dean.
“Dean Thomas.”
“Well, Mr. Thomas?”
“Well, it’s like Harry said, isn’t it?” said Dean. “If we’re going to be
attacked, it won’t be risk-free —”
“I repeat,” said Professor Umbridge, smiling in a very irritating
fashion at Dean, “do you expect to be attacked during my classes?”
“No, but —”
Professor Umbridge talked over him.
“I do not wish to criticize the way things have been run in this
school,” she said, an unconvincing smile stretching her wide mouth,
“but you have been exposed to some very irresponsible wizards in this
class, very irresponsible indeed — not to mention,” she gave a nasty
little laugh, “extremely dangerous half-breeds.”
“If you mean Professor Lupin,” piped up Dean Thomas angrily,
“he was the best we ever —”
“Hand, Mr. Thomas! As I was saying — you have been introduced
to spells that have been complex, inappropriate to your age group, and
potentially lethal. You have been frightened into believing that you are
likely to meet Dark attacks every other day —”
“No we haven’t,” Hermione said, “we just —”
“Your hand is not up, Miss Granger!”
Hermione put up her hand; Professor Umbridge turned away from
her.
“It is my understanding that my predecessor not only performed illegal curses in front of you, he actually performed them on you —”
“Well, he turned out to be a maniac, didn’t he?” said Dean Thomas
hotly. “Mind you, we still learned loads —”
“Your hand is not up, Mr. Thomas!” trilled Professor Umbridge.
“Now, it is the view of the Ministry that a theoretical knowledge will
be more than sufficient to get you through your examination, which,
after all, is what school is all about. And your name is?” she added,
staring at Parvati, whose hand had just shot up.
“Parvati Patil, and isn’t there a practical bit in our Defense Against
the Dark Arts O.W.L.? Aren’t we supposed to show that we can actually do the countercurses and things?”
“As long as you have studied the theory hard enough, there is no
reason why you should not be able to perform the spells under carefully controlled examination conditions,” said Professor Umbridge
dismissively.
“Without ever practicing them before?” said Parvati incredulously.
“Are you telling us that the first time we’ll get to do the spells will be
during our exam?”
“I repeat, as long as you have studied the theory hard enough —”
“And what good’s theory going to be in the real world?” said Harry
loudly, his fist in the air again.
Professor Umbridge looked up.
“This is school, Mr. Potter, not the real world,” she said softly.
“So we’re not supposed to be prepared for what’s waiting out
there?”
“There is nothing waiting out there, Mr. Potter.”
“Oh yeah?” said Harry. His temper, which seemed to have been
bubbling just beneath the surface all day, was reaching boiling point.
“Who do you imagine wants to attack children like yourselves?”
inquired Professor Umbridge in a horribly honeyed voice.
“Hmm, let’s think . . .” said Harry in a mock thoughtful voice,
“maybe Lord Voldemort?”
Ron gasped; Lavender Brown uttered a little scream; Neville
slipped sideways off his stool. Professor Umbridge, however, did not
flinch. She was staring at Harry with a grimly satisfied expression on
her face.
“Ten points from Gryffindor, Mr. Potter.”
The classroom was silent and still. Everyone was staring at either
Umbridge or Harry.
“Now, let me make a few things quite plain.”
Professor Umbridge stood up and leaned toward them, her stubbyfingered hands splayed on her desk.
“You have been told that a certain Dark wizard has returned from
the dead —”
“He wasn’t dead,” said Harry angrily, “but yeah, he’s returned!”
“Mr.-Potter-you-have-already-lost-your-House-ten-points-do-notmake-matters-worse-for-yourself,” said Professor Umbridge in one
breath without looking at him. “As I was saying, you have been informed that a certain Dark wizard is at large once again. This is a lie.”
“It is NOT a lie!” said Harry. “I saw him, I fought him!”
“Detention, Mr. Potter!” said Professor Umbridge triumphantly.
“Tomorrow evening. Five o’clock. My office. I repeat, this is a lie. The
Ministry of Magic guarantees that you are not in danger from any
Dark wizard. If you are still worried, by all means come and see me
outside class hours. If someone is alarming you with fibs about reborn
Dark wizards, I would like to hear about it. I am here to help. I am
your friend. And now, you will kindly continue your reading. Page
five, ‘Basics for Beginners.’ ”
Professor Umbridge sat down behind her desk again. Harry, however, stood up. Everyone was staring at him; Seamus looked halfscared, half-fascinated.
“Harry, no!” Hermione whispered in a warning voice, tugging at
his sleeve, but Harry jerked his arm out of her reach.
“So, according to you, Cedric Diggory dropped dead of his own
accord, did he?” Harry asked, his voice shaking.
There was a collective intake of breath from the class, for none of
them, apart from Ron and Hermione, had ever heard Harry talk
about what had happened on the night that Cedric had died. They
stared avidly from Harry to Professor Umbridge, who had raised her
eyes and was staring at him without a trace of a fake smile on her face.
“Cedric Diggory’s death was a tragic accident,” she said coldly.
“It was murder,” said Harry. He could feel himself shaking. He had
hardly talked to anyone about this, least of all thirty eagerly listening
classmates. “Voldemort killed him, and you know it.”
Professor Umbridge’s face was quite blank. For a moment he
thought she was going to scream at him. Then she said, in her softest,
most sweetly girlish voice, “Come here, Mr. Potter, dear.”
He kicked his chair aside, strode around Ron and Hermione and
up to the teacher’s desk. He could feel the rest of the class holding its
breath. He felt so angry he did not care what happened next.
Professor Umbridge pulled a small roll of pink parchment out of
her handbag, stretched it out on the desk, dipped her quill into a bottle of ink, and started scribbling, hunched over so that Harry could
not see what she was writing. Nobody spoke. After a minute or so she
rolled up the parchment and tapped it with her wand; it sealed itself
seamlessly so that he could not open it.
“Take this to Professor McGonagall, dear,” said Professor Umbridge, holding out the note to him.
He took it from her without saying a word and left the room, not
even looking back at Ron and Hermione, and slamming the classroom door shut behind him. He walked very fast along the corridor,
the note to McGonagall clutched tight in his hand, and turning a corner walked slap into Peeves the Poltergeist, a wide-faced little man
floating on his back in midair, juggling several inkwells.
“Why, it’s Potty Wee Potter!” cackled Peeves, allowing two of the
inkwells to fall to the ground where they smashed and spattered the
walls with ink; Harry jumped backward out of the way with a snarl.
“Get out of it, Peeves.”
“Oooh, Crackpot’s feeling cranky,” said Peeves, pursuing Harry
along the corridor, leering as he zoomed along above him. “What is it
this time, my fine Potty friend? Hearing voices? Seeing visions? Speaking in” — Peeves blew a gigantic raspberry — “tongues?”
“I said, leave me ALONE!” Harry shouted, running down the
nearest flight of stairs, but Peeves merely slid down the banister on his
back beside him.
“Oh, most think he’s barking, the Potty wee lad,
 But some are more kindly and think he’s just sad,
 But Peevesy knows better and says that he’s mad —”
“SHUT UP!”
A door to his left flew open and Professor McGonagall emerged
from her office looking grim and slightly harassed.
“What on earth are you shouting about, Potter?” she snapped, as
Peeves cackled gleefully and zoomed out of sight. “Why aren’t you in
class?”
“I’ve been sent to see you,” said Harry stiffly.
“Sent? What do you mean, sent?”
He held out the note from Professor Umbridge. Professor McGonagall took it from him, frowning, slit it open with a tap of her wand,
stretched it out, and began to read. Her eyes zoomed from side to side
behind their square spectacles as she read what Umbridge had written,
and with each line they became narrower.
“Come in here, Potter.”
He followed her inside her study. The door closed automatically
behind him.
“Well?” said Professor McGonagall, rounding on him. “Is this
true?”
“Is what true?” Harry asked, rather more aggressively than he had
intended. “Professor?” he added in an attempt to sound more polite.
“Is it true that you shouted at Professor Umbridge?”
“Yes,” said Harry.
“You called her a liar?”
“Yes.”
“You told her He-Who-Must-Not-Be-Named is back?”
“Yes.”
Professor McGonagall sat down behind her desk, frowning at Harry.
Then she said, “Have a biscuit, Potter.”
“Have — what?”
“Have a biscuit,” she repeated impatiently, indicating a tartan tin of
cookies lying on top of one of the piles of papers on her desk. “And sit
down.”
There had been a previous occasion when Harry, expecting to be
caned by Professor McGonagall, had instead been appointed by her to
the Gryffindor Quidditch team. He sank into a chair opposite her and
helped himself to a Ginger Newt, feeling just as confused and wrongfooted as he had done on that occasion.
Professor McGonagall set down Professor Umbridge’s note and
looked very seriously at Harry.
“Potter, you need to be careful.”
Harry swallowed his mouthful of Ginger Newt and stared at her.
Her tone of voice was not at all what he was used to; it was not brisk,
crisp, and stern; it was low and anxious and somehow much more human than usual.
“Misbehavior in Dolores Umbridge’s class could cost you much
more than House points and a detention.”
“What do you — ?”
“Potter, use your common sense,” snapped Professor McGonagall,
with an abrupt return to her usual manner. “You know where she
comes from, you must know to whom she is reporting.”
The bell rang for the end of the lesson. Overhead and all around
came the elephantine sounds of hundreds of students on the move.
“It says here she’s given you detention every evening this week,
starting tomorrow,” Professor McGonagall said, looking down at Umbridge’s note again.
“Every evening this week!” Harry repeated, horrified. “But, Professor, couldn’t you — ?”
“No, I couldn’t,” said Professor McGonagall flatly.
“But —”
“She is your teacher and has every right to give you detention. You
will go to her room at five o’clock tomorrow for the first one. Just remember: Tread carefully around Dolores Umbridge.”
“But I was telling the truth!” said Harry, outraged. “Voldemort’s
back, you know he is, Professor Dumbledore knows he is —”
“For heaven’s sake, Potter!” said Professor McGonagall, straightening her glasses angrily (she had winced horribly when he had used
Voldemort’s name). “Do you really think this is about truth or lies? It’s
about keeping your head down and your temper under control!”
She stood up, nostrils wide and mouth very thin, and he stood too.
“Have another biscuit,” she said irritably, thrusting the tin at him.
“No, thanks,” said Harry coldly.
“Don’t be ridiculous,” she snapped.
He took one.
“Thanks,” he said grudgingly.
“Didn’t you listen to Dolores Umbridge’s speech at the start-ofterm feast, Potter?”
“Yeah,” said Harry. “Yeah . . . she said . . . progress will be prohibited or . . . well, it meant that . . . that the Ministry of Magic is trying
to interfere at Hogwarts.”
Professor McGonagall eyed him for a moment, then sniffed,
walked around her desk, and held open the door for him.
“Well, I’m glad you listen to Hermione Granger at any rate,” she
said, pointing him out of her office.

C H A P T E R T H I R T E E N
DETENTION WITH DOLORES

Dinner in the Great Hall that night was not a pleasant experience for Harry. The news about his shouting match with
Umbridge seemed to have traveled exceptionally fast even by Hogwarts standards. He heard whispers all around him as he sat eating
between Ron and Hermione. The funny thing was that none of the
whisperers seemed to mind him overhearing what they were saying
about him — on the contrary, it was as though they were hoping he
would get angry and start shouting again, so that they could hear his
story firsthand.
“He says he saw Cedric Diggory murdered. . . .”
“He reckons he dueled with You-Know-Who. . . .”
“Come off it. . . .”
“Who does he think he’s kidding?”
“Pur-lease . . .”
“What I don’t get,” said Harry in a shaking voice, laying down his
knife and fork (his hands were trembling too much to hold them
steady), “is why they all believed the story two months ago when
Dumbledore told them. . . .”
“The thing is, Harry, I’m not sure they did,” said Hermione
grimly. “Oh, let’s get out of here.”
She slammed down her own knife and fork; Ron looked sadly at his
half-finished apple pie but followed suit. People stared at them all the
way out of the Hall.
“What d’you mean, you’re not sure they believed Dumbledore?”
Harry asked Hermione when they reached the first-floor landing.
“Look, you don’t understand what it was like after it happened,”
said Hermione quietly. “You arrived back in the middle of the lawn
clutching Cedric’s dead body. . . . None of us saw what happened in
the maze. . . . We just had Dumbledore’s word for it that You-KnowWho had come back and killed Cedric and fought you.”
“Which is the truth!” said Harry loudly.
“I know it is, Harry, so will you please stop biting my head off?”
said Hermione wearily. “It’s just that before the truth could sink in,
everyone went home for the summer, where they spent two months
reading about how you’re a nutcase and Dumbledore’s going senile!”
Rain pounded on the windowpanes as they strode along the empty
corridors back to Gryffindor Tower. Harry felt as though his first day
had lasted a week, but he still had a mountain of homework to do before bed. A dull pounding pain was developing over his right eye. He
glanced out of a rain-washed window at the dark grounds as they turned
into the Fat Lady’s corridor. There was still no light in Hagrid’s cabin.
“Mimbulus mimbletonia,” said Hermione, before the Fat Lady
could ask. The portrait swung open to reveal the hole behind and the
three of them scrambled back through it.
The common room was almost empty; nearly everyone was still
down at dinner. Crookshanks uncoiled himself from an armchair and
trotted to meet them, purring loudly, and when Harry, Ron, and
Hermione took their three favorite chairs at the fireside he leapt
lightly into Hermione’s lap and curled up there like a furry ginger
cushion. Harry gazed into the flames, feeling drained and exhausted.
“How can Dumbledore have let this happen?” Hermione cried suddenly, making Harry and Ron jump; Crookshanks leapt off her, looking affronted. She pounded the arms of her chair in fury, so that bits
of stuffing leaked out of the holes. “How can he let that terrible
woman teach us? And in our O.W.L. year too!”
“Well, we’ve never had great Defense Against the Dark Arts teachers, have we?” said Harry. “You know what it’s like, Hagrid told us,
nobody wants the job, they say it’s jinxed.”
“Yes, but to employ someone who’s actually refusing to let us do
magic! What’s Dumbledore playing at?”
“And she’s trying to get people to spy for her,” said Ron darkly. “Remember when she said she wanted us to come and tell her if we hear
anyone saying You-Know-Who’s back?”
“Of course she’s here to spy on us all, that’s obvious, why else would
Fudge have wanted her to come?” snapped Hermione.
“Don’t start arguing again,” said Harry wearily, as Ron opened his
mouth to retaliate. “Can’t we just . . . Let’s just do that homework, get
it out of the way. . . .”
They collected their schoolbags from a corner and returned to the
chairs by the fire. People were coming back from dinner now. Harry
kept his face averted from the portrait hole, but could still sense the
stares he was attracting.
“Shall we do Snape’s stuff first?” said Ron, dipping his quill into
his ink. “ ‘The properties . . . of moonstone . . . and its uses . . . in potionmaking . . .’ ” he muttered, writing the words across the top of his
parchment as he spoke them. “There.” He underlined the title, then
looked up expectantly at Hermione.
“So what are the properties of moonstone and its uses in potionmaking?”
But Hermione was not listening; she was squinting over into the far
corner of the room, where Fred, George, and Lee Jordan were now sitting at the center of a knot of innocent-looking first years, all of whom
were chewing something that seemed to have come out of a large paper bag that Fred was holding.
“No, I’m sorry, they’ve gone too far,” she said, standing up and
looking positively furious. “Come on, Ron.”
“I — what?” said Ron, plainly playing for time. “No — come on,
Hermione — we can’t tell them off for giving out sweets. . . .”
“You know perfectly well that those are bits of Nosebleed Nougat
or — or Puking Pastilles or —”
“Fainting Fancies?” Harry suggested quietly.
One by one, as though hit over the heads with invisible mallets, the
first years were slumping unconscious in their seats; some slid right
onto the floor, others merely hung over the arms of their chairs, their
tongues lolling out. Most of the people watching were laughing; Hermione, however, squared her shoulders and marched directly over to
where Fred and George now stood with clipboards, closely observing
the unconscious first years. Ron rose halfway out of his chair, hovered
uncertainly for a moment or two, then muttered to Harry, “She’s got
it under control,” before sinking as low in his chair as his lanky frame
permitted.
“That’s enough!” Hermione said forcefully to Fred and George,
both of whom looked up in mild surprise.
“Yeah, you’re right,” said George, nodding, “this dosage looks
strong enough, doesn’t it?”
“I told you this morning, you can’t test your rubbish on students!”
“We’re paying them!” said Fred indignantly.
“I don’t care, it could be dangerous!”
“Rubbish,” said Fred.
“Calm down, Hermione, they’re fine!” said Lee reassuringly as he
walked from first year to first year, inserting purple sweets into their
open mouths.
“Yeah, look, they’re coming round now,” said George.
A few of the first years were indeed stirring. Several looked so
shocked to find themselves lying on the floor, or dangling off their
chairs, that Harry was sure Fred and George had not warned them
what the sweets were going to do.
“Feel all right?” said George kindly to a small dark-haired girl lying
at his feet.
“I-I think so,” she said shakily.
“Excellent,” said Fred happily, but the next second Hermione had
snatched both his clipboard and the paper bag of Fainting Fancies
from his hands.
“It is NOT excellent!”
“ ’Course it is, they’re alive, aren’t they?” said Fred angrily.
“You can’t do this, what if you made one of them really ill?”
“We’re not going to make them ill, we’ve already tested them all on
ourselves, this is just to see if everyone reacts the same —”
“If you don’t stop doing it, I’m going to —”
“Put us in detention?” said Fred in an I’d-like-to-see-you-try-it voice.
“Make us write lines?” said George, smirking.
Onlookers all over the room were laughing. Hermione drew herself
up to her full height; her eyes were narrowed and her bushy hair
seemed to crackle with electricity.
“No,” she said, her voice quivering with anger, “but I will write to
your mother.”
“You wouldn’t,” said George, horrified, taking a step back from her.
“Oh, yes, I would,” said Hermione grimly. “I can’t stop you eating
the stupid things yourselves, but you’re not giving them to first years.”
Fred and George looked thunderstruck. It was clear that as far as
they were concerned, Hermione’s threat was way below the belt. With
a last threatening look at them, she thrust Fred’s clipboard and the bag
of Fancies back into his arms and stalked back to her chair by the fire.
Ron was now so low in his seat that his nose was roughly level with
his knees.
“Thank you for your support, Ron,” Hermione said acidly.
“You handled it fine by yourself,” Ron mumbled.
Hermione stared down at her blank piece of parchment for a few
seconds, then said edgily, “Oh, it’s no good, I can’t concentrate now.
I’m going to bed.”
She wrenched her bag open; Harry thought she was about to put
her books away, but instead she pulled out two misshapen woolly objects, placed them carefully on a table by the fireplace, covered them
with a few screwed-up bits of parchment and a broken quill, and
stood back to admire the effect.
“What in the name of Merlin are you doing?” said Ron, watching
her as though fearful for her sanity.
“They’re hats for house-elves,” she said briskly, now stuffing her
books back into her bag. “I did them over the summer. I’m a really
slow knitter without magic, but now I’m back at school I should be
able to make lots more.”
“You’re leaving out hats for the house-elves?” said Ron slowly. “And
you’re covering them up with rubbish first?”
“Yes,” said Hermione defiantly, swinging her bag onto her back.
“That’s not on,” said Ron angrily. “You’re trying to trick them into
picking up the hats. You’re setting them free when they might not
want to be free.”
“Of course they want to be free!” said Hermione at once, though
her face was turning pink. “Don’t you dare touch those hats, Ron!”
She left. Ron waited until she had disappeared through the door to
the girls’ dormitories, then cleared the rubbish off the woolly hats.
“They should at least see what they’re picking up,” he said firmly.
“Anyway . . .” He rolled up the parchment on which he had written
the title of Snape’s essay. “There’s no point trying to finish this now, I
can’t do it without Hermione, I haven’t got a clue what you’re supposed to do with moonstones, have you?”
Harry shook his head, noticing as he did so that the ache in his
right temple was getting worse. He thought of the long essay on giant
wars and the pain stabbed at him sharply. Knowing perfectly well that
he would regret not finishing his homework tonight when the morning came, he piled his books back into his bag.
“I’m going to bed too.”
He passed Seamus on the way to the door leading to the dormitories, but did not look at him. Harry had a fleeting impression that
Seamus had opened his mouth to speak, but sped up, and reached the
soothing peace of the stone spiral staircase without having to endure
any more provocation.
The following day dawned just as leaden and rainy as the previous
one. Hagrid was still absent from the staff table at breakfast.
“But on the plus side, no Snape today,” said Ron bracingly.
Hermione yawned widely and poured herself some coffee. She
looked mildly pleased about something, and when Ron asked her
what she had to be so happy about, she simply said, “The hats have
gone. Seems the house-elves do want freedom after all.”
“I wouldn’t bet on it,” Ron told her cuttingly. “They might not
count as clothes. They didn’t look anything like hats to me, more like
woolly bladders.”
Hermione did not speak to him all morning.
Double Charms was succeeded by double Transfiguration. Professor Flitwick and Professor McGonagall both spent the first fifteen
minutes of their lessons lecturing the class on the importance of
O.W.L.s.
“What you must remember,” said little Professor Flitwick squeakily, perched as ever on a pile of books so that he could see over the top
of his desk, “is that these examinations may influence your futures for
many years to come! If you have not already given serious thought to
your careers, now is the time to do so. And in the meantime, I’m
afraid, we shall be working harder than ever to ensure that you all do
yourselves justice!”
They then spent more than an hour reviewing Summoning Charms,
which according to Professor Flitwick were bound to come up in their
O.W.L., and he rounded off the lesson by setting them their largest
amount of Charms homework ever.
It was the same, if not worse, in Transfiguration.
“You cannot pass an O.W.L.,” said Professor McGonagall grimly,
“without serious application, practice, and study. I see no reason why
everybody in this class should not achieve an O.W.L. in Transfiguration
as long as they put in the work.” Neville made a sad little disbelieving noise. “Yes, you too, Longbottom,” said Professor McGonagall.
“There’s nothing wrong with your work except lack of confidence. So
. . . today we are starting Vanishing Spells. These are easier than Conjuring Spells, which you would not usually attempt until N.E.W.T.
level, but they are still among the most difficult magic you will be
tested on in your O.W.L.”
She was quite right; Harry found the Vanishing Spells horribly difficult. By the end of a double period, neither he nor Ron had managed
to vanish the snails on which they were practicing, though Ron said
hopefully that he thought his looked a bit paler. Hermione, on the
other hand, successfully vanished her snail on the third attempt, earning her a ten-point bonus for Gryffindor from Professor McGonagall.
She was the only person not given homework; everybody else was told
to practice the spell overnight, ready for a fresh attempt on their snails
the following afternoon.
Now panicking slightly about the amount of homework they had
to do, Harry and Ron spent their lunch hour in the library looking up
the uses of moonstones in potion-making. Still angry about Ron’s slur
on her woolly hats, Hermione did not join them. By the time they
reached Care of Magical Creatures in the afternoon, Harry’s head was
aching again.
The day had become cool and breezy, and, as they walked down
the sloping lawn toward Hagrid’s cabin on the edge of the Forbidden
Forest, they felt the occasional drop of rain on their faces. Professor
Grubbly-Plank stood waiting for the class some ten yards from Hagrid’s front door, a long trestle table in front of her laden with many
twigs. As Harry and Ron reached her, a loud shout of laughter
sounded behind them; turning, they saw Draco Malfoy striding toward them, surrounded by his usual gang of Slytherin cronies. He had
clearly just said something highly amusing, because Crabbe, Goyle,
Pansy Parkinson, and the rest continued to snigger heartily as they
gathered around the trestle table. Judging by the fact that all of them
kept looking over at Harry, he was able to guess the subject of the joke
without too much difficulty.
“Everyone here?” barked Professor Grubbly-Plank, once all the
Slytherins and Gryffindors had arrived. “Let’s crack on then — who
can tell me what these things are called?”
She indicated the heap of twigs in front of her. Hermione’s hand
shot into the air. Behind her back, Malfoy did a buck-toothed imitation of her jumping up and down in eagerness to answer a question.
Pansy Parkinson gave a shriek of laughter that turned almost at once
into a scream, as the twigs on the table leapt into the air and revealed
themselves to be what looked like tiny pixieish creatures made of
wood, each with knobbly brown arms and legs, two twiglike fingers at
the end of each hand, and a funny, flat, barklike face in which a pair
of beetle-brown eyes glittered.
“Oooooh!” said Parvati and Lavender, thoroughly irritating Harry:
Anyone would have thought that Hagrid never showed them impressive creatures; admittedly the flobberworms had been a bit dull, but
the salamanders and hippogriffs had been interesting enough, and the
Blast-Ended Skrewts perhaps too much so.
“Kindly keep your voices down, girls!” said Professor GrubblyPlank sharply, scattering a handful of what looked like brown rice
among the stick-creatures, who immediately fell upon the food.
“So — anyone know the names of these creatures? Miss Granger?”
“Bowtruckles,” said Hermione. “They’re tree-guardians, usually
live in wand-trees.”
“Five points for Gryffindor,” said Professor Grubbly-Plank. “Yes, these
are bowtruckles and, as Miss Granger rightly says, they generally live in
trees whose wood is of wand quality. Anybody know what they eat?”
“Wood lice,” said Hermione promptly, which explained why what
Harry had taken for grains of brown rice were moving. “But fairy eggs
if they can get them.”
“Good girl, take another five points. So whenever you need leaves
or wood from a tree in which a bowtruckle lodges, it is wise to have a
gift of wood lice ready to distract or placate it. They may not look
dangerous, but if angered they will gouge out human eyes with their
fingers, which, as you can see, are very sharp and not at all desirable
near the eyeballs. So if you’d like to gather closer, take a few wood lice
and a bowtruckle — I have enough here for one between three — you
can study them more closely. I want a sketch from each of you with all
body parts labeled by the end of the lesson.”
The class surged forward around the trestle table. Harry deliberately
circled around the back so that he ended up right next to Professor
Grubbly-Plank.
“Where’s Hagrid?” he asked her, while everyone else was choosing
bowtruckles.
“Never you mind,” said Professor Grubbly-Plank repressively,
which had been her attitude last time Hagrid had failed to turn up for
a class too. Smirking all over his pointed face, Draco Malfoy leaned
across Harry and seized the largest bowtruckle.
“Maybe,” said Malfoy in an undertone, so that only Harry could
hear him, “the stupid great oaf’s got himself badly injured.”
“Maybe you will if you don’t shut up,” said Harry out of the side of
his mouth.
“Maybe he’s been messing with stuff that’s too big for him, if you
get my drift.”
Malfoy walked away, smirking over his shoulder at Harry, who suddenly felt sick. Did Malfoy know something? His father was a Death
Eater, after all; what if he had information about Hagrid’s fate that
had not yet reached the Order’s ears? He hurried back around the
table to Ron and Hermione, who were squatting on the grass some
distance away and attempting to persuade a bowtruckle to remain still
long enough to draw it. Harry pulled out parchment and quill,
crouched down beside the others, and related in a whisper what Malfoy had just said.
“Dumbledore would know if something had happened to Hagrid,”
said Hermione at once. “It’s just playing into Malfoy’s hands to look
worried, it tells him we don’t know exactly what’s going on. We’ve got
to ignore him, Harry. Here, hold the bowtruckle for a moment, just
so I can draw its face. . . .”
“Yes,” came Malfoy’s clear drawl from the group nearest them,
“Father was talking to the Minister just a couple of days ago, you
know, and it sounds as though the Ministry’s really determined to
crack down on substandard teaching in this place. So even if that overgrown moron does show up again, he’ll probably be sent packing
straight away.”
“OUCH!”
Harry had gripped the bowtruckle so hard that it had almost
snapped; it had just taken a great retaliatory swipe at his hand with its
sharp fingers, leaving two long deep cuts there. Harry dropped it;
Crabbe and Goyle, who had already been guffawing at the idea of Hagrid being sacked, laughed still harder as the bowtruckle set off at full
tilt toward the forest, a little, moving stickman soon swallowed up by
the tree roots. When the bell echoed distantly over the grounds Harry
rolled up his bloodstained bowtruckle picture and marched off to
Herbology with his hand wrapped in a handkerchief of Hermione’s
and Malfoy’s derisive laughter still ringing in his ears.
“If he calls Hagrid a moron one more time . . .” snarled Harry.
“Harry, don’t go picking a row with Malfoy, don’t forget, he’s a prefect now, he could make life difficult for you. . . .”
“Wow, I wonder what it’d be like to have a difficult life?” said Harry
sarcastically. Ron laughed, but Hermione frowned. Together they
traipsed across the vegetable patch. The sky still appeared unable to
make up its mind whether it wanted to rain or not.
“I just wish Hagrid would hurry up and get back, that’s all,” said
Harry in a low voice, as they reached the greenhouses. “And don’t say
that Grubbly-Plank woman’s a better teacher!” he added threateningly.
“I wasn’t going to,” said Hermione calmly.
“Because she’ll never be as good as Hagrid,” said Harry firmly, fully
aware that he had just experienced an exemplary Care of Magical
Creatures lesson and was thoroughly annoyed about it.
The door of the nearest greenhouse opened and some fourth years
spilled out of it, including Ginny.
“Hi,” she said brightly as she passed. A few seconds later, Luna
Lovegood emerged, trailing behind the rest of the class, a smudge of
earth on her nose and her hair tied in a knot on the top of her head.
When she saw Harry, her prominent eyes seemed to bulge excitedly
and she made a beeline straight for him. Many of his classmates
turned curiously to watch. Luna took a great breath and then said,
without so much as a preliminary hello: “I believe He-Who-MustNot-Be-Named is back, and I believe you fought him and escaped
from him.”
“Er — right,” said Harry awkwardly. Luna was wearing what
looked like a pair of orange radishes for earrings, a fact that Parvati
and Lavender seemed to have noticed, as they were both giggling and
pointing at her earlobes.
“You can laugh!” Luna said, her voice rising, apparently under the
impression that Parvati and Lavender were laughing at what she had
said rather than what she was wearing. “But people used to believe there
were no such things as the Blibbering Humdinger or the CrumpleHorned Snorkack!”
“Well, they were right, weren’t they?” said Hermione impatiently.
“There weren’t any such things as the Blibbering Humdinger or the
Crumple-Horned Snorkack.”
Luna gave her a withering look and flounced away, radishes swinging madly. Parvati and Lavender were not the only ones hooting with
laughter now.
“D’you mind not offending the only people who believe me?”
Harry asked Hermione as they made their way into class.
“Oh, for heaven’s sake, Harry, you can do better than her,” said
Hermione. “Ginny’s told me all about her, apparently she’ll only believe in things as long as there’s no proof at all. Well, I wouldn’t expect
anything else from someone whose father runs The Quibbler.”
Harry thought of the sinister winged horses he had seen on the
night he had arrived and how Luna had said she could see them too.
His spirits sank slightly. Had she been lying? But before he could devote much more thought to the matter, Ernie Macmillan had stepped
up to him.
“I want you to know, Potter,” he said in a loud, carrying voice, “that
it’s not only weirdos who support you. I personally believe you one
hundred percent. My family have always stood firm behind Dumbledore, and so do I.”
“Er — thanks very much, Ernie,” said Harry, taken aback but
pleased. Ernie might be pompous on occasions like these, but Harry
was in a mood to deeply appreciate a vote of confidence from somebody who was not wearing radishes in their ears. Ernie’s words had
certainly wiped the smile from Lavender Brown’s face and, as he
turned to talk to Ron and Hermione, Harry caught Seamus’s expression, which looked both confused and defiant.
To nobody’s surprise, Professor Sprout started their lesson by lecturing them about the importance of O.W.L.s. Harry wished all the
teachers would stop doing this; he was starting to get an anxious,
twisted feeling in his stomach every time he remembered how much
homework he had to do, a feeling that worsened dramatically when
Professor Sprout gave them yet another essay at the end of class. Tired
and smelling strongly of dragon dung, Professor Sprout’s preferred
brand of fertilizer, the Gryffindors trooped back up to the castle an
hour and a half later, none of them talking very much; it had been another long day.
As Harry was starving, and he had his first detention with Umbridge at five o’clock, he headed straight for dinner without dropping
off his bag in Gryffindor Tower so that he could bolt something down
before facing whatever she had in store for him. He had barely reached
the entrance of the Great Hall, however, when a loud and angry voice
said, “Oy, Potter!”
“What now?” he muttered wearily, turning to face Angelina Johnson, who looked as though she was in a towering temper.
“I’ll tell you what now,” she said, marching straight up to him and
poking him hard in the chest with her finger. “How come you’ve
landed yourself in detention for five o’clock on Friday?”
“What?” said Harry. “Why . . . oh yeah, Keeper tryouts!”
“Now he remembers!” snarled Angelina. “Didn’t I tell you I wanted
to do a tryout with the whole team, and find someone who fitted in
with everyone? Didn’t I tell you I’d booked the Quidditch pitch specially? And now you’ve decided you’re not going to be there!”
“I didn’t decide not to be there!” said Harry, stung by the injustice
of these words. “I got detention from that Umbridge woman, just because I told her the truth about You-Know-Who —”
“Well, you can just go straight to her and ask her to let you off on
Friday,” said Angelina fiercely, “and I don’t care how you do it, tell her
You-Know-Who’s a figment of your imagination if you like, just make
sure you’re there!”
She stormed away.
“You know what?” Harry said to Ron and Hermione as they entered the Great Hall. “I think we’d better check with Puddlemere
United whether Oliver Wood’s been killed during a training session,
because she seems to be channeling his spirit.”
“What d’you reckon are the odds of Umbridge letting you off on
Friday?” said Ron skeptically, as they sat down at the Gryffindor table.
“Less than zero,” said Harry glumly, tipping lamb chops onto his
plate and starting to eat. “Better try, though, hadn’t I? I’ll offer to do
two more detentions or something, I dunno. . . .” He swallowed a
mouthful of potato and added, “I hope she doesn’t keep me too long
this evening. You realize we’ve got to write three essays, practice Vanishing Spells for McGonagall, work out a countercharm for Flitwick,
finish the bowtruckle drawing, and start that stupid dream diary for
Trelawney?”
Ron moaned and for some reason glanced up at the ceiling.
“And it looks like it’s going to rain.”
“What’s that got to do with our homework?” said Hermione, her
eyebrows raised.
“Nothing,” said Ron at once, his ears reddening.
At five to five Harry bade the other two good-bye and set off for
Umbridge’s office on the third floor. When he knocked on the door
she said, “Come in,” in a sugary voice. He entered cautiously, looking
around.
He had known this office under three of its previous occupants. In
the days when Gilderoy Lockhart had lived here it had been plastered
in beaming portraits of its owner. When Lupin had occupied it, it was
likely you would meet some fascinating Dark creature in a cage or
tank if you came to call. In the impostor Moody’s days it had been
packed with various instruments and artifacts for the detection of
wrongdoing and concealment.
Now, however, it looked totally unrecognizable. The surfaces had
all been draped in lacy covers and cloths. There were several vases full
of dried flowers, each residing on its own doily, and on one of the
walls was a collection of ornamental plates, each decorated with a
large technicolor kitten wearing a different bow around its neck.
These were so foul that Harry stared at them, transfixed, until Professor Umbridge spoke again.
“Good evening, Mr. Potter.”
Harry started and looked around. He had not noticed her at first
because she was wearing a luridly flowered set of robes that blended
only too well with the tablecloth on the desk behind her.
“Evening,” Harry said stiffly.
“Well, sit down,” she said, pointing toward a small table draped in
lace beside which she had drawn up a straight-backed chair. A piece of
blank parchment lay on the table, apparently waiting for him.
“Er,” said Harry, without moving. “Professor Umbridge? Er —
before we start, I-I wanted to ask you a . . . a favor.”
Her bulging eyes narrowed.
“Oh yes?”
“Well I’m . . . I’m on the Gryffindor Quidditch team. And I was
supposed to be at the tryouts for the new Keeper at five o’clock on Friday and I was — was wondering whether I could skip detention that
night and do it — do it another night . . . instead . . .”
He knew long before he reached the end of his sentence that it was
no good.
“Oh no,” said Umbridge, smiling so widely that she looked as
though she had just swallowed a particularly juicy fly. “Oh no, no, no.
This is your punishment for spreading evil, nasty, attention-seeking
stories, Mr. Potter, and punishments certainly cannot be adjusted to
suit the guilty one’s convenience. No, you will come here at five
o’clock tomorrow, and the next day, and on Friday too, and you will
do your detentions as planned. I think it rather a good thing that you
are missing something you really want to do. It ought to reinforce the
lesson I am trying to teach you.”
Harry felt the blood surge to his head and heard a thumping noise
in his ears. So he told evil, nasty, attention-seeking stories, did he?
She was watching him with her head slightly to one side, still smiling widely, as though she knew exactly what he was thinking and was
waiting to see whether he would start shouting again. With a massive
effort Harry looked away from her, dropped his schoolbag beside the
straight-backed chair, and sat down.
“There,” said Umbridge sweetly, “we’re getting better at controlling
our temper already, aren’t we? Now, you are going to be doing some
lines for me, Mr. Potter. No, not with your quill,” she added, as Harry
bent down to open his bag. “You’re going to be using a rather special
one of mine. Here you are.”
She handed him a long, thin black quill with an unusually sharp
point.
“I want you to write ‘I must not tell lies,’ ” she told him softly.
“How many times?” Harry asked, with a creditable imitation of
politeness.
“Oh, as long as it takes for the message to sink in,” said Umbridge
sweetly. “Off you go.”
She moved over to her desk, sat down, and bent over a stack of
parchment that looked like essays for marking. Harry raised the sharp
black quill and then realized what was missing.
“You haven’t given me any ink,” he said.
“Oh, you won’t need ink,” said Professor Umbridge with the merest suggestion of a laugh in her voice.
Harry placed the point of the quill on the paper and wrote: I must
not tell lies.
He let out a gasp of pain. The words had appeared on the parchment in what appeared to be shining red ink. At the same time, the
words had appeared on the back of Harry’s right hand, cut into his
skin as though traced there by a scalpel — yet even as he stared at the
shining cut, the skin healed over again, leaving the place where it had
been slightly redder than before but quite smooth.
Harry looked around at Umbridge. She was watching him, her
wide, toadlike mouth stretched in a smile.
“Yes?”
“Nothing,” said Harry quietly.
He looked back at the parchment, placed the quill upon it once
more, wrote I must not tell lies, and felt the searing pain on the back of
his hand for a second time; once again the words had been cut into his
skin, once again they healed over seconds later.
And on it went. Again and again Harry wrote the words on the
parchment in what he soon came to realize was not ink, but his own
blood. And again and again the words were cut into the back of his
hand, healed, and then reappeared the next time he set quill to
parchment.
Darkness fell outside Umbridge’s window. Harry did not ask when
he would be allowed to stop. He did not even check his watch. He
knew she was watching him for signs of weakness and he was not going to show any, not even if he had to sit here all night, cutting open
his own hand with this quill. . . .
“Come here,” she said, after what seemed hours.
He stood up. His hand was stinging painfully. When he looked
down at it he saw that the cut had healed, but that the skin there was
red raw.
“Hand,” she said.
He extended it. She took it in her own. Harry repressed a shudder
as she touched him with her thick, stubby fingers on which she wore
a number of ugly old rings.
“Tut, tut, I don’t seem to have made much of an impression yet,”
she said, smiling. “Well, we’ll just have to try again tomorrow
evening, won’t we? You may go.”
Harry left her office without a word. The school was quite deserted;
it was surely past midnight. He walked slowly up the corridor then,
when he had turned the corner and was sure that she would not hear
him, broke into a run.
He had not had time to practice Vanishing Spells, had not written a
single dream in his dream diary, and had not finished the drawing of
the bowtruckle, nor had he written his essays. He skipped breakfast
next morning to scribble down a couple of made-up dreams for Divination, their first lesson, and was surprised to find a disheveled Ron
keeping him company.
“How come you didn’t do it last night?” Harry asked, as Ron stared
wildly around the common room for inspiration. Ron, who had been
fast asleep when Harry got back to the dormitory, muttered something about “doing other stuff,” bent low over his parchment, and
scrawled a few words.
“That’ll have to do,” he said, slamming the diary shut, “I’ve said I
dreamed I was buying a new pair of shoes, she can’t make anything
weird out of that, can she?”
They hurried off to North Tower together.
“How was detention with Umbridge, anyway? What did she make
you do?”
Harry hesitated for a fraction of a second, then said, “Lines.”
“That’s not too bad, then, eh?” said Ron.
“Nope,” said Harry.
“Hey — I forgot — did she let you off for Friday?”
“No,” said Harry.
Ron groaned sympathetically.
It was another bad day for Harry; he was one of the worst in Trans-
figuration, not having practiced Vanishing Spells at all. He had to give
up his lunch hour to complete the picture of the bowtruckle, and
meanwhile, Professors McGonagall, Grubbly-Plank, and Sinistra gave
them yet more homework, which he had no prospect of finishing that
evening because of his second detention with Umbridge. To cap it all,
Angelina Johnson tracked him down at dinner again and, on learning
that he would not be able to attend Friday’s Keeper tryouts, told him
she was not at all impressed by his attitude and that she expected players who wished to remain on the team to put training before their
other commitments.
“I’m in detention!” Harry yelled after her as she stalked away.
“D’you think I’d rather be stuck in a room with that old toad or playing Quidditch?”
“At least it’s only lines,” said Hermione consolingly, as Harry sank
back onto his bench and looked down at his steak-and-kidney pie,
which he no longer fancied very much. “It’s not as if it’s a dreadful
punishment, really. . . .”
Harry opened his mouth, closed it again, and nodded. He was not
really sure why he was not telling Ron and Hermione exactly what was
happening in Umbridge’s room: He only knew that he did not want
to see their looks of horror; that would make the whole thing seem
worse and therefore more difficult to face. He also felt dimly that this
was between himself and Umbridge, a private battle of wills, and he
was not going to give her the satisfaction of hearing that he had complained about it.
“I can’t believe how much homework we’ve got,” said Ron
miserably.
“Well, why didn’t you do any last night?” Hermione asked him.
“Where were you anyway?”
“I was . . . I fancied a walk,” said Ron shiftily.
Harry had the distinct impression that he was not alone in concealing things at the moment.  
The second detention was just as bad as the previous one. The skin on
the back of Harry’s hand became irritated more quickly now, red and
inflamed; Harry thought it unlikely to keep healing as effectively for
long. Soon the cut would remain etched in his hand and Umbridge
would, perhaps, be satisfied. He let no moan of pain escape him, however, and from the moment of entering the room to the moment of his
dismissal, again past midnight, he said nothing but “Good evening”
and “Good night.”
His homework situation, however, was now desperate, and when
he returned to the Gryffindor common room he did not, though exhausted, go to bed, but opened his books and began Snape’s moonstone essay. It was half-past two by the time he had finished it. He
knew he had done a poor job, but there was no help for it; unless he
had something to give in he would be in detention with Snape next.
He then dashed off answers to the questions Professor McGonagall
had set them, cobbled together something on the proper handling of
bowtruckles for Professor Grubbly-Plank, and staggered up to bed,
where he fell fully clothed on top of the bed covers and fell asleep
immediately.
Thursday passed in a haze of tiredness. Ron seemed very sleepy too,
though Harry could not see why he should be. Harry’s third detention
passed in the same way as the previous two, except that after two
hours the words “I must not tell lies” did not fade from the back of
Harry’s hand, but remained scratched there, oozing droplets of blood.
The pause in the pointed quill’s scratching made Professor Umbridge
look up.
“Ah,” she said softly, moving around her desk to examine his hand
herself. “Good. That ought to serve as a reminder to you, oughtn’t it?
You may leave for tonight.”
“Do I still have to come back tomorrow?” said Harry, picking up
his schoolbag with his left hand rather than his smarting right.
“Oh yes,” said Professor Umbridge, smiling widely as before. “Yes,
I think we can etch the message a little deeper with another evening’s
work.”
He had never before considered the possibility that there might be
another teacher in the world he hated more than Snape, but as he
walked back toward Gryffindor Tower he had to admit he had found
a contender. She’s evil, he thought, as he climbed a staircase to the seventh floor, she’s an evil, twisted, mad, old —
“Ron?”
He had reached the top of the stairs, turned right, and almost
walked into Ron, who was lurking behind a statue of Lachlan the
Lanky, clutching his broomstick. He gave a great leap of surprise
when he saw Harry and attempted to hide his new Cleansweep Eleven
behind his back.
“What are you doing?”
“Er — nothing. What are you doing?”
Harry frowned at him.
“Come on, you can tell me! What are you hiding here for?”
“I’m — I’m hiding from Fred and George, if you must know,” said
Ron. “They just went past with a bunch of first years, I bet they’re
testing stuff on them again, I mean, they can’t do it in the common
room now, can they, not with Hermione there.”
He was talking in a very fast, feverish way.
“But what have you got your broom for, you haven’t been flying,
have you?” Harry asked.
“I — well — well, okay, I’ll tell you, but don’t laugh, all right?” Ron
said defensively, turning redder with every second. “I-I thought I’d try
out for Gryffindor Keeper now I’ve got a decent broom. There. Go on.
Laugh.”
“I’m not laughing,” said Harry. Ron blinked. “It’s a brilliant idea!
It’d be really cool if you got on the team! I’ve never seen you play
Keeper, are you good?”
“I’m not bad,” said Ron, who looked immensely relieved at Harry’s
reaction. “Charlie, Fred, and George always made me Keep for them
when they were training during the holidays.”
“So you’ve been practicing tonight?”
“Every evening since Tuesday . . . just on my own, though, I’ve
been trying to bewitch Quaffles to fly at me, but it hasn’t been easy
and I don’t know how much use it’ll be.” Ron looked nervous and
anxious. “Fred and George are going to laugh themselves stupid when
I turn up for the tryouts. They haven’t stopped taking the mickey out
of me since I got made a prefect.”
“I wish I was going to be there,” said Harry bitterly, as they set off
together toward the common room.
“Yeah, so do — Harry, what’s that on the back of your hand?”
Harry, who had just scratched his nose with his free right hand,
tried to hide it, but had as much success as Ron with his Cleansweep.
“It’s just a cut — it’s nothing — it’s —”
But Ron had grabbed Harry’s forearm and pulled the back of
Harry’s hand up level with his eyes. There was a pause, during which
he stared at the words carved into the skin, then he released Harry,
looking sick.
“I thought you said she was giving you lines?”
Harry hesitated, but after all, Ron had been honest with him, so he
told Ron the truth about the hours he had been spending in Umbridge’s office.
“The old hag!” Ron said in a revolted whisper as they came to a halt
in front of the Fat Lady, who was dozing peacefully with her head
against her frame. “She’s sick! Go to McGonagall, say something!”
“No,” said Harry at once. “I’m not giving her the satisfaction of
knowing she’s got to me.”
“Got to you? You can’t let her get away with this!”
“I don’t know how much power McGonagall’s got over her,” said
Harry.
“Dumbledore, then, tell Dumbledore!”
“No,” said Harry flatly.
“Why not?”
“He’s got enough on his mind,” said Harry, but that was not the
true reason. He was not going to go to Dumbledore for help when
Dumbledore had not spoken to him once since last June.
“Well, I reckon you should —” Ron began, but he was interrupted
by the Fat Lady, who had been watching them sleepily and now burst
out, “Are you going to give me the password or will I have to stay
awake all night waiting for you to finish your conversation?”
Friday dawned sullen and sodden as the rest of the week. Though
Harry glanced toward the staff table automatically when he entered
the Great Hall, it was without real hope of seeing Hagrid and he
turned his mind immediately to his more pressing problems, such as
the mountainous pile of homework he had to do and the prospect of
yet another detention with Umbridge.
Two things sustained Harry that day. One was the thought that it
was almost the weekend; the other was that, dreadful though his final
detention with Umbridge was sure to be, he had a distant view of the
Quidditch pitch from her window and might, with luck, be able to
see something of Ron’s tryout. These were rather feeble rays of light, it
was true, but Harry was grateful for anything that might lighten his
present darkness; he had never had a worse first week of term at
Hogwarts.
At five o’clock that evening he knocked on Professor Umbridge’s
office door for what he sincerely hoped would be the final time, was
told to enter and did so. The blank parchment lay ready for him on
the lace-covered table, the pointed black quill beside it.
“You know what to do, Mr. Potter,” said Umbridge, smiling
sweetly over at him.
Harry picked up the quill and glanced through the window. If he
just shifted his chair an inch or so to the right . . . On the pretext of
shifting himself closer to the table he managed it. He now had a distant view of the Gryffindor Quidditch team soaring up and down the
pitch, while half a dozen black figures stood at the foot of the three
high goalposts, apparently awaiting their turn to Keep. It was impossible to tell which one was Ron at this distance.
I must not tell lies, Harry wrote. The cut in the back of his right
hand opened and began to bleed afresh.
I must not tell lies. The cut dug deeper, stinging and smarting.
I must not tell lies. Blood trickled down his wrist.
He chanced another glance out of the window. Whoever was defending the goalposts now was doing a very poor job indeed. Katie
Bell scored twice in the few seconds Harry dared watch. Hoping very
much that the Keeper wasn’t Ron, he dropped his eyes back to the
parchment dotted with blood.
I must not tell lies.
I must not tell lies.
He looked up whenever he thought he could risk it, when he could
hear the scratching of Umbridge’s quill or the opening of a desk
drawer. The third person to try out was pretty good, the fourth was
terrible, the fifth dodged a Bludger exceptionally well but then fumbled an easy save. The sky was darkening so that Harry doubted he
would be able to watch the sixth and seventh people at all.
I must not tell lies.
I must not tell lies.
The parchment was now shining with drops of blood from the back
of his hand, which was searing with pain. When he next looked up,
night had fallen and the Quidditch pitch was no longer visible.
“Let’s see if you’ve gotten the message yet, shall we?” said Umbridge’s soft voice half an hour later.
She moved toward him, stretching out her short be-ringed fingers
for his arm. And then, as she took hold of him to examine the words
now cut into his skin, pain seared, not across the back of his hand, but
across the scar on his forehead. At the same time, he had a most peculiar sensation somewhere around his midriff.
He wrenched his arm out of her grip and leapt to his feet, staring at
her. She looked back at him, a smile stretching her wide, slack mouth.
“Yes, it hurts, doesn’t it?” she said softly.
He did not answer. His heart was thumping very hard and fast. Was
she talking about his hand or did she know what he had just felt in his
forehead?
“Well, I think I’ve made my point, Mr. Potter. You may go.”
He caught up his schoolbag and left the room as quickly as he
could.
Stay calm, he told himself as he sprinted up the stairs. Stay calm, it
doesn’t necessarily mean what you think it means. . . .
“Mimbulus mimbletonia!” he gasped at the Fat Lady, who swung
forward once more.
A roar of sound greeted him. Ron came running toward him,
beaming all over his face and slopping butterbeer down his front from
the goblet he was clutching.
“Harry, I did it, I’m in, I’m Keeper!”
“What? Oh — brilliant!” said Harry, trying to smile naturally,
while his heart continued to race and his hand throbbed and bled.
“Have a butterbeer.” Ron pressed a bottle onto him. “I can’t believe
it — where’s Hermione gone?”
“She’s there,” said Fred, who was also swigging butterbeer, and
pointed to an armchair by the fire. Hermione was dozing in it, her
drink tipping precariously in her hand.
“Well, she said she was pleased when I told her,” said Ron, looking
slightly put out.
“Let her sleep,” said George hastily. It was a few moments before
Harry noticed that several of the first years gathered around them bore
unmistakable signs of recent nosebleeds.
“Come here, Ron, and see if Oliver’s old robes fit you,” called Katie
Bell. “We can take off his name and put yours on instead. . . .”
As Ron moved away, Angelina came striding up to Harry.
“Sorry I was a bit short with you earlier, Potter,” she said abruptly.
“It’s stressful, this managing lark, you know, I’m starting to think I
was a bit hard on Wood sometimes.” She was watching Ron over the
rim of her goblet with a slight frown on her face.
“Look, I know he’s your best mate, but he’s not fabulous,” she said
bluntly. “I think with a bit of training he’ll be all right, though. He
comes from a family of good Quidditch players. I’m banking on him
turning out to have a bit more talent than he showed today, to
be honest. Vicky Frobisher and Geoffrey Hooper both flew better
this evening, but Hooper’s a real whiner, he’s always moaning about
something or other, and Vicky’s involved in all sorts of societies, she
admitted herself that if training clashed with her Charm Club she’d
put Charms first. Anyway, we’re having a practice session at two
o’clock tomorrow, so just make sure you’re there this time. And do me
a favor and help Ron as much as you can, okay?”
He nodded and Angelina strolled back to Alicia Spinnet. Harry
moved over to sit next to Hermione, who awoke with a jerk as he put
down his bag.
“Oh, Harry, it’s you. . . . Good about Ron, isn’t it?” she said
blearily. “I’m just so — so — so tired,” she yawned. “I was up until
one o’clock making more hats. They’re disappearing like mad!”
And sure enough, now that he looked, Harry saw that there were
woolly hats concealed all around the room where unwary elves might
accidentally pick them up.
“Great,” said Harry distractedly; if he did not tell somebody soon,
he would burst. “Listen, Hermione, I was just up in Umbridge’s office
and she touched my arm . . .”
Hermione listened closely. When Harry had finished she said
slowly, “You’re worried that You-Know-Who’s controlling her like he
controlled Quirrell?”
“Well,” said Harry, dropping his voice, “it’s a possibility, isn’t it?”
“I suppose so,” said Hermione, though she sounded unconvinced.
“But I don’t think he can be possessing her the way he possessed Quirrell, I mean, he’s properly alive again now, isn’t he, he’s got his own
body, he wouldn’t need to share someone else’s. He could have her under the Imperius Curse, I suppose. . . .”
Harry watched Fred, George, and Lee Jordan juggling empty butterbeer bottles for a moment. Then Hermione said, “But last year
your scar hurt when nobody was touching you, and didn’t Dumbledore say it had to do with what You-Know-Who was feeling at the
time? I mean, maybe this hasn’t got anything to do with Umbridge at
all, maybe it’s just coincidence it happened while you were with her?”
“She’s evil,” said Harry flatly. “Twisted.”
“She’s horrible, yes, but . . . Harry, I think you ought to tell Dumbledore your scar hurt.”
It was the second time in two days he had been advised to go to
Dumbledore and his answer to Hermione was just the same as his answer to Ron.
“I’m not bothering him with this. Like you just said, it’s not a big
deal. It’s been hurting on and off all summer — it was just a bit worse
tonight, that’s all —”
“Harry, I’m sure Dumbledore would want to be bothered by
this —”
“Yeah,” said Harry, before he could stop himself, “that’s the only bit
of me Dumbledore cares about, isn’t it, my scar?”
“Don’t say that, it’s not true!”
“I think I’ll write and tell Sirius about it, see what he thinks —”
“Harry, you can’t put something like that in a letter!” said
Hermione, looking alarmed. “Don’t you remember, Moody told us to
be careful what we put in writing! We just can’t guarantee owls aren’t
being intercepted anymore!”
“All right, all right, I won’t tell him, then!” said Harry irritably. He
got to his feet. “I’m going to bed. Tell Ron for me, will you?”
“Oh no,” said Hermione, looking relieved, “if you’re going that
means I can go without being rude too, I’m absolutely exhausted and
I want to make some more hats tomorrow. Listen, you can help me if
you like, it’s quite fun, I’m getting better, I can do patterns and bobbles and all sorts of things now.”
Harry looked into her face, which was shining with glee, and tried
to look as though he was vaguely tempted by this offer.
“Er . . . no, I don’t think I will, thanks,” he said. “Er — not tomorrow. I’ve got loads of homework to do. . . .”
And he traipsed off to the boys’ stairs, leaving her looking slightly
disappointed behind him.

C H A P T E R F O U R T E E N
PERCY AND PADFOOT

Harry was the first to awake in his dormitory next morning.
He lay for a moment watching dust swirl in the chink of
sunlight falling through the gap in his four-poster’s hangings and savored the thought that it was Saturday. The first week of term seemed
to have dragged on forever, like one gigantic History of Magic lesson.
Judging by the sleepy silence and the freshly minted look of that
beam of sunlight, it was just after daybreak. He pulled open the curtains around his bed, got up, and started to dress. The only sound
apart from the distant twittering of birds was the slow, deep breathing
of his fellow Gryffindors. He opened his schoolbag carefully, pulled
out parchment and quill, and headed out of the dormitory for the
common room.
Making straight for his favorite squashy old armchair beside the
now extinct fire, Harry settled himself down comfortably and unrolled his parchment while looking around the room. The detritus of
crumpled-up bits of parchment, old Gobstones, empty ingredient jars,
and candy wrappers that usually covered the common room at the
end of each day was gone, as were all Hermione’s elf hats. Wondering
vaguely how many elves had now been set free whether they wanted
to be or not, Harry uncorked his ink bottle, dipped his quill into it,
and then held it suspended an inch above the smooth yellowish surface of his parchment, thinking hard. . . . But after a minute or so he
found himself staring into the empty grate, at a complete loss for what
to say.
He could now appreciate how hard it had been for Ron and
Hermione to write him letters over the summer. How was he supposed to tell Sirius everything that had happened over the past week
and pose all the questions he was burning to ask without giving potential letter-thieves a lot of information he did not want them to
have?
He sat quite motionless for a while, gazing into the fireplace, then,
finally coming to a decision, he dipped his quill into the ink bottle
once more and set it resolutely upon the parchment.
Dear Snuffles,
Hope you’re okay, the first week back here’s been terrible, I’m
really glad it’s the weekend.
We’ve got a new Defense Against the Dark Arts teacher, Professor Umbridge. She’s nearly as nice as your mum. I’m writing
because that thing I wrote to you about last summer happened
again last night when I was doing a detention with Umbridge.
We’re all missing our biggest friend, we hope he’ll be back soon.
Please write back quickly.
Best,
Harry reread this letter several times, trying to see it from the point
of view of an outsider. He could not see how they would know what
he was talking about — or who he was talking to — just from reading
this letter. He did hope Sirius would pick up the hint about Hagrid
and tell them when he might be back: Harry did not want to ask directly in case it drew too much attention to what Hagrid might be up
to while he was not at Hogwarts.
Considering it was a very short letter it had taken a long time to
write; sunlight had crept halfway across the room while he had been
working on it, and he could now hear distant sounds of movement
from the dormitories above. Sealing the parchment carefully he
climbed through the portrait hole and headed off for the Owlery.
“I would not go that way if I were you,” said Nearly Headless Nick,
drifting disconcertingly through a wall just ahead of him as he walked
down the passage. “Peeves is planning an amusing joke on the next
person to pass the bust of Paracelsus halfway down the corridor.”
“Does it involve Paracelsus falling on top of the person’s head?”
asked Harry.
“Funnily enough, it does,” said Nearly Headless Nick in a bored
voice. “Subtlety has never been Peeves’s strong point. I’m off to try
and find the Bloody Baron. . . . He might be able to put a stop to it.
. . . See you, Harry. . . .”
“Yeah, ’bye,” said Harry and instead of turning right, he turned left,
taking a longer but safer route up to the Owlery. His spirits rose as he
walked past window after window showing brilliantly blue sky; he had
training later, he would be back on the Quidditch pitch at last —
Something brushed his ankles. He looked down and saw the caretaker’s skeletal gray cat, Mrs. Norris, slinking past him. She turned
lamplike yellow eyes upon him for a moment before disappearing behind a statue of Wilfred the Wistful.
“I’m not doing anything wrong,” Harry called after her. She had
the unmistakable air of a cat that was off to report to her boss, yet
Harry could not see why; he was perfectly entitled to walk up to the
Owlery on a Saturday morning.
The sun was high in the sky now and when Harry entered the
Owlery the glassless windows dazzled his eyes; thick silvery beams of
sunlight crisscrossed the circular room in which hundreds of owls nestled on rafters, a little restless in the early morning light, some clearly
just returned from hunting. The straw-covered floor crunched a little
as he stepped across tiny animal bones, craning his neck for a sight of
Hedwig.
“There you are,” he said, spotting her somewhere near the very top
of the vaulted ceiling. “Get down here, I’ve got a letter for you.”
With a low hoot she stretched her great white wings and soared
down onto his shoulder.
“Right, I know this says ‘Snuffles’ on the outside,” he told her, giving her the letter to clasp in her beak and, without knowing exactly
why, whispering, “but it’s for Sirius, okay?”
She blinked her amber eyes once and he took that to mean that she
understood.
“Safe flight, then,” said Harry and he carried her to one of the windows; with a moment’s pressure on his arm Hedwig took off into the
blindingly bright sky. He watched her until she became a tiny black
speck and vanished, then switched his gaze to Hagrid’s hut, clearly visible from this window, and just as clearly uninhabited, the chimney
smokeless, the curtains drawn.
The treetops of the Forbidden Forest swayed in a light breeze.
Harry watched them, savoring the fresh air on his face, thinking about
Quidditch later . . . and then he saw it. A great, reptilian winged
horse, just like the ones pulling the Hogwarts carriages, with leathery
black wings spread wide like a pterodactyl’s, rose up out of the trees
like a grotesque, giant bird. It soared in a great circle and then plunged
once more into the trees. The whole thing had happened so quickly
Harry could hardly believe what he had seen, except that his heart was
hammering madly.
The Owlery door opened behind him. He leapt in shock, and turning quickly, saw Cho Chang holding a letter and a parcel in her hands.
“Hi,” said Harry automatically.
“Oh . . . hi,” she said breathlessly. “I didn’t think anyone would be
up here this early. . . . I only remembered five minutes ago, it’s my
mum’s birthday.”
She held up the parcel.
“Right,” said Harry. His brain seemed to have jammed. He wanted
to say something funny and interesting, but the memory of that terrible winged horse was fresh in his mind.
“Nice day,” he said, gesturing to the windows. His insides seemed
to shrivel with embarrassment. The weather. He was talking about the
weather. . . .
“Yeah,” said Cho, looking around for a suitable owl. “Good Quidditch conditions. I haven’t been out all week, have you?”
“No,” said Harry.
Cho had selected one of the school barn owls. She coaxed it down
onto her arm where it held out an obliging leg so that she could attach
the parcel.
“Hey, has Gryffindor got a new Keeper yet?” she asked.
“Yeah,” said Harry. “It’s my friend Ron Weasley, d’you know him?”
“The Tornado-hater?” said Cho rather coolly. “Is he any good?”
“Yeah,” said Harry, “I think so. I didn’t see his tryout, though, I was
in detention.”
Cho looked up, the parcel only half-attached to the owl’s legs.
“That Umbridge woman’s foul,” she said in a low voice. “Putting
you in detention just because you told the truth about how — how
— how he died. Everyone heard about it, it was all over the school.
You were really brave standing up to her like that.”
Harry’s insides reinflated so rapidly he felt as though he might actually float a few inches off the dropping-strewn floor. Who cared
about a stupid flying horse, Cho thought he had been really brave. . . .
For a moment he considered accidentally-on-purpose showing her his
cut hand as he helped her tie her parcel onto her owl. . . . But the very
instant that this thrilling thought occurred, the Owlery door opened
again.
Filch, the caretaker, came wheezing into the room. There were purple patches on his sunken, veined cheeks, his jowls were aquiver and
his thin gray hair disheveled; he had obviously run here. Mrs. Norris
came trotting at his heels, gazing up at the owls overhead and mewing
hungrily. There was a restless shifting of wings from above, and a large
brown owl snapped his beak in a menacing fashion.
“Aha!” said Filch, taking a flat-footed step toward Harry, his
pouchy cheeks trembling with anger. “I’ve had a tip-off that you are
intending to place a massive order for Dungbombs!”
Harry folded his arms and stared at the caretaker.
“Who told you I was ordering Dungbombs?”
Cho was looking from Harry to Filch, also frowning; the barn owl
on her arm, tired of standing on one leg, gave an admonitory hoot but
she ignored it.
“I have my sources,” said Filch in a self-satisfied hiss. “Now hand
over whatever it is you’re sending.”
Feeling immensely thankful that he had not dawdled in posting off
the letter, Harry said, “I can’t, it’s gone.”
“Gone?” said Filch, his face contorting with rage.
“Gone,” said Harry calmly.
Filch opened his mouth furiously, mouthed for a few seconds, then
raked Harry’s robes with his eyes. “How do I know you haven’t got it
in your pocket?”
“Because —”
“I saw him send it,” said Cho angrily.
Filch rounded on her.
“You saw him — ?”
“That’s right, I saw him,” she said fiercely.
There was a moment’s pause in which Filch glared at Cho and Cho
glared right back, then the caretaker turned and shuffled back toward
the door. He stopped with his hand on the handle and looked back at
Harry.
“If I get so much as a whiff of a Dungbomb . . .”
He stumped off down the stairs. Mrs. Norris cast a last longing
look at the owls and followed him.
Harry and Cho looked at each other.
“Thanks,” Harry said.
“No problem,” said Cho, finally fixing the parcel to the barn owl’s
other leg, her face slightly pink. “You weren’t ordering Dungbombs,
were you?”
“No,” said Harry.
“I wonder why he thought you were, then?” she said, as she carried
the owl to the window.
Harry shrugged; he was quite as mystified by that as she was,
though, oddly, it was not bothering him very much at the moment.
They left the Owlery together. At the entrance of a corridor that led
toward the west wing of the castle, Cho said, “I’m going this way.
Well, I’ll . . . I’ll see you around, Harry.”
“Yeah . . . see you.”
She smiled at him and departed. He walked on, feeling quietly
elated. He had managed to have an entire conversation with her and
not embarrassed himself once. . . . You were really brave standing up to
her like that. . . . She had called him brave. . . . She did not hate him
for being alive. . . .
Of course, she had preferred Cedric, he knew that. . . . Though if
he’d only asked her to the ball before Cedric had, things might have
turned out differently. . . . She had seemed sincerely sorry that she
had to refuse when Harry had asked her. . . .
“Morning,” Harry said brightly to Ron and Hermione, joining
them at the Gryffindor table in the Great Hall.
“What are you looking so pleased about?” said Ron, eyeing Harry
in surprise.
“Erm . . . Quidditch later,” said Harry happily, pulling a large platter of bacon and eggs toward him.
“Oh . . . yeah . . .” said Ron. He put down the bit of toast he was
eating and took a large swig of pumpkin juice. Then he said, “Listen
. . . you don’t fancy going out a bit earlier with me, do you? Just to —
er — give me some practice before training? So I can, you know, get
my eye in a bit . . .”
“Yeah, okay,” said Harry.
“Look, I don’t think you should,” said Hermione seriously, “you’re
both really behind on homework as it —”
But she broke off; the morning post was arriving and, as usual, the
Daily Prophet was soaring toward her in the beak of a screech owl,
which landed perilously close to the sugar bowl and held out a leg;
Hermione pushed a Knut into its leather pouch, took the newspaper,
and scanned the front page critically as the owl took off again.
“Anything interesting?” said Ron; Harry smiled — he knew Ron
was keen to get her off the subject of homework.
“No,” she sighed, “just some guff about the bass player in the
Weird Sisters getting married. . . .”
She opened the paper and disappeared behind it. Harry devoted
himself to another helping of eggs and bacon; Ron was staring up at
the high windows, looking slightly preoccupied.
“Wait a moment,” said Hermione suddenly. “Oh no . . . Sirius!”
“What’s happened?” said Harry, and he snatched at the paper so
violently that it ripped down the middle so that he and Hermione
were holding half each.
“ ‘The Ministry of Magic has received a tip-off from a reliable source
that Sirius Black, notorious mass murderer . . . blah blah blah . . . is currently hiding in London!’ ” Hermione read from her half in an anguished
whisper.
“Lucius Malfoy, I’ll bet anything,” said Harry in a low, furious
voice. “He did recognize Sirius on the platform. . . .”
“What?” said Ron, looking alarmed. “You didn’t say —”
“Shh!” said the other two.
“. . . ‘Ministry warns Wizarding community that Black is very dangerous . . . killed thirteen people . . . broke out of Azkaban . . .’ the usual
rubbish,” Hermione concluded, laying down her half of the paper and
looking fearfully at Harry and Ron. “Well, he just won’t be able to
leave the house again, that’s all,” she whispered. “Dumbledore did
warn him not to.”
Harry looked down glumly at the bit of the Prophet he had torn off.
Most of the page was devoted to an advertisement for Madame
Malkin’s Robes for All Occasions, which was apparently having a sale.
“Hey!” he said, flattening it down so Hermione and Ron could
both see it. “Look at this!”
“I’ve got all the robes I want,” said Ron.
“No,” said Harry, “look . . . this little piece here . . .”
Ron and Hermione bent closer to read it; the item was barely an
inch long and placed right at the bottom of a column. It was headlined:
TRESPASS AT MINISTRY
Sturgis Podmore, 38, of number two, Laburnum
Gardens, Clapham, has appeared in front of the
Wizengamot charged with trespass and attempted
robbery at the Ministry of Magic on 31st August.
Podmore was arrested by Ministry of Magic watchwizard Eric Munch, who found him attempting to
force his way through a top-security door at one
o’clock in the morning. Podmore, who refused to
speak in his own defense, was convicted on both
charges and sentenced to six months in Azkaban.
“Sturgis Podmore?” said Ron slowly, “but he’s that bloke who looks
like his head’s been thatched, isn’t he? He’s one of the Ord —”
“Ron, shh!” said Hermione, casting a terrified look around them.
“Six months in Azkaban!” whispered Harry, shocked. “Just for trying to get through a door!”
“Don’t be silly, it wasn’t just for trying to get through a door —
what on earth was he doing at the Ministry of Magic at one o’clock in
the morning?” breathed Hermione.
“D’you reckon he was doing something for the Order?” Ron
muttered.
“Wait a moment. . . .” said Harry slowly. “Sturgis was supposed to
come and see us off, remember?”
The other two looked at him.
“Yeah, he was supposed to be part of our guard going to King’s
Cross, remember? And Moody was all annoyed because he didn’t turn
up, so that doesn’t seem like he was supposed to be on a job for them,
does it?”
“Well, maybe they didn’t expect him to get caught,” said
Hermione.
“It could be a frame-up!” Ron exclaimed excitedly. “No — listen!”
he went on, dropping his voice dramatically at the threatening look
on Hermione’s face. “The Ministry suspects he’s one of Dumbledore’s
lot so — I dunno — they lured him to the Ministry, and he wasn’t
trying to get through a door at all! Maybe they’ve just made something up to get him!”
There was a pause while Harry and Hermione considered this.
Harry thought it seemed far-fetched; Hermione, on the other hand,
looked rather impressed and said, “Do you know, I wouldn’t be at all
surprised if that were true.”
She folded up her half of the newspaper thoughtfully. When Harry
laid down his knife and fork she seemed to come out of a reverie.
“Right, well, I think we should tackle that essay for Sprout on SelfFertilizing Shrubs first, and if we’re lucky we’ll be able to start McGonagall’s Inanimatus Conjurus before lunch. . . .”
Harry felt a small twinge of guilt at the thought of the pile of
homework awaiting him upstairs, but the sky was a clear, exhilarating
blue, and he had not been on his Firebolt for a week. . . .
“I mean, we can do it tonight,” said Ron, as he and Harry walked
down the sloping lawns toward the Quidditch pitch, their broomsticks over their shoulders, Hermione’s dire warnings that they would
fail all their O.W.L.s still ringing in their ears. “And we’ve got tomorrow. She gets too worked up about work, that’s her trouble. . . .” There
was a pause and he added, in a slightly more anxious tone, “D’you
think she meant it when she said we weren’t copying from her?”
“Yeah, I do,” said Harry. “Still, this is important too, we’ve got to
practice if we want to stay on the Quidditch team. . . .”
“Yeah, that’s right,” said Ron in a heartened tone. “And we have got
plenty of time to do it all. . . .”
Harry glanced over to his right as they approached the Quidditch
pitch, to where the trees of the Forbidden Forest were swaying darkly.
Nothing flew out of them; the sky was empty but for a few distant
owls fluttering around the Owlery Tower. He had enough to worry
about; the flying horse wasn’t doing him any harm: He pushed it out
of his mind.
They collected balls from the cupboard in the changing room and
set to work, Ron guarding the three tall goalposts, Harry playing
Chaser and trying to get the Quaffle past Ron. Harry thought Ron
was pretty good; he blocked three-quarters of the goals Harry attempted to put past him and played better the longer they practiced.
After a couple of hours they returned to the school, where they ate
lunch, during which Hermione made it quite clear that she thought
they were irresponsible, then returned to the Quidditch pitch for the
real training session. All their teammates but Angelina were already in
the changing room when they entered.
“All right, Ron?” said George, winking at him.
“Yeah,” said Ron, who had become quieter and quieter all the way
down to the pitch.
“Ready to show us all up, Ickle Prefect?” said Fred, emerging
tousle-haired from the neck of his Quidditch robes, a slightly malicious grin on his face.
“Shut up,” said Ron, stony-faced, pulling on his own team robes
for the first time. They fitted him well considering they had been
Oliver Wood’s, who was rather broader in the shoulder.
“Okay everyone,” said Angelina, entering from the Captain’s office,
already changed. “Let’s get to it; Alicia and Fred, if you can just bring
the ball crate out for us. Oh, and there are a couple of people out there
watching but I want you to just ignore them, all right?”
Something in her would-be casual voice made Harry think he
might know who the uninvited spectators were, and sure enough,
when they left the changing room for the bright sunlight of the pitch
it was to a storm of catcalls and jeers from the Slytherin Quidditch
team and assorted hangers-on, who were grouped halfway up the
empty stands and whose voices echoed loudly around the stadium.
“What’s that Weasley’s riding?” Malfoy called in his sneering drawl.
“Why would anyone put a Flying Charm on a moldy old log like
that?”
Crabbe, Goyle, and Pansy Parkinson guffawed and shrieked with
laughter. Ron mounted his broom and kicked off from the ground
and Harry followed him, watching his ears turn red from behind.
“Ignore them,” he said, accelerating to catch up with Ron. “We’ll
see who’s laughing after we play them. . . .”
“Exactly the attitude I want, Harry,” said Angelina approvingly,
soaring around them with the Quaffle under her arm and slowing to
hover on the spot in front of her airborne team. “Okay everyone, we’re
going to start with some passes just to warm up, the whole team
please —”
“Hey, Johnson, what’s with that hairstyle anyway?” shrieked Pansy
Parkinson from below. “Why would anyone want to look like they’ve
got worms coming out of their head?”
Angelina swept her long braided hair out of her face and said
calmly, “Spread out, then, and let’s see what we can do. . . .”
Harry reversed away from the others to the far side of the pitch.
Ron fell back toward the opposite goal. Angelina raised the Quaffle
with one hand and threw it hard to Fred, who passed to George, who
passed to Harry, who passed to Ron, who dropped it.
The Slytherins, led by Malfoy, roared and screamed with laughter.
Ron, who had pelted toward the ground to catch the Quaffle before it
landed, pulled out of the dive untidily, so that he slipped sideways on
his broom, and returned to playing height, blushing. Harry saw Fred
and George exchange looks, but uncharacteristically neither of them
said anything, for which he was grateful.
“Pass it on, Ron,” called Angelina, as though nothing had happened.
Ron threw the Quaffle to Alicia, who passed back to Harry, who
passed to George. . . .
“Hey, Potter, how’s your scar feeling?” called Malfoy. “Sure you
don’t need a lie-down? It must be, what, a whole week since you were
in the hospital wing, that’s a record for you, isn’t it?”
Fred passed to Angelina; she reverse passed to Harry, who had not
been expecting it, but caught it in the very tips of his fingers and
passed it quickly to Ron, who lunged for it and missed by inches.
“Come on now, Ron,” said Angelina crossly, as Ron dived for the
ground again, chasing the Quaffle. “Pay attention.”
It would have been hard to say whether Ron’s face or the Quaffle
was a deeper scarlet when he returned again to playing height. Malfoy
and the rest of the Slytherin team were howling with laughter.
On his third attempt, Ron caught the Quaffle; perhaps out of relief
he passed it on so enthusiastically that it soared straight through
Katie’s outstretched hands and hit her hard in the face.
“Sorry!” Ron groaned, zooming forward to see whether he had
done any damage.
“Get back in position, she’s fine!” barked Angelina. “But as you’re
passing to a teammate, do try not to knock her off her broom, won’t
you? We’ve got Bludgers for that!”
Katie’s nose was bleeding. Down below the Slytherins were stamping their feet and jeering. Fred and George converged on Katie.
“Here, take this,” Fred told her, handing her something small and
purple from out of his pocket. “It’ll clear it up in no time.”
“All right,” called Angelina, “Fred, George, go and get your bats
and a Bludger; Ron, get up to the goalposts, Harry, release the Snitch
when I say so. We’re going to aim for Ron’s goal, obviously.”
Harry zoomed off after the twins to fetch the Snitch.
“Ron’s making a right pig’s ear of things, isn’t he?” muttered
George, as the three of them landed at the crate containing the balls
and opened it to extract one of the Bludgers and the Snitch.
“He’s just nervous,” said Harry. “He was fine when I was practicing
with him this morning.”
“Yeah, well, I hope he hasn’t peaked too soon,” said Fred gloomily.
They returned to the air. When Angelina blew her whistle, Harry
released the Snitch and Fred and George let fly the Bludger; from that
moment on, Harry was barely aware of what the others were doing. It
was his job to recapture the tiny fluttering golden ball that was worth
a hundred and fifty points to the Seeker’s team and doing so required
enormous speed and skill. He accelerated, rolling and swerving in and
out of the Chasers, the warm autumn air whipping his face and the
distant yells of the Slytherins so much meaningless roaring in his ears.
. . . But too soon, the whistle brought him to a halt again.
“Stop — stop – STOP!” screamed Angelina. “Ron — you’re not
covering your middle post!”
Harry looked around at Ron, who was hovering in front of the lefthand hoop, leaving the other two completely unprotected.
“Oh . . . sorry . . .”
“You keep shifting around while you’re watching the Chasers!” said
Angelina. “Either stay in center position until you have to move to defend a hoop, or else circle the hoops, but don’t drift vaguely off to one
side, that’s how you let in the last three goals!”
“Sorry . . .” Ron repeated, his red face shining like a beacon against
the bright blue sky.
“And Katie, can’t you do something about that nosebleed?”
“It’s just getting worse!” said Katie thickly, attempting to stem the
flow with her sleeve.
Harry glanced around at Fred, who was looking anxious and checking his pockets. He saw Fred pull out something purple, examine it
for a second, and then look around at Katie, evidently horrorstruck.
“Well, let’s try again,” said Angelina. She was ignoring the Slytherins, who had now set up a chant of “Gryffindor are losers, Gryffindor
are losers,” but there was a certain rigidity about her seat on the broom
nevertheless.
This time they had been flying for barely three minutes when
Angelina’s whistle sounded. Harry, who had just sighted the Snitch
circling the opposite goalpost, pulled up feeling distinctly aggrieved.
“What now?” he said impatiently to Alicia, who was nearest.
“Katie,” she said shortly.
Harry turned and saw Angelina, Fred, and George all flying as fast
as they could toward Katie. Harry and Alicia sped toward her too. It
was plain that Angelina had stopped training just in time; Katie was
now chalk-white and covered in blood.
“She needs the hospital wing,” said Angelina.
“We’ll take her,” said Fred. “She — er — might have swallowed a
Blood Blisterpod by mistake —”
“Well, there’s no point continuing with no Beaters and a Chaser
gone,” said Angelina glumly, as Fred and George zoomed off toward
the castle supporting Katie between them. “Come on, let’s go and get
changed.”
The Slytherins continued to chant as they trailed back into the
changing rooms.
“How was practice?” asked Hermione rather coolly half an hour
later, as Harry and Ron climbed through the portrait hole into the
Gryffindor common room.
“It was —” Harry began.
“Completely lousy,” said Ron in a hollow voice, sinking into a chair
beside Hermione. She looked up at Ron and her frostiness seemed to
melt.
“Well, it was only your first one,” she said consolingly, “it’s bound
to take time to —”
“Who said it was me who made it lousy?” snapped Ron.
“No one,” said Hermione, looking taken aback, “I thought —”
“You thought I was bound to be rubbish?”
“No, of course I didn’t! Look, you said it was lousy so I just —”
“I’m going to get started on some homework,” said Ron angrily
and stomped off to the staircase to the boys’ dormitories and vanished
from sight. Hermione turned to Harry.
“Was he lousy?”
“No,” said Harry loyally.
Hermione raised her eyebrows.
“Well, I suppose he could’ve played better,” Harry muttered, “but
it was only the first training session, like you said. . . .”
Neither Harry nor Ron seemed to make much headway with their
homework that night. Harry knew Ron was too preoccupied with
how badly he had performed at Quidditch practice and he himself
was having difficulty in getting the chant of “Gryffindor are losers” out
of his head.
They spent the whole of Sunday in the common room, buried in
their books while the room around them filled up, then emptied: It
was another clear, fine day and most of their fellow Gryffindors spent
the day out in the grounds, enjoying what might well be some of the
last sunshine that year. By the evening Harry felt as though somebody
had been beating his brain against the inside of his skull.
“You know, we probably should try and get more homework done
during the week,” Harry muttered to Ron, as they finally laid aside
Professor McGonagall’s long essay on the Inanimatus Conjurus spell
and turned miserably to Professor Sinistra’s equally long and difficult
essay about Jupiter’s moons.
“Yeah,” said Ron, rubbing slightly bloodshot eyes and throwing his
fifth spoiled bit of parchment into the fire beside them. “Listen . . .
shall we just ask Hermione if we can have a look at what she’s done?”
Harry glanced over at her; she was sitting with Crookshanks on her
lap and chatting merrily to Ginny as a pair of knitting needles flashed
in midair in front of her, now knitting a pair of shapeless elf socks.
“No,” he said heavily, “you know she won’t let us.”
And so they worked on while the sky outside the windows became
steadily darker; slowly, the crowd in the common room began to thin
again. At half-past eleven, Hermione wandered over to them,
yawning.
“Nearly done?”
“No,” said Ron shortly.
“Jupiter’s biggest moon is Ganymede, not Callisto,” she said,
pointing over Ron’s shoulder at a line in his Astronomy essay, “and it’s
Io that’s got the volcanos.”
“Thanks,” snarled Ron, scratching out the offending sentences.
“Sorry, I only —”
“Yeah, well, if you’ve just come over here to criticize —”
“Ron —”
“I haven’t got time to listen to a sermon, all right, Hermione, I’m
up to my neck in it here —”
“No — look!”
Hermione was pointing to the nearest window. Harry and Ron
both looked over. A handsome screech owl was standing on the windowsill, gazing into the room at Ron.
“Isn’t that Hermes?” said Hermione, sounding amazed.
“Blimey, it is!” said Ron quietly, throwing down his quill and getting to his feet. “What’s Percy writing to me for?”
He crossed to the window and opened it; Hermes flew inside,
landed upon Ron’s essay, and held out a leg to which a letter was attached. Ron took it off and the owl departed at once, leaving inky
footprints across Ron’s drawing of the moon Io.
“That’s definitely Percy’s handwriting,” said Ron, sinking back into
his chair and staring at the words on the outside of the scroll: To
Ronald Weasley, Gryffindor House, Hogwarts. He looked up at the other
two. “What d’you reckon?”
“Open it!” said Hermione eagerly. Harry nodded.
Ron unrolled the scroll and began to read. The farther down the
parchment his eyes traveled, the more pronounced became his scowl.
When he had finished reading, he looked disgusted. He thrust the letter at Harry and Hermione, who leaned toward each other to read it
together:
Dear Ron,
I have only just heard (from no less a person than the Minister
of Magic himself, who has it from your new teacher, Professor
Umbridge) that you have become a Hogwarts prefect.
I was most pleasantly surprised when I heard this news and
must firstly offer my congratulations. I must admit that I have always been afraid that you would take what we might call the
“Fred and George” route, rather than following in my footsteps, so
you can imagine my feelings on hearing you have stopped flouting
authority and have decided to shoulder some real responsibility.
But I want to give you more than congratulations, Ron, I
want to give you some advice, which is why I am sending this at
night rather than by the usual morning post. Hopefully you will
be able to read this away from prying eyes and avoid awkward
questions.
From something the Minister let slip when telling me you are
now a prefect, I gather that you are still seeing a lot of Harry Potter. I must tell you, Ron, that nothing could put you in danger of
losing your badge more than continued fraternization with that
boy. Yes, I am sure you are surprised to hear this — no doubt you
will say that Potter has always been Dumbledore’s favorite — but
I feel bound to tell you that Dumbledore may not be in charge at
Hogwarts much longer and the people who count have a very different — and probably more accurate — view of Potters behavior. I shall say no more here, but if you look at the Daily Prophet
tomorrow you will get a good idea of the way the wind is blowing — and see if you can spot yours truly!
Seriously, Ron, you do not want to be tarred with the same
brush as Potter, it could be very damaging to your future
prospects, and I am talking here about life after school too. As you
must be aware, given that our father escorted him to court, Potter had a disciplinary hearing this summer in front of the whole
Wizengamot and he did not come out of it looking too good. He
got off on a mere technicality if you ask me and many of the people I’ve spoken to remain convinced of his guilt.
It may be that you are afraid to sever ties with Potter — I
know that he can be unbalanced and, for all I know, violent —
but if you have any worries about this, or have spotted anything
else in Potter’s behavior that is troubling you, I urge you to speak
to Dolores Umbridge, a really delightful woman, who I know
will be only too happy to advise you.
This leads me to my other bit of advice. As I have hinted
above, Dumbledore’s regime at Hogwarts may soon be over. Your
loyalty, Ron, should be not to him, but to the school and the Ministry. I am very sorry to hear that so far Professor Umbridge is encountering very little cooperation from staff as she strives to make
those necessary changes within Hogwarts that the Ministry so ardently desires (although she should find this easier from next
week — again, see the Prophet tomorrow!). I shall say only this
— a student who shows himself willing to help Professor Umbridge now may be very well placed for Head Boyship in a couple
of years!
I am sorry that I was unable to see more of you over the summer. It pains me to criticize our parents, but I am afraid I can no
longer live under their roof while they remain mixed up with the
dangerous crowd around Dumbledore (if you are writing to
Mother at any point, you might tell her that a certain Sturgis
Podmore, who is a great friend of Dumbledore’s, has recently been
sent to Azkaban for trespass at the Ministry. Perhaps that will
open their eyes to the kind of petty criminals with whom they are
currently rubbing shoulders). I count myself very lucky to have escaped the stigma of association with such people — the Minister
really could not be more gracious to me — and I do hope, Ron,
that you will not allow family ties to blind you to the misguided
nature of our parents’ beliefs and actions either. I sincerely hope
that, in time, they will realize how mistaken they were and I
shall, of course, be ready to accept a full apology when that day
comes.
Please think over what I have said most carefully, particularly
the bit about Harry Potter, and congratulations again on becoming prefect.
Your brother, percy.
Harry looked up at Ron.
“Well,” he said, trying to sound as though he found the whole
thing a joke, “if you want to — er — what is it?” (He checked Percy’s
letter.) “Oh yeah — ‘sever ties’ with me, I swear I won’t get violent.”
“Give it back,” said Ron, holding out his hand. “He is —” Ron said
jerkily, tearing Percy’s letter in half, “the world’s” — he tore it into
quarters — “biggest” — he tore it into eighths — “git.” He threw the
pieces into the fire.
“Come on, we’ve got to get this finished some time before dawn,”
he said briskly to Harry, pulling Professor Sinistra’s essay back toward
him.
Hermione was looking at Ron with an odd expression on her face.
“Oh, give them here,” she said abruptly.
“What?” said Ron.
“Give them to me, I’ll look through them and correct them,” she
said.
“Are you serious? Ah, Hermione, you’re a lifesaver,” said Ron,
“what can I — ?”
“What you can say is, ‘We promise we’ll never leave our homework
this late again,’ ” she said, holding out both hands for their essays, but
she looked slightly amused all the same.
“Thanks a million, Hermione,” said Harry weakly, passing over his
essay and sinking back into his armchair, rubbing his eyes.
It was now past midnight and the common room was deserted but
for the three of them and Crookshanks. The only sound was that of
Hermione’s quill scratching out sentences here and there on their
essays and the ruffle of pages as she checked various facts in the reference books strewn across the table. Harry was exhausted. He also felt
an odd, sick, empty feeling in his stomach that had nothing to do
with tiredness and everything to do with the letter now curling
blackly in the heart of the fire.
He knew that half the people inside Hogwarts thought him
strange, even mad; he knew that the Daily Prophet had been making
snide allusions to him for months, but there was something about seeing it written down like that in Percy’s writing, about knowing that
Percy was advising Ron to drop him and even to tell tales on him to
Umbridge, that made his situation real to him as nothing else had. He
had known Percy for four years, had stayed in his house during the
summers, shared a tent with him during the Quidditch World Cup,
had even been awarded full marks by him in the second task of the
Triwizard Tournament last year, yet now, Percy thought him unbalanced and possibly violent.
And with a surge of sympathy for his godfather, Harry thought that
Sirius was probably the only person he knew who could really understand how he felt at the moment, because Sirius was in the same situation; nearly everyone in the Wizarding world thought Sirius a
dangerous murderer and a great Voldemort supporter and he had had
to live with that knowledge for fourteen years. . . .
Harry blinked. He had just seen something in the fire that could
not have been there. It had flashed into sight and vanished immediately. No . . . it could not have been. . . . He had imagined it because
he had been thinking about Sirius. . . .
“Okay, write that down,” Hermione said to Ron, pushing his essay
and a sheet covered in her own writing back to Ron, “and then copy
out this conclusion that I’ve written for you.”
“Hermione, you are honestly the most wonderful person I’ve ever
met,” said Ron weakly, “and if I’m ever rude to you again —”
“— I’ll know you’re back to normal,” said Hermione. “Harry,
yours is okay except for this bit at the end, I think you must have misheard Professor Sinistra, Europa’s covered in ice, not mice — Harry?”
Harry had slid off his chair onto his knees and was now crouching
on the singed and threadbare hearthrug, gazing into the flames.
“Er — Harry?” said Ron uncertainly. “Why are you down there?”
“Because I’ve just seen Sirius’s head in the fire,” said Harry.
He spoke quite calmly; after all, he had seen Sirius’s head in this
very fire the previous year and talked to it too. Nevertheless, he could
not be sure that he had really seen it this time. . . . It had vanished so
quickly. . . .
“Sirius’s head?” Hermione repeated. “You mean like when he
wanted to talk to you during the Triwizard Tournament? But he
wouldn’t do that now, it would be too — Sirius!”
She gasped, gazing at the fire; Ron dropped his quill. There in the
middle of the dancing flames sat Sirius’s head, long dark hair falling
around his grinning face.
“I was starting to think you’d go to bed before everyone else had
disappeared,” he said. “I’ve been checking every hour.”
“You’ve been popping into the fire every hour?” Harry said, half
laughing.
“Just for a few seconds to check if the coast was clear yet.”
“But what if you’d been seen?” said Hermione anxiously.
“Well, I think a girl — first year by the look of her — might’ve got
a glimpse of me earlier, but don’t worry,” Sirius said hastily, as
Hermione clapped a hand to her mouth. “I was gone the moment she
looked back at me and I’ll bet she just thought I was an oddly shaped
log or something.”
“But Sirius, this is taking an awful risk —” Hermione began.
“You sound like Molly,” said Sirius. “This was the only way I could
come up with of answering Harry’s letter without resorting to a
code — and codes are breakable.”
At the mention of Harry’s letter, Hermione and Ron had both
turned to stare at him.
“You didn’t say you’d written to Sirius!” said Hermione accusingly.
“I forgot,” said Harry, which was perfectly true; his meeting with
Cho in the Owlery had driven everything before it out of his mind.
“Don’t look at me like that, Hermione, there was no way anyone
would have got secret information out of it, was there, Sirius?”
“No, it was very good,” said Sirius, smiling. “Anyway, we’d better
be quick, just in case we’re disturbed — your scar.”
“What about — ?” Ron began, but Hermione said quickly, “We’ll
tell you afterward, go on, Sirius.”
“Well, I know it can’t be fun when it hurts, but we don’t think it’s
anything to really worry about. It kept aching all last year, didn’t it?”
“Yeah, and Dumbledore said it happened whenever Voldemort was
feeling a powerful emotion,” said Harry, ignoring, as usual, Ron and
Hermione’s winces. “So maybe he was just, I dunno, really angry or
something the night I had that detention.”
“Well, now he’s back it’s bound to hurt more often,” said Sirius.
“So you don’t think it had anything to do with Umbridge touching
me when I was in detention with her?” Harry asked.
“I doubt it,” said Sirius. “I know her by reputation and I’m sure
she’s no Death Eater —”
“She’s foul enough to be one,” said Harry darkly and Ron and
Hermione nodded vigorously in agreement.
“Yes, but the world isn’t split into good people and Death Eaters,”
said Sirius with a wry smile. “I know she’s a nasty piece of work,
though — you should hear Remus talk about her.”
“Does Lupin know her?” asked Harry quickly, remembering Umbridge’s comments about dangerous half-breeds during her first
lesson.
“No,” said Sirius, “but she drafted a bit of anti-werewolf legislation
two years ago that makes it almost impossible for him to get a job.”
Harry remembered how much shabbier Lupin looked these days
and his dislike of Umbridge deepened even further.
“What’s she got against werewolves?” said Hermione angrily.
“Scared of them, I expect,” said Sirius, smiling at her indignation.
“Apparently she loathes part-humans; she campaigned to have merpeople rounded up and tagged last year too. Imagine wasting your
time and energy persecuting merpeople when there are little toerags
like Kreacher on the loose —”
Ron laughed but Hermione looked upset.
“Sirius!” she said reproachfully. “Honestly, if you made a bit of an effort with Kreacher I’m sure he’d respond, after all, you are the only
member of his family he’s got left, and Professor Dumbledore said —”
“So what are Umbridge’s lessons like?” Sirius interrupted. “Is she
training you all to kill half-breeds?”
“No,” said Harry, ignoring Hermione’s affronted look at being cut
off in her defense of Kreacher. “She’s not letting us use magic at all!”
“All we do is read the stupid textbook,” said Ron.
“Ah, well, that figures,” said Sirius. “Our information from inside
the Ministry is that Fudge doesn’t want you trained in combat.”
“Trained in combat?” repeated Harry incredulously. “What does he
think we’re doing here, forming some sort of wizard army?”
“That’s exactly what he thinks you’re doing,” said Sirius, “or rather,
that’s exactly what he’s afraid Dumbledore’s doing — forming his
own private army, with which he will be able to take on the Ministry
of Magic.”
There was a pause at this, then Ron said, “That’s the stupidest
thing I’ve ever heard, including all the stuff that Luna Lovegood
comes out with.”
“So we’re being prevented from learning Defense Against the Dark
Arts because Fudge is scared we’ll use spells against the Ministry?” said
Hermione, looking furious.
“Yep,” said Sirius. “Fudge thinks Dumbledore will stop at nothing
to seize power. He’s getting more paranoid about Dumbledore by the
day. It’s a matter of time before he has Dumbledore arrested on some
trumped-up charge.”
This reminded Harry of Percy’s letter.
“D’you know if there’s going to be anything about Dumbledore in
the Daily Prophet tomorrow? Only Ron’s brother Percy reckons there
will be —”
“I don’t know,” said Sirius, “I haven’t seen anyone from the Order
all weekend, they’re all busy. It’s just been Kreacher and me here. . . .”
There was a definite note of bitterness in Sirius’s voice.
“So you haven’t had any news about Hagrid, either?”
“Ah . . .” said Sirius, “well, he was supposed to be back by now, no
one’s sure what’s happened to him.” Then, seeing their stricken faces,
he added quickly, “But Dumbledore’s not worried, so don’t you three
get yourselves in a state; I’m sure Hagrid’s fine.”
“But if he was supposed to be back by now . . .” said Hermione in
a small, worried voice.
“Madame Maxime was with him, we’ve been in touch with her and
she says they got separated on the journey home — but there’s nothing to suggest he’s hurt or — well, nothing to suggest he’s not perfectly
okay.”
Unconvinced, Harry, Ron, and Hermione exchanged worried
looks.
“Listen, don’t go asking too many questions about Hagrid,” said
Sirius hastily, “it’ll just draw even more attention to the fact that he’s
not back, and I know Dumbledore doesn’t want that. Hagrid’s tough,
he’ll be okay.” And when they did not appear cheered by this, Sirius
added, “When’s your next Hogsmeade weekend anyway? I was thinking, we got away with the dog disguise at the station, didn’t we? I
thought I could —”
“NO!” said Harry and Hermione together, very loudly.
“Sirius, didn’t you see the Daily Prophet?” said Hermione anxiously.
“Oh that,” said Sirius, grinning, “they’re always guessing where I
am, they haven’t really got a clue —”
“Yeah, but we think this time they have,” said Harry. “Something
Malfoy said on the train made us think he knew it was you, and his father was on the platform, Sirius — you know, Lucius Malfoy — so
don’t come up here, whatever you do, if Malfoy recognizes you
again —”
“All right, all right, I’ve got the point,” said Sirius. He looked most
displeased. “Just an idea, thought you might like to get together —”
“I would, I just don’t want you chucked back in Azkaban!” said
Harry.
There was a pause in which Sirius looked out of the fire at Harry, a
crease between his sunken eyes.
“You’re less like your father than I thought,” he said finally, a definite coolness in his voice. “The risk would’ve been what made it fun
for James.”
“Look —”
“Well, I’d better get going, I can hear Kreacher coming down the
stairs,” said Sirius, but Harry was sure he was lying. “I’ll write to tell
you a time I can make it back into the fire, then, shall I? If you can
stand to risk it?”
There was a tiny pop, and the place where Sirius’s head had been
was flickering flame once more.

C H A P T E R F I F T E E N
THE HOGWARTS HIGH INQUISITOR

They had expected to have to comb Hermione’s Daily Prophet
carefully next morning to find the article Percy had mentioned
in his letter. However, the departing delivery owl had barely cleared
the top of the milk jug when Hermione let out a huge gasp and flattened the newspaper to reveal a large photograph of Dolores Umbridge, smiling widely and blinking slowly at them from beneath the
headline:
MINISTRY SEEKS EDUCATIONAL REFORM
DOLORES UMBRIDGE APPOINTED FIRST-EVER “HIGH INQUISITOR”
“ ‘High Inquisitor’?” said Harry darkly, his half-eaten bit of toast
slipping from his fingers. “What does that mean?”
Hermione read aloud:
“In a surprise move last night the Ministry of Magic passed new legislation giving itself an unprecedented level of control at Hogwarts School of
Witchcraft and Wizardry.
“ ‘The Minister has been growing uneasy about goings-on at Hogwarts
for some time,’ said Junior Assistant to the Minister, Percy Weasley. ‘He is
now responding to concerns voiced by anxious parents, who feel the school
may be moving in a direction they do not approve.’
“This is not the first time in recent weeks Fudge has used new laws to
effect improvements at the Wizarding school. As recently as August 30th
Educational Decree Twenty-two was passed, to ensure that, in the event of
the current headmaster being unable to provide a candidate for a teaching
post, the Ministry should select an appropriate person.
“ ‘That’s how Dolores Umbridge came to be appointed to the teaching
staff at Hogwarts,’ said Weasley last night. ‘Dumbledore couldn’t find anyone, so the Minister put in Umbridge and of course, she’s been an immediate success —’ ”
“She’s been a WHAT?” said Harry loudly.
“Wait, there’s more,” said Hermione grimly.
“ ‘— an immediate success, totally revolutionizing the teaching of
Defense Against the Dark Arts and providing the Minister with on-theground feedback about what’s really happening at Hogwarts.’
“It is this last function that the Ministry has now formalized with the
passing of Educational Decree Twenty-three, which creates the new position of ‘Hogwarts High Inquisitor.’
“ ‘This is an exciting new phase in the Minister’s plan to get to grips
with what some are calling the “falling standards” at Hogwarts,’ said
Weasley. ‘The Inquisitor will have powers to inspect her fellow educators
and make sure that they are coming up to scratch. Professor Umbridge has
been offered this position in addition to her own teaching post, and we are
delighted to say that she has accepted.’
“The Ministry’s new moves have received enthusiastic support from
parents of students at Hogwarts.
“ ‘I feel much easier in my mind now that I know that Dumbledore is
being subjected to fair and objective evaluation,’ said Mr. Lucius Malfoy,
41, speaking from his Wiltshire mansion last night. ‘Many of us with our
children’s best interests at heart have been concerned about some of
Dumbledore’s eccentric decisions in the last few years and will be glad to
know that the Ministry is keeping an eye on the situation.’
“Among those ‘eccentric decisions’ are undoubtedly the controversial
staff appointments previously described in this newspaper, which have included the hiring of werewolf Remus Lupin, half giant Rubeus Hagrid,
and delusional ex-Auror ‘Mad-Eye’ Moody.
“Rumors abound, of course, that Albus Dumbledore, once Supreme
Mugwump of the International Confederation of Wizards and Chief
Warlock of the Wizengamot, is no longer up to the task of managing the
prestigious school of Hogwarts.
“ ‘I think the appointment of the Inquisitor is a first step toward ensuring that Hogwarts has a headmaster in whom we can all repose confidence,’
said a Ministry insider last night.
“Wizengamot elders Griselda Marchbanks and Tiberius Ogden have
resigned in protest at the introduction of the post of Inquisitor to Hogwarts.
“ ‘Hogwarts is a school, not an outpost of Cornelius Fudge’s office,’ said
Madam Marchbanks. ‘This is a further disgusting attempt to discredit Albus Dumbledore.’ (For a full account of Madam Marchbanks’ alleged
links to subversive goblin groups, turn to page 17).”
Hermione finished reading and looked across the table at the other
two.
“So now we know how we ended up with Umbridge! Fudge passed
this ‘Educational Decree’ and forced her on us! And now he’s given
her the power to inspect other teachers!” Hermione was breathing fast
and her eyes were very bright. “I can’t believe this. It’s outrageous. . . .”
“I know it is,” said Harry. He looked down at his right hand,
clenched upon the tabletop, and saw the faint white outline of the
words Umbridge had forced him to cut into his skin.
But a grin was unfurling on Ron’s face.
“What?” said Harry and Hermione together, staring at him.
“Oh, I can’t wait to see McGonagall inspected,” said Ron happily.
“Umbridge won’t know what’s hit her.”
“Well, come on,” said Hermione, jumping up, “we’d better get going, if she’s inspecting Binns’s class we don’t want to be late. . . .”
But Professor Umbridge was not inspecting their History of Magic
lesson, which was just as dull as the previous Monday, nor was she in
Snape’s dungeon when they arrived for double Potions, where Harry’s
moonstone essay was handed back to him with a large, spiky black D
scrawled in an upper corner.
“I have awarded you the grades you would have received if you presented this work in your O.W.L,” said Snape with a smirk, as he swept
among them, passing back their homework. “This should give you a
realistic idea of what to expect in your examination.”
Snape reached the front of the class and turned to face them.
“The general standard of this homework was abysmal. Most of you
would have failed had this been your examination. I expect to see a
great deal more effort for this week’s essay on the various varieties of
venom antidotes, or I shall have to start handing out detentions to
those dunces who get D’s.”
He smirked as Malfoy sniggered and said in a carrying whisper,
“Some people got D’s? Ha!”
Harry realized that Hermione was looking sideways to see what
grade he had received; he slid his moonstone essay back into his bag as
quickly as possible, feeling that he would rather keep that information
private.
Determined not to give Snape an excuse to fail him this lesson,
Harry read and reread every line of the instructions on the blackboard
at least three times before acting on them. His Strengthening Solution
was not precisely the clear turquoise shade of Hermione’s but it was at
least blue rather than pink, like Neville’s, and he delivered a flask of it
to Snape’s desk at the end of the lesson with a feeling of mingled defiance and relief.
“Well, that wasn’t as bad as last week, was it?” said Hermione, as
they climbed the steps out of the dungeon and made their way across
the entrance hall toward lunch. “And the homework didn’t go too
badly either, did it?”
When neither Ron nor Harry answered, she pressed on, “I mean,
all right, I didn’t expect the top grade, not if he’s marking to O.W.L.
standard, but a pass is quite encouraging at this stage, wouldn’t you
say?”
Harry made a noncommittal noise in his throat.
“Of course, a lot can happen between now and the exam, we’ve got
plenty of time to improve, but the grades we’re getting now are a sort
of baseline, aren’t they? Something we can build on . . .”
They sat down together at the Gryffindor table.
“Obviously, I’d have been thrilled if I’d gotten an O —”
“Hermione,” said Ron sharply, “if you want to know what grades
we got, ask.”
“I don’t — I didn’t mean — well, if you want to tell me —”
“I got a P,” said Ron, ladling soup into his bowl. “Happy?”
“Well, that’s nothing to be ashamed of,” said Fred, who had just arrived at the table with George and Lee Jordan and was sitting down on
Harry’s right. “Nothing wrong with a good healthy P.”
“But,” said Hermione, “doesn’t P stand for . . .”
“ ‘Poor,’ yeah,” said Lee Jordan. “Still, better than D, isn’t it?
‘Dreadful’?”
Harry felt his face grow warm and faked a small coughing fit over
his roll. When he emerged from this he was sorry to find that
Hermione was still in full flow about O.W.L. grades.
“So top grade’s O for ‘Outstanding,’ ” she was saying, “and then
there’s A —”
“No, E,” George corrected her, “E for ‘Exceeds Expectations.’ And
I’ve always thought Fred and I should’ve got E in everything, because
we exceeded expectations just by turning up for the exams.”
They all laughed except Hermione, who plowed on, “So after E, it’s
A for ‘Acceptable,’ and that’s the last pass grade, isn’t it?”
“Yep,” said Fred, dunking an entire roll in his soup, transferring it
to his mouth, and swallowing it whole.
“Then you get P for ‘Poor’ ” — Ron raised both his arms in mock
celebration — “and D for ‘Dreadful.’ ”
“And then T,” George reminded him.
“T?” asked Hermione, looking appalled. “Even lower than a D?
What on earth does that stand for?”
“ ‘Troll,’ ” said George promptly.
Harry laughed again, though he was not sure whether or not
George was joking. He imagined trying to conceal from Hermione
that he had received T’s in all his O.W.L.s and immediately resolved
to work harder from now on.
“You lot had an inspected lesson yet?” Fred asked them.
“No,” said Hermione at once, “have you?”
“Just now, before lunch,” said George. “Charms.”
“What was it like?” Harry and Hermione asked together.
Fred shrugged.
“Not that bad. Umbridge just lurked in the corner making notes on
a clipboard. You know what Flitwick’s like, he treated her like a guest,
didn’t seem to bother him at all. She didn’t say much. Asked Alicia a
couple of questions about what the classes are normally like, Alicia
told her they were really good, that was it.”
“I can’t see old Flitwick getting marked down,” said George, “he
usually gets everyone through their exams all right.”
“Who’ve you got this afternoon?” Fred asked Harry.
“Trelawney —”
“A T if ever I saw one —”
“— and Umbridge herself.”
“Well, be a good boy and keep your temper with Umbridge today,”
said George. “Angelina’ll do her nut if you miss any more Quidditch
practices.”
But Harry did not have to wait for Defense Against the Dark Arts
to meet Professor Umbridge. He was pulling out his dream diary in a
seat at the very back of the shadowy Divination room when Ron elbowed him in the ribs and, looking round, he saw Professor Umbridge
emerging through the trapdoor in the floor. The class, which had been
talking cheerily, fell silent at once. The abrupt fall in the noise level
made Professor Trelawney, who had been wafting about handing out
Dream Oracles, look round.
“Good afternoon, Professor Trelawney,” said Professor Umbridge
with her wide smile. “You received my note, I trust? Giving the time
and date of your inspection?”
Professor Trelawney nodded curtly and, looking very disgruntled,
turned her back on Professor Umbridge and continued to give out
books. Still smiling, Professor Umbridge grasped the back of the nearest armchair and pulled it to the front of the class so that it was a few
inches behind Professor Trelawney’s seat. She then sat down, took her
clipboard from her flowery bag, and looked up expectantly, waiting
for the class to begin.
Professor Trelawney pulled her shawls tight about her with slightly
trembling hands and surveyed the class through her hugely magnifying lenses. “We shall be continuing our study of prophetic dreams today,” she said in a brave attempt at her usual mystic tones, though her
voice shook slightly. “Divide into pairs, please, and interpret each
other’s latest nighttime visions with the aid of the Oracle.”
She made as though to sweep back to her seat, saw Professor Umbridge sitting right beside it, and immediately veered left toward Parvati and Lavender, who were already deep in discussion about Parvati’s
most recent dream.
Harry opened his copy of The Dream Oracle, watching Umbridge
covertly. She was making notes on her clipboard now. After a few minutes she got to her feet and began to pace the room in Trelawney’s
wake, listening to her conversations with students and posing questions here and there. Harry bent his head hurriedly over his book.
“Think of a dream, quick,” he told Ron, “in case the old toad
comes our way.”
“I did it last time,” Ron protested, “it’s your turn, you tell me one.”
“Oh, I dunno . . .” said Harry desperately, who could not remember dreaming anything at all over the last few days. “Let’s say I dreamed
I was . . . drowning Snape in my cauldron. Yeah, that’ll do. . . .”
Ron chortled as he opened his Dream Oracle.
“Okay, we’ve got to add your age to the date you had the dream, the
number of letters in the subject . . . would that be ‘drowning’ or ‘cauldron’ or ‘Snape’?”
“It doesn’t matter, pick any of them,” said Harry, chancing a glance
behind him. Professor Umbridge was now standing at Professor Trelawney’s shoulder making notes while the Divination teacher questioned Neville about his dream diary.
“What night did you dream this again?” Ron said, immersed in
calculations.
“I dunno, last night, whenever you like,” Harry told him, trying to
listen to what Umbridge was saying to Professor Trelawney. They were
only a table away from him and Ron now. Professor Umbridge was
making another note on her clipboard and Professor Trelawney was
looking extremely put out.
“Now,” said Umbridge, looking up at Trelawney, “you’ve been in
this post how long, exactly?”
Professor Trelawney scowled at her, arms crossed and shoulders
hunched as though wishing to protect herself as much as possible
from the indignity of the inspection. After a slight pause in which she
seemed to decide that the question was not so offensive that she could
reasonably ignore it, she said in a deeply resentful tone, “Nearly sixteen years.”
“Quite a period,” said Professor Umbridge, making a note on her
clipboard. “So it was Professor Dumbledore who appointed you?”
“That’s right,” said Professor Trelawney shortly.
Professor Umbridge made another note.
“And you are a great-great-granddaughter of the celebrated Seer
Cassandra Trelawney?”
“Yes,” said Professor Trelawney, holding her head a little higher.
Another note on the clipboard.
“But I think — correct me if I am mistaken — that you are the
first in your family since Cassandra to be possessed of second sight?”
“These things often skip — er — three generations,” said Professor
Trelawney.
Professor Umbridge’s toadlike smile widened.
“Of course,” she said sweetly, making yet another note. “Well, if
you could just predict something for me, then?”
She looked up inquiringly, still smiling. Professor Trelawney had
stiffened as though unable to believe her ears.
“I don’t understand you,” said Professor Trelawney, clutching convulsively at the shawl around her scrawny neck.
“I’d like you to make a prediction for me,” said Professor Umbridge
very clearly.
Harry and Ron were not the only people watching and listening
sneakily from behind their books now; most of the class were staring
transfixed at Professor Trelawney as she drew herself up to her full
height, her beads and bangles clinking.
“The Inner Eye does not See upon command!” she said in scandalized tones.
“I see,” said Professor Umbridge softly, making yet another note on
her clipboard.
“I — but — but . . . wait!” said Professor Trelawney suddenly, in
an attempt at her usual ethereal voice, though the mystical effect was
ruined somewhat by the way it was shaking with anger. “I . . . I think
I do see something . . . something that concerns you. . . . Why, I sense
something . . . something dark . . . some grave peril . . .”
Professor Trelawney pointed a shaking finger at Professor Umbridge who continued to smile blandly at her, eyebrows raised.
“I am afraid . . . I am afraid that you are in grave danger!” Professor
Trelawney finished dramatically.
There was a pause. Professor Umbridge’s eyebrows were still raised.
“Right,” she said softly, scribbling on her clipboard once more.
“Well, if that’s really the best you can do . . .”
She turned away, leaving Professor Trelawney standing rooted
to the spot, her chest heaving. Harry caught Ron’s eye and knew that
Ron was thinking exactly the same as he was: They both knew
that Professor Trelawney was an old fraud, but on the other hand,
they loathed Umbridge so much that they felt very much on Trelawney’s side — until she swooped down on them a few seconds
later, that was.
“Well?” she said, snapping her long fingers under Harry’s nose, uncharacteristically brisk. “Let me see the start you’ve made on your
dream diary, please.”
And by the time she had interpreted Harry’s dreams at the top of
her voice (all of which, even the ones that involved eating porridge,
apparently foretold a gruesome and early death), he was feeling much
less sympathetic toward her. All the while, Professor Umbridge stood
a few feet away, making notes on that clipboard, and when the bell
rang she descended the silver ladder first so that she was waiting for
them all when they reached their Defense Against the Dark Arts lesson ten minutes later.
She was humming and smiling to herself when they entered the
room. Harry and Ron told Hermione, who had been in Arithmancy,
exactly what had happened in Divination while they all took out their
copies of Defensive Magical Theory, but before Hermione could ask
any questions Professor Umbridge had called them all to order and silence fell.
“Wands away,” she instructed them all smilingly, and those people
who had been hopeful enough to take them out sadly returned them to
their bags. “As we finished chapter one last lesson, I would like you all to
turn to page nineteen today and commence chapter two, ‘Common Defensive Theories and Their Derivation.’ There will be no need to talk.”
Still smiling her wide, self-satisfied smile, she sat down at her desk.
The class gave an audible sigh as it turned, as one, to page nineteen.
Harry wondered dully whether there were enough chapters in the
book to keep them reading through all this year’s lessons and was on
the point of checking the contents when he noticed that Hermione
had her hand in the air again.
Professor Umbridge had noticed too, and what was more, she
seemed to have worked out a strategy for just such an eventuality. Instead of trying to pretend she had not noticed Hermione, she got to
her feet and walked around the front row of desks until they were
face-to-face, then she bent down and whispered, so that the rest of the
class could not hear, “What is it this time, Miss Granger?”
“I’ve already read chapter two,” said Hermione.
“Well then, proceed to chapter three.”
“I’ve read that too. I’ve read the whole book.”
Professor Umbridge blinked but recovered her poise almost
instantly.
“Well, then, you should be able to tell me what Slinkhard says
about counterjinxes in chapter fifteen.”
“He says that counterjinxes are improperly named,” said Hermione
promptly. “He says ‘counterjinx’ is just a name people give their jinxes
when they want to make them sound more acceptable.”
Professor Umbridge raised her eyebrows, and Harry knew she was
impressed against her will.
“But I disagree,” Hermione continued.
Professor Umbridge’s eyebrows rose a little higher and her gaze became distinctly colder.
“You disagree?”
“Yes, I do,” said Hermione, who, unlike Umbridge, was not whispering, but speaking in a clear, carrying voice that had by now attracted
the rest of the class’s attention. “Mr. Slinkhard doesn’t like jinxes, does
he? But I think they can be very useful when they’re used defensively.”
“Oh, you do, do you?” said Professor Umbridge, forgetting to
whisper and straightening up. “Well, I’m afraid it is Mr. Slinkhard’s
opinion, and not yours, that matters within this classroom, Miss
Granger.”
“But —” Hermione began.
“That is enough,” said Professor Umbridge. She walked back to the
front of the class and stood before them, all the jauntiness she had
shown at the beginning of the lesson gone. “Miss Granger, I am going
to take five points from Gryffindor House.”
There was an outbreak of muttering at this.
“What for?” said Harry angrily.
“Don’t you get involved!” Hermione whispered urgently to him.
“For disrupting my class with pointless interruptions,” said Professor Umbridge smoothly. “I am here to teach you using a Ministryapproved method that does not include inviting students to give their
opinions on matters about which they understand very little. Your previous teachers in this subject may have allowed you more license, but
as none of them — with the possible exception of Professor Quirrell,
who did at least appear to have restricted himself to age-appropriate
subjects — would have passed a Ministry inspection —”
“Yeah, Quirrell was a great teacher,” said Harry loudly, “there was
just that minor drawback of him having Lord Voldemort sticking out
of the back of his head.”
This pronouncement was followed by one of the loudest silences
Harry had ever heard. Then —
“I think another week’s detentions would do you some good, Mr.
Potter,” said Umbridge sleekly.
The cut on the back of Harry’s hand had barely healed and by the
following morning, it was bleeding again. He did not complain during the evening’s detention; he was determined not to give Umbridge
the satisfaction; over and over again he wrote I must not tell lies and not
a sound escaped his lips, though the cut deepened with every letter.
The very worst part of this second week’s worth of detentions was,
just as George had predicted, Angelina’s reaction. She cornered him
just as he arrived at the Gryffindor table for breakfast on Tuesday and
shouted so loudly that Professor McGonagall came sweeping down
upon the pair of them from the staff table.
“Miss Johnson, how dare you make such a racket in the Great Hall!
Five points from Gryffindor!”
“But Professor — he’s gone and landed himself in detention
again —”
“What’s this, Potter?” said Professor McGonagall sharply, rounding
on Harry. “Detention? From whom?”
“From Professor Umbridge,” muttered Harry, not meeting Professor McGonagall’s beady, square-framed eyes.
“Are you telling me,” she said, lowering her voice so that the group
of curious Ravenclaws behind them could not hear, “that after the
warning I gave you last Monday you lost your temper in Professor
Umbridge’s class again?”
“Yes,” Harry muttered, speaking to the floor.
“Potter, you must get a grip on yourself! You are heading for serious trouble! Another five points from Gryffindor!”
“But — what? Professor, no!” Harry said, furious at this injustice.
“I’m already being punished by her, why do you have to take points as
well?”
“Because detentions do not appear to have any effect on you what-
soever!” said Professor McGonagall tartly. “No, not another word of
complaint, Potter! And as for you, Miss Johnson, you will confine
your shouting matches to the Quidditch pitch in future or risk losing
the team Captaincy!”
She strode back toward the staff table. Angelina gave Harry a look
of deepest disgust and stalked away, upon which Harry flung himself
onto the bench beside Ron, fuming.
“She’s taken points off Gryffindor because I’m having my hand
sliced open every night! How is that fair, how?”
“I know, mate,” said Ron sympathetically, tipping bacon onto
Harry’s plate, “she’s bang out of order.”
Hermione, however, merely rustled the pages of her Daily Prophet
and said nothing.
“You think McGonagall was right, do you?” said Harry angrily to
the picture of Cornelius Fudge obscuring Hermione’s face.
“I wish she hadn’t taken points from you, but I think she’s right to
warn you not to lose your temper with Umbridge,” said Hermione’s
voice, while Fudge gesticulated forcefully from the front page, clearly
giving some kind of speech.
Harry did not speak to Hermione all through Charms, but when
they entered Transfiguration he forgot his anger; Professor Umbridge
and her clipboard were sitting in a corner and the sight of her drove
the memory of breakfast right out of his head.
“Excellent,” whispered Ron, as they sat down in their usual seats.
“Let’s see Umbridge get what she deserves.”
Professor McGonagall marched into the room without giving the
slightest indication that she knew Professor Umbridge was there.
“That will do,” she said and silence fell immediately. “Mr. Finnigan, kindly come here and hand back the homework — Miss Brown,
please take this box of mice — don’t be silly, girl, they won’t hurt
you — and hand one to each student —”
“Hem, hem,” said Professor Umbridge, employing the same silly
little cough she had used to interrupt Dumbledore on the first night
of term. Professor McGonagall ignored her. Seamus handed back
Harry’s essay; Harry took it without looking at him and saw, to his
relief, that he had managed an A.
“Right then, everyone, listen closely — Dean Thomas, if you do
that to the mouse again I shall put you in detention — most of you
have now successfully vanished your snails and even those who were
left with a certain amount of shell have the gist of the spell. Today we
shall be —”
“Hem, hem,” said Professor Umbridge.
“Yes?” said Professor McGonagall, turning round, her eyebrows so
close together they seemed to form one long, severe line.
“I was just wondering, Professor, whether you received my note
telling you of the date and time of your inspec —”
“Obviously I received it, or I would have asked you what you are
doing in my classroom,” said Professor McGonagall, turning her back
firmly on Professor Umbridge. Many of the students exchanged looks
of glee. “As I was saying, today we shall be practicing the altogether
more difficult vanishment of mice. Now, the Vanishing Spell —”
“Hem, hem.”
“I wonder,” said Professor McGonagall in cold fury, turning on
Professor Umbridge, “how you expect to gain an idea of my usual
teaching methods if you continue to interrupt me? You see, I do not
generally permit people to talk when I am talking.”
Professor Umbridge looked as though she had just been slapped in
the face. She did not speak, but straightened the parchment on her
clipboard and began scribbling furiously. Looking supremely unconcerned, Professor McGonagall addressed the class once more.
“As I was saying, the Vanishing Spell becomes more difficult with
the complexity of the animal to be vanished. The snail, as an invertebrate, does not present much of a challenge; the mouse, as a mammal,
offers a much greater one. This is not, therefore, magic you can accomplish with your mind on your dinner. So — you know the incantation,
let me see what you can do. . . .”
“How she can lecture me about not losing my temper with
Umbridge!” Harry said to Ron under his voice, but he was grinning;
his anger with Professor McGonagall had quite evaporated.
Professor Umbridge did not follow Professor McGonagall around
the class as she had followed Professor Trelawney; perhaps she thought
that Professor McGonagall would not permit it. She did, however,
take many more notes while she sat in her corner, and when Professor
McGonagall finally told them all to pack away, rose with a grim expression on her face.
“Well, it’s a start,” said Ron, holding up a long, wriggling mouse
tail and dropping it back into the box Lavender was passing around.
As they filed out of the classroom, Harry saw Professor Umbridge
approach the teacher’s desk; he nudged Ron, who nudged Hermione
in turn, and the three of them deliberately fell back to eavesdrop.
“How long have you been teaching at Hogwarts?” Professor Umbridge asked.
“Thirty-nine years this December,” said Professor McGonagall
brusquely, snapping her bag shut.
Professor Umbridge made a note.
“Very well,” she said, “you will receive the results of your inspection
in ten days’ time.”
“I can hardly wait,” said Professor McGonagall in a coldly indifferent voice, and she strode off toward the door. “Hurry up, you three,”
she added, sweeping Harry, Ron, and Hermione before her. Harry
could not help giving her a faint smile and could have sworn he received one in return.
He had thought that the next time he would see Umbridge would
be in his detention that evening, but he was wrong. When they walked
down the lawns toward the forest for Care of Magical Creatures, they
found her and her clipboard waiting for them beside Professor
Grubbly-Plank.
“You do not usually take this class, is that correct?” Harry heard her
ask as they arrived at the trestle table where the group of captive
bowtruckles were scrabbling around for wood lice like so many living
twigs.
“Quite correct,” said Professor Grubbly-Plank, hands behind her
back and bouncing on the balls of her feet. “I am a substitute teacher
standing in for Professor Hagrid.”
Harry exchanged uneasy looks with Ron and Hermione. Malfoy
was whispering with Crabbe and Goyle; he would surely love this opportunity to tell tales on Hagrid to a member of the Ministry.
“Hmm,” said Professor Umbridge, dropping her voice, though
Harry could still hear her quite clearly, “I wonder — the headmaster
seems strangely reluctant to give me any information on the matter —
can you tell me what is causing Professor Hagrid’s very extended leave
of absence?”
Harry saw Malfoy look up eagerly.
“ ’Fraid I can’t,” said Professor Grubbly-Plank breezily. “Don’t
know anything more about it than you do. Got an owl from Dumbledore, would I like a couple of weeks teaching work, accepted — that’s
as much as I know. Well . . . shall I get started then?”
“Yes, please do,” said Professor Umbridge, scribbling upon her
clipboard.
Umbridge took a different tack in this class and wandered among
the students, questioning them on magical creatures. Most people
were able to answer well and Harry’s spirits lifted somewhat; at least
the class was not letting Hagrid down.
“Overall,” said Professor Umbridge, returning to Professor GrubblyPlank’s side after a lengthy interrogation of Dean Thomas, “how do
you, as a temporary member of staff — an objective outsider, I suppose
you might say — how do you find Hogwarts? Do you feel you receive
enough support from the school management?”
“Oh, yes, Dumbledore’s excellent,” said Professor Grubbly-Plank
heartily. “No, I’m very happy with the way things are run, very happy
indeed.”
Looking politely incredulous, Umbridge made a tiny note on her
clipboard and went on, “And what are you planning to cover with this
class this year — assuming, of course, that Professor Hagrid does not
return?”
“Oh, I’ll take them through the creatures that most often come up
in O.W.L.,” said Professor Grubbly-Plank. “Not much left to do —
they’ve studied unicorns and nifflers, I thought we’d cover porlocks and
kneazles, make sure they can recognize crups and knarls, you know. . . .”
“Well, you seem to know what you’re doing, at any rate,” said Professor Umbridge, making a very obvious tick on her clipboard. Harry
did not like the emphasis she put on “you” and liked it even less when
she put her next question to Goyle: “Now, I hear there have been injuries in this class?”
Goyle gave a stupid grin. Malfoy hastened to answer the question.
“That was me,” he said. “I was slashed by a hippogriff.”
“A hippogriff?” said Professor Umbridge, now scribbling frantically.
“Only because he was too stupid to listen to what Hagrid told him
to do,” said Harry angrily.
Both Ron and Hermione groaned. Professor Umbridge turned her
head slowly in Harry’s direction.
“Another night’s detention, I think,” she said softly. “Well, thank
you very much, Professor Grubbly-Plank, I think that’s all I need
here. You will be receiving the results of your inspection within ten
days.”
“Jolly good,” said Professor Grubbly-Plank, and Professor Umbridge set off back across the lawn to the castle.
It was nearly midnight when Harry left Umbridge’s office that night,
his hand now bleeding so severely that it was staining the scarf he had
wrapped around it. He expected the common room to be empty when
he returned, but Ron and Hermione had sat up waiting for him. He
was pleased to see them, especially as Hermione was disposed to be
sympathetic rather than critical.
“Here,” she said anxiously, pushing a small bowl of yellow liquid
toward him, “soak your hand in that, it’s a solution of strained and
pickled murtlap tentacles, it should help.”
Harry placed his bleeding, aching hand into the bowl and experienced a wonderful feeling of relief. Crookshanks curled around his
legs, purring loudly, and then leapt into his lap and settled down.
“Thanks,” he said gratefully, scratching behind Crookshanks’s ears
with his left hand.
“I still reckon you should complain about this,” said Ron in a low
voice.
“No,” said Harry flatly.
“McGonagall would go nuts if she knew —”
“Yeah, she probably would,” said Harry. “And how long d’you
reckon it’d take Umbridge to pass another Decree saying anyone who
complains about the High Inquisitor gets sacked immediately?”
Ron opened his mouth to retort but nothing came out and after a
moment he closed it again in a defeated sort of way.
“She’s an awful woman,” said Hermione in a small voice. “Awful.
You know, I was just saying to Ron when you came in . . . we’ve got to
do something about her.”
“I suggested poison,” said Ron grimly.
“No . . . I mean, something about what a dreadful teacher she is,
and how we’re not going to learn any defense from her at all,” said
Hermione.
“Well, what can we do about that?” said Ron, yawning. “ ’S too late,
isn’t it? She got the job, she’s here to stay, Fudge’ll make sure of that.”
“Well,” said Hermione tentatively. “You know, I was thinking today. . . .” She shot a slightly nervous look at Harry and then plunged on,
“I was thinking that — maybe the time’s come when we should just —
just do it ourselves.”
“Do what ourselves?” said Harry suspiciously, still floating his hand
in the essence of murtlap tentacles.
“Well — learn Defense Against the Dark Arts ourselves,” said Hermione.
“Come off it,” groaned Ron. “You want us to do extra work? D’you
realize Harry and I are behind on homework again and it’s only the
second week?”
“But this is much more important than homework!” said Hermione.
Harry and Ron goggled at her.
“I didn’t think there was anything in the universe more important
than homework,” said Ron.
“Don’t be silly, of course there is!” said Hermione, and Harry saw,
with an ominous feeling, that her face was suddenly alight with the
kind of fervor that S.P.E.W. usually inspired in her. “It’s about preparing ourselves, like Harry said in Umbridge’s first lesson, for what’s
waiting out there. It’s about making sure we really can defend ourselves. If we don’t learn anything for a whole year —”
“We can’t do much by ourselves,” said Ron in a defeated voice. “I
mean, all right, we can go and look jinxes up in the library and try and
practice them, I suppose —”
“No, I agree, we’ve gone past the stage where we can just learn
things out of books,” said Hermione. “We need a teacher, a proper
one, who can show us how to use the spells and correct us if we’re going wrong.”
“If you’re talking about Lupin . . .” Harry began.
“No, no, I’m not talking about Lupin,” said Hermione. “He’s too
busy with the Order and anyway, the most we could see him is during
Hogsmeade weekends and that’s not nearly often enough.”
“Who, then?” said Harry, frowning at her.
Hermione heaved a very deep sigh.
“Isn’t it obvious?” she said. “I’m talking about you, Harry.”
There was a moment’s silence. A light night breeze rattled the windowpanes behind Ron and the fire guttered.
“About me what?” said Harry.
“I’m talking about you teaching us Defense Against the Dark Arts.”
Harry stared at her. Then he turned to Ron, ready to exchange the
exasperated looks they sometimes shared when Hermione elaborated
on far-fetched schemes like S.P.E.W. To Harry’s consternation, however, Ron did not look exasperated. He was frowning slightly, apparently thinking. Then he said, “That’s an idea.”
“What’s an idea?” said Harry.
“You,” said Ron. “Teaching us to do it.”
“But . . .”
Harry was grinning now, sure the pair of them were pulling his leg.
“But I’m not a teacher, I can’t —”
“Harry, you’re the best in the year at Defense Against the Dark
Arts,” said Hermione.
“Me?” said Harry, now grinning more broadly than ever. “No I’m
not, you’ve beaten me in every test —”
“Actually, I haven’t,” said Hermione coolly. “You beat me in our
third year — the only year we both sat the test and had a teacher who
actually knew the subject. But I’m not talking about test results,
Harry. Look what you’ve done!”
“How d’you mean?”
“You know what, I’m not sure I want someone this stupid teaching
me,” Ron said to Hermione, smirking slightly. He turned to Harry.
“Let’s think,” he said, pulling a face like Goyle concentrating. “Uh . . .
first year — you saved the Stone from You-Know-Who.”
“But that was luck,” said Harry, “that wasn’t skill —”
“Second year,” Ron interrupted, “you killed the basilisk and destroyed Riddle.”
“Yeah, but if Fawkes hadn’t turned up I —”
“Third year,” said Ron, louder still, “you fought off about a hundred dementors at once —”
“You know that was a fluke, if the Time-Turner hadn’t —”
“Last year,” Ron said, almost shouting now, “you fought off YouKnow-Who again —”
“Listen to me!” said Harry, almost angrily, because Ron and
Hermione were both smirking now. “Just listen to me, all right? It
sounds great when you say it like that, but all that stuff was luck — I
didn’t know what I was doing half the time, I didn’t plan any of it, I
just did whatever I could think of, and I nearly always had help —”
Ron and Hermione were still smirking and Harry felt his temper
rise; he wasn’t even sure why he was feeling so angry.
“Don’t sit there grinning like you know better than I do, I was
there, wasn’t I?” he said heatedly. “I know what went on, all right? And
I didn’t get through any of that because I was brilliant at Defense
Against the Dark Arts, I got through it all because — because help
came at the right time, or because I guessed right — but I just blundered through it all, I didn’t have a clue what I was doing — STOP
LAUGHING!”
The bowl of murtlap essence fell to the floor and smashed. He became aware that he was on his feet, though he couldn’t remember
standing up. Crookshanks streaked away under a sofa; Ron and
Hermione’s smiles had vanished.
“You don’t know what it’s like! You — neither of you — you’ve never
had to face him, have you? You think it’s just memorizing a bunch of
spells and throwing them at him, like you’re in class or something?
The whole time you know there’s nothing between you and dying except your own — your own brain or guts or whatever — like you can
think straight when you know you’re about a second from being murdered, or tortured, or watching your friends die — they’ve never
taught us that in their classes, what it’s like to deal with things like
that — and you two sit there acting like I’m a clever little boy to be
standing here, alive, like Diggory was stupid, like he messed up —
you just don’t get it, that could just as easily have been me, it would
have been if Voldemort hadn’t needed me —”
“We weren’t saying anything like that, mate,” said Ron, looking
aghast. “We weren’t having a go at Diggory, we didn’t — you’ve got
the wrong end of the —”
He looked helplessly at Hermione, whose face was stricken.
“Harry,” she said timidly, “don’t you see? This . . . this is exactly
why we need you. . . . We need to know what it’s r-really like . . . facing him . . . facing V-Voldemort.”
It was the first time she had ever said Voldemort’s name, and it was
this, more than anything else, that calmed Harry. Still breathing hard,
he sank back into his chair, becoming aware as he did so that his hand
was throbbing horribly again. He wished he had not smashed the
bowl of murtlap essence.
“Well . . . think about it,” said Hermione quietly. “Please?”
Harry could not think of anything to say. He was feeling ashamed
of his outburst already. He nodded, hardly aware of what he was
agreeing to.
Hermione stood up.
“Well, I’m off to bed,” she said in a voice that was clearly as natural
as she could make it. “Erm . . . ’night.”
Ron had gotten to his feet too.
“Coming?” he said awkwardly to Harry.
“Yeah,” said Harry. “In . . . in a minute. I’ll just clear this up.”
He indicated the smashed bowl on the floor. Ron nodded and left.
“Reparo,” Harry muttered, pointing his wand at the broken pieces
 of china. They flew back together, good as new, but there was no returning the murtlap essence to the bowl.
He was suddenly so tired that he was tempted to sink back into his
armchair and sleep there, but instead he got to his feet and followed
Ron upstairs. His restless night was punctuated once more by dreams
of long corridors and locked doors, and he awoke next day with his
scar prickling again.

C H A P T E R S I X T E E N
IN THE HOG’S HEAD

Hermione made no mention of Harry giving Defense Against
the Dark Arts lessons for two whole weeks after her original
suggestion. Harry’s detentions with Umbridge were finally over (he
doubted whether the words now etched on the back of his hand
would ever fade entirely); Ron had had four more Quidditch practices
and not been shouted at during the last two; and all three of them had
managed to vanish their mice in Transfiguration (Hermione had actually progressed to vanishing kittens), before the subject was broached
again, on a wild, blustery evening at the end of September, when the
three of them were sitting in the library, looking up potion ingredients
for Snape.
“I was wondering,” Hermione said suddenly, “whether you’d
thought any more about Defense Against the Dark Arts, Harry.”
“ ’Course I have,” said Harry grumpily. “Can’t forget it, can we,
with that hag teaching us —”
“I meant the idea Ron and I had” — Ron cast her an alarmed,
threatening kind of look; she frowned at him — “oh, all right, the
idea I had, then — about you teaching us.”
Harry did not answer at once. He pretended to be perusing a page
of Asiatic Anti-Venoms, because he did not want to say what was in his
mind.
The fact was that he had given the matter a great deal of thought
over the past fortnight. Sometimes it seemed an insane idea, just as it
had on the night Hermione had proposed it, but at others, he had
found himself thinking about the spells that had served him best in his
various encounters with Dark creatures and Death Eaters — found
himself, in fact, subconsciously planning lessons. . . .
“Well,” he said slowly, when he could not pretend to find Asiatic
anti-venoms interesting much longer, “yeah, I — I’ve thought about
it a bit.”
“And?” said Hermione eagerly.
“I dunno,” said Harry, playing for time. He looked up at Ron.
“I thought it was a good idea from the start,” said Ron, who
seemed keener to join in this conversation now that he was sure that
Harry was not going to start shouting again.
Harry shifted uncomfortably in his chair.
“You did listen to what I said about a load of it being luck, didn’t
you?”
“Yes, Harry,” said Hermione gently, “but all the same, there’s no
point pretending that you’re not good at Defense Against the Dark
Arts, because you are. You were the only person last year who could
throw off the Imperius Curse completely, you can produce a Patronus,
you can do all sorts of stuff that full-grown wizards can’t, Viktor always said —”
Ron looked around at her so fast he appeared to crick his neck; rubbing it, he said, “Yeah? What did Vicky say?”
“Ho ho,” said Hermione in a bored voice. “He said Harry knew
how to do stuff even he didn’t, and he was in the final year at
Durmstrang.”
Ron was looking at Hermione suspiciously.
“You’re not still in contact with him, are you?”
“So what if I am?” said Hermione coolly, though her face was a little pink. “I can have a pen pal if I —”
“He didn’t only want to be your pen pal,” said Ron accusingly.
Hermione shook her head exasperatedly and, ignoring Ron, who
was continuing to watch her, said to Harry, “Well, what do you think?
Will you teach us?”
“Just you and Ron, yeah?”
“Well,” said Hermione, now looking a mite anxious again. “Well
. . . now, don’t fly off the handle again, Harry, please. . . . But I really
think you ought to teach anyone who wants to learn. I mean, we’re
talking about defending ourselves against V-Voldemort — oh, don’t
be pathetic, Ron — it doesn’t seem fair if we don’t offer the chance to
other people.”
Harry considered this for a moment, then said, “Yeah, but I doubt
anyone except you two would want to be taught by me. I’m a nutter,
remember?”
“Well, I think you might be surprised how many people would be
interested in hearing what you’ve got to say,” said Hermione seriously.
“Look,” she leaned toward him; Ron, who was still watching her with
a frown on his face, leaned forward to listen too, “you know the first
weekend in October’s a Hogsmeade weekend? How would it be if we
tell anyone who’s interested to meet us in the village and we can talk
it over?”
“Why do we have to do it outside school?” said Ron.
“Because,” said Hermione, returning to the diagram of the Chinese
Chomping Cabbage she was copying, “I don’t think Umbridge would
be very happy if she found out what we were up to.”
Harry had been looking forward to the weekend trip into Hogsmeade, but there was one thing worrying him. Sirius had maintained
a stony silence since he had appeared in the fire at the beginning of
September; Harry knew they had made him angry by saying that they
did not want him to come — but he still worried from time to time
that Sirius might throw caution to the winds and turn up anyway.
What were they going to do if the great black dog came bounding up
the street toward them in Hogsmeade, perhaps under the nose of
Draco Malfoy?
“Well, you can’t blame him for wanting to get out and about,” said
Ron, when Harry discussed his fears with him and Hermione. “I
mean, he’s been on the run for over two years, hasn’t he, and I know
that can’t have been a laugh, but at least he was free, wasn’t he? And
now he’s just shut up all the time with that lunatic elf.”
Hermione scowled at Ron, but otherwise ignored the slight on
Kreacher.
“The trouble is,” she said to Harry, “until V-Voldemort — oh for
heaven’s sake, Ron — comes out into the open, Sirius is going to have
to stay hidden, isn’t he? I mean, the stupid Ministry isn’t going to realize Sirius is innocent until they accept that Dumbledore’s been
telling the truth about him all along. And once the fools start catching real Death Eaters again it’ll be obvious Sirius isn’t one . . . I mean,
he hasn’t got the Mark, for one thing.”
“I don’t reckon he’d be stupid enough to turn up,” said Ron bracingly. “Dumbledore’d go mad if he did and Sirius listens to Dumbledore even if he doesn’t like what he hears.”
When Harry continued to look worried, Hermione said, “Listen,
Ron and I have been sounding out people who we thought might
want to learn some proper Defense Against the Dark Arts, and there
are a couple who seem interested. We’ve told them to meet us in
Hogsmeade.”
“Right,” said Harry vaguely, his mind still on Sirius.
“Don’t worry, Harry,” Hermione said quietly. “You’ve got enough
on your plate without Sirius too.”
She was quite right, of course; he was barely keeping up with his
homework, though he was doing much better now that he was no
longer spending every evening in detention with Umbridge. Ron was
even further behind with his work than Harry, because while they
both had Quidditch practices twice a week, Ron also had prefect duties. However, Hermione, who was taking more subjects than either of
them, had not only finished all her homework but was also finding
time to knit more elf clothes. Harry had to admit that she was getting
better; it was now almost always possible to distinguish between the
hats and the socks.
The morning of the Hogsmeade visit dawned bright but windy. After breakfast they queued up in front of Filch, who matched their
names to the long list of students who had permission from their parents or guardian to visit the village. With a slight pang, Harry remembered that if it hadn’t been for Sirius, he would not have been
going at all.
When Harry reached Filch, the caretaker gave a great sniff as
though trying to detect a whiff of something from Harry. Then he
gave a curt nod that set his jowls aquiver again and Harry walked on,
out onto the stone steps and the cold, sunlit day.
“Er — why was Filch sniffing you?” asked Ron, as he, Harry, and
Hermione set off at a brisk pace down the wide drive to the gates.
“I suppose he was checking for the smell of Dungbombs,” said
Harry with a small laugh. “I forgot to tell you . . .”
And he recounted the story of sending his letter to Sirius and Filch
bursting in seconds later, demanding to see the letter. To his slight surprise, Hermione found this story highly interesting, much more, indeed, than he did himself.
“He said he was tipped off you were ordering Dungbombs? But
who had tipped him off?”
“I dunno,” said Harry, shrugging. “Maybe Malfoy, he’d think it was
a laugh.”
They walked between the tall stone pillars topped with winged
boars and turned left onto the road into the village, the wind whipping their hair into their eyes.
“Malfoy?” said Hermione, very skeptically. “Well . . . yes . . .
maybe . . .”
And she remained deep in thought all the way into the outskirts of
Hogsmeade.
“Where are we going anyway?” Harry asked. “The Three Broomsticks?”
“Oh — no,” said Hermione, coming out of her reverie, “no, it’s always packed and really noisy. I’ve told the others to meet us in the
Hog’s Head, that other pub, you know the one, it’s not on the main
road. I think it’s a bit . . . you know . . . dodgy . . . but students don’t
normally go in there, so I don’t think we’ll be overheard.”
They walked down the main street past Zonko’s Joke Shop, where
they were unsurprised to see Fred, George, and Lee Jordan, past the
post office, from which owls issued at regular intervals, and turned up
a side street at the top of which stood a small inn. A battered wooden
sign hung from a rusty bracket over the door, with a picture upon it of
a wild boar’s severed head leaking blood onto the white cloth around
it. The sign creaked in the wind as they approached. All three of them
hesitated outside the door.
“Well, come on,” said Hermione slightly nervously. Harry led the
way inside.
It was not at all like the Three Broomsticks, whose large bar gave an
impression of gleaming warmth and cleanliness. The Hog’s Head bar
comprised one small, dingy, and very dirty room that smelled strongly
of something that might have been goats. The bay windows were so
encrusted with grime that very little daylight could permeate the
room, which was lit instead with the stubs of candles sitting on rough
wooden tables. The floor seemed at first glance to be earthy, though as
Harry stepped onto it he realized that there was stone beneath what
seemed to be the accumulated filth of centuries.
Harry remembered Hagrid mentioning this pub in his first year:
“Yeh get a lot o’ funny folk in the Hog’s Head,” he had said, explaining
how he had won a dragons egg from a hooded stranger there. At the
time Harry had wondered why Hagrid had not found it odd that the
stranger kept his face hidden throughout their encounter; now he saw
that keeping your face hidden was something of a fashion in the Hog’s
Head. There was a man at the bar whose whole head was wrapped in
dirty gray bandages, though he was still managing to gulp endless
glasses of some smoking, fiery substance through a slit over his mouth.
Two figures shrouded in hoods sat at a table in one of the windows;
Harry might have thought them dementors if they had not been talking in strong Yorkshire accents; in a shadowy corner beside the fireplace
sat a witch with a thick, black veil that fell to her toes. They could just
see the tip of her nose because it caused the veil to protrude slightly.
“I don’t know about this, Hermione,” Harry muttered, as they
crossed to the bar. He was looking particularly at the heavily veiled
witch. “Has it occurred to you Umbridge might be under that?”
Hermione cast an appraising eye at the veiled figure.
“Umbridge is shorter than that woman,” she said quietly. “And
anyway, even if Umbridge does come in here there’s nothing she can
do to stop us, Harry, because I’ve double- and triple-checked the
school rules. We’re not out-of-bounds; I specifically asked Professor
Flitwick whether students were allowed to come in the Hog’s Head,
and he said yes, but he advised me strongly to bring our own glasses.
And I’ve looked up everything I can think of about study groups and
homework groups and they’re definitely allowed. I just don’t think it’s
a good idea if we parade what we’re doing.”
“No,” said Harry dryly, “especially as it’s not exactly a homework
group you’re planning, is it?”
The barman sidled toward them out of a back room. He was a
grumpy-looking old man with a great deal of long gray hair and
beard. He was tall and thin and looked vaguely familiar to Harry.
“What?” he grunted.
“Three butterbeers, please,” said Hermione.
The man reached beneath the counter and pulled up three very
dusty, very dirty bottles, which he slammed on the bar.
“Six Sickles,” he said.
“I’ll get them,” said Harry quickly, passing over the silver. The barman’s eyes traveled over Harry, resting for a fraction of a second on his
scar. Then he turned away and deposited Harry’s money in an ancient
wooden till whose drawer slid open automatically to receive it. Harry,
Ron, and Hermione retreated to the farthest table from the bar and
sat down, looking around, while the man in the dirty gray bandages
rapped the counter with his knuckles and received another smoking
drink from the barman.
“You know what?” Ron murmured, looking over at the bar with
enthusiasm. “We could order anything we liked in here, I bet that
bloke would sell us anything, he wouldn’t care. I’ve always wanted to
try firewhisky —”
“You — are — a — prefect,” snarled Hermione.
“Oh,” said Ron, the smile fading from his face. “Yeah . . .”
“So who did you say is supposed to be meeting us?” Harry asked,
wrenching open the rusty top of his butterbeer and taking a swig.
“Just a couple of people,” Hermione repeated, checking her watch
and then looking anxiously toward the door. “I told them to be here
about now and I’m sure they all know where it is — oh look, this
might be them now —”
The door of the pub had opened. A thick band of dusty sunlight
split the room in two for a moment and then vanished, blocked by the
incoming rush of a crowd of people.
First came Neville with Dean and Lavender, who were closely followed by Parvati and Padma Patil with (Harry’s stomach did a back
flip) Cho and one of her usually giggling girlfriends, then (on her own
and looking so dreamy that she might have walked in by accident)
Luna Lovegood; then Katie Bell, Alicia Spinnet, and Angelina Johnson, Colin and Dennis Creevey, Ernie Macmillan, Justin FinchFletchley, Hannah Abbott, and a Hufflepuff girl with a long plait
down her back whose name Harry did not know; three Ravenclaw
boys he was pretty sure were called Anthony Goldstein, Michael Corner, and Terry Boot; Ginny, followed by a tall skinny blond boy with
an upturned nose whom Harry recognized vaguely as being a member
of the Hufflepuff Quidditch team, and bringing up the rear, Fred and
George Weasley with their friend Lee Jordan, all three of whom were
carrying large paper bags crammed with Zonko’s merchandise.
“A couple of people?” said Harry hoarsely to Hermione. “A couple
of people?”
“Yes, well, the idea seemed quite popular,” said Hermione happily.
“Ron, do you want to pull up some more chairs?”
The barman had frozen in the act of wiping out a glass with a rag
so filthy it looked as though it had never been washed. Possibly he had
never seen his pub so full.
“Hi,” said Fred, reaching the bar first and counting his companions
quickly. “Could we have . . . twenty-five butterbeers, please?”
The barman glared at him for a moment, then, throwing down
his rag irritably as though he had been interrupted in something very
important, he started passing up dusty butterbeers from under the
bar.
“Cheers,” said Fred, handing them out. “Cough up, everyone, I
haven’t got enough gold for all of these. . . .”
Harry watched numbly as the large chattering group took their
beers from Fred and rummaged in their robes to find coins. He could
not imagine what all these people had turned up for until the horrible
thought occurred to him that they might be expecting some kind of
speech, at which he rounded on Hermione.
“What have you been telling people?” he said in a low voice. “What
are they expecting?”
“I’ve told you, they just want to hear what you’ve got to say,” said
Hermione soothingly; but Harry continued to look at her so furiously
that she added quickly, “You don’t have to do anything yet, I’ll speak
to them first.”
“Hi, Harry,” said Neville, beaming and taking a seat opposite
Harry.
Harry tried to smile back, but did not speak; his mouth was exceptionally dry. Cho had just smiled at him and sat down on Ron’s right.
Her friend, who had curly reddish-blonde hair, did not smile, but
gave Harry a thoroughly mistrustful look that told Harry plainly that,
given her way, she would not be here at all.
In twos and threes the new arrivals settled around Harry, Ron, and
Hermione, some looking rather excited, others curious, Luna Lovegood gazing dreamily into space. When everybody had pulled up a
chair, the chatter died out. Every eye was upon Harry.
“Er,” said Hermione, her voice slightly higher than usual out of
nerves. “Well — er — hi.”
The group focused its attention on her instead, though eyes continued to dart back regularly to Harry.
“Well . . . erm . . . well, you know why you’re here. Erm . . . well,
Harry here had the idea — I mean” — Harry had thrown her a sharp
look — “I had the idea — that it might be good if people who
wanted to study Defense Against the Dark Arts — and I mean, really
study it, you know, not the rubbish that Umbridge is doing with
us” — (Hermione’s voice became suddenly much stronger and more
confident) — “because nobody could call that Defense Against the
Dark Arts” — “Hear, hear,” said Anthony Goldstein, and Hermione
looked heartened — “well, I thought it would be good if we, well,
took matters into our own hands.”
She paused, looked sideways at Harry, and went on, “And by that I
mean learning how to defend ourselves properly, not just theory but
the real spells —”
“You want to pass your Defense Against the Dark Arts O.W.L. too
though, I bet?” said Michael Corner.
“Of course I do,” said Hermione at once. “But I want more than
that, I want to be properly trained in Defense because . . . because . . .”
She took a great breath and finished, “Because Lord Voldemort’s
back.”
The reaction was immediate and predictable. Cho’s friend shrieked
and slopped butterbeer down herself, Terry Boot gave a kind of involuntary twitch, Padma Patil shuddered, and Neville gave an odd yelp
that he managed to turn into a cough. All of them, however, looked
fixedly, even eagerly, at Harry.
“Well . . . that’s the plan anyway,” said Hermione. “If you want to
join us, we need to decide how we’re going to —”
“Where’s the proof You-Know-Who’s back?” said the blond Hufflepuff player in a rather aggressive voice.
“Well, Dumbledore believes it —” Hermione began.
“You mean, Dumbledore believes him,” said the blond boy, nodding at Harry.
“Who are you?” said Ron rather rudely.
“Zacharias Smith,” said the boy, “and I think we’ve got the right to
know exactly what makes him say You-Know-Who’s back.”
“Look,” said Hermione, intervening swiftly, “that’s really not what
this meeting was supposed to be about —”
“It’s okay, Hermione,” said Harry.
It had just dawned upon him why there were so many people there.
He felt that Hermione should have seen this coming. Some of these
people — maybe even most of them — had turned up in the hope of
hearing Harry’s story firsthand.
“What makes me say You-Know-Who’s back?” he asked, looking
Zacharias straight in the face. “I saw him. But Dumbledore told the
whole school what happened last year, and if you didn’t believe him,
you don’t believe me, and I’m not wasting an afternoon trying to convince anyone.”
The whole group seemed to have held its breath while Harry spoke.
Harry had the impression that even the barman was listening in. He
was wiping the same glass with the filthy rag; it was becoming steadily
dirtier.
Zacharias said dismissively, “All Dumbledore told us last year was
that Cedric Diggory got killed by You-Know-Who and that you
brought Diggory’s body back to Hogwarts. He didn’t give us details,
he didn’t tell us exactly how Diggory got murdered, I think we’d all
like to know —”
“If you’ve come to hear exactly what it looks like when Voldemort
murders someone I can’t help you,” Harry said. His temper, always so
close to the surface these days, was rising again. He did not take his
eyes from Zacharias Smith’s aggressive face, determined not to look at
Cho. “I don’t want to talk about Cedric Diggory, all right? So if that’s
what you’re here for, you might as well clear out.”
He cast an angry look in Hermione’s direction. This was, he felt, all
her fault; she had decided to display him like some sort of freak and of
course they had all turned up to see just how wild his story was. . . .
But none of them left their seats, not even Zacharias Smith, though he
continued to gaze intently at Harry.
“So,” said Hermione, her voice very high-pitched again. “So . . .
like I was saying . . . if you want to learn some defense, then we need
to work out how we’re going to do it, how often we’re going to meet,
and where we’re going to —”
“Is it true,” interrupted the girl with the long plait down her back,
looking at Harry, “that you can produce a Patronus?”
There was a murmur of interest around the group at this.
“Yeah,” said Harry slightly defensively.
“A corporeal Patronus?”
The phrase stirred something in Harry’s memory.
“Er — you don’t know Madam Bones, do you?” he asked.
The girl smiled.
“She’s my auntie,” she said. “I’m Susan Bones. She told me about
your hearing. So — is it really true? You make a stag Patronus?”
“Yes,” said Harry.
“Blimey, Harry!” said Lee, looking deeply impressed. “I never knew
that!”
“Mum told Ron not to spread it around,” said Fred, grinning at
Harry. “She said you got enough attention as it was.”
“She’s not wrong,” mumbled Harry and a couple of people
laughed. The veiled witch sitting alone shifted very slightly in her seat.
“And did you kill a basilisk with that sword in Dumbledore’s office?” demanded Terry Boot. “That’s what one of the portraits on the
wall told me when I was in there last year. . . .”
“Er — yeah, I did, yeah,” said Harry.
Justin Finch-Fletchley whistled, the Creevey brothers exchanged
awestruck looks, and Lavender Brown said “wow” softly. Harry was
feeling slightly hot around the collar now; he was determinedly looking anywhere but at Cho.
“And in our first year,” said Neville to the group at large, “he saved
that Sorcerous Stone —”
“Sorcerer’s,” hissed Hermione.
“Yes, that, from You-Know-Who,” finished Neville.
Hannah Abbott’s eyes were as round as Galleons.
“And that’s not to mention,” said Cho (Harry’s eyes snapped onto
her, she was looking at him, smiling; his stomach did another somersault), “all the tasks he had to get through in the Triwizard Tournament
last year — getting past dragons and merpeople and acromantulas and
things. . . .”
There was a murmur of impressed agreement around the table.
Harry’s insides were squirming. He was trying to arrange his face so
that he did not look too pleased with himself. The fact that Cho had
just praised him made it much, much harder for him to say the thing
he had sworn to himself he would tell them.
“Look,” he said and everyone fell silent at once, “I . . . I don’t want
to sound like I’m trying to be modest or anything, but . . . I had a lot
of help with all that stuff. . . .”
“Not with the dragon, you didn’t,” said Michael Corner at once.
“That was a seriously cool bit of flying. . . .”
“Yeah, well —” said Harry, feeling it would be churlish to disagree.
“And nobody helped you get rid of those dementors this summer,”
said Susan Bones.
“No,” said Harry, “no, okay, I know I did bits of it without help,
but the point I’m trying to make is —”
“Are you trying to weasel out of showing us any of this stuff?” said
Zacharias Smith.
“Here’s an idea,” said Ron loudly, before Harry could speak, “why
don’t you shut your mouth?”
Perhaps the word “weasel” had affected Ron particularly strongly;
in any case, he was now looking at Zacharias as though he would like
nothing better than to thump him. Zacharias flushed.
“Well, we’ve all turned up to learn from him, and now he’s telling
us he can’t really do any of it,” he said.
“That’s not what he said,” snarled Fred Weasley.
“Would you like us to clean out your ears for you?” inquired
George, pulling a long and lethal-looking metal instrument from inside one of the Zonko’s bags.
“Or any part of your body, really, we’re not fussy where we stick
this,” said Fred.
“Yes, well,” said Hermione hastily, “moving on . . . the point is, are
we agreed we want to take lessons from Harry?”
There was a murmur of general agreement. Zacharias folded his
arms and said nothing, though perhaps this was because he was too
busy keeping an eye on the instrument in George’s hand.
“Right,” said Hermione, looking relieved that something had at
last been settled. “Well, then, the next question is how often we do it.
I really don’t think there’s any point in meeting less than once a
week —”
“Hang on,” said Angelina, “we need to make sure this doesn’t clash
with our Quidditch practice.”
“No,” said Cho, “nor with ours.”
“Nor ours,” added Zacharias Smith.
“I’m sure we can find a night that suits everyone,” said Hermione,
slightly impatiently, “but you know, this is rather important, we’re
talking about learning to defend ourselves against V-Voldemort’s
Death Eaters —”
“Well said!” barked Ernie Macmillan, whom Harry had been expecting to speak long before this. “Personally I think this is really important, possibly more important than anything else we’ll do this year,
even with our O.W.L.s coming up!”
He looked around impressively, as though waiting for people to cry,
“Surely not!” When nobody spoke, he went on, “I, personally, am at a
loss to see why the Ministry has foisted such a useless teacher upon us
at this critical period. Obviously they are in denial about the return of
You-Know-Who, but to give us a teacher who is trying to actively prevent us from using defensive spells —”
“We think the reason Umbridge doesn’t want us trained in Defense
Against the Dark Arts,” said Hermione, “is that she’s got some . . .
some mad idea that Dumbledore could use the students in the school
as a kind of private army. She thinks he’d mobilize us against the
Ministry.”
Nearly everybody looked stunned at this news; everybody except
Luna Lovegood, who piped up, “Well, that makes sense. After all,
Cornelius Fudge has got his own private army.”
“What?” said Harry, completely thrown by this unexpected piece
of information.
“Yes, he’s got an army of heliopaths,” said Luna solemnly.
“No, he hasn’t,” snapped Hermione.
“Yes, he has,” said Luna.
“What are heliopaths?” asked Neville, looking blank.
“They’re spirits of fire,” said Luna, her protuberant eyes widening
so that she looked madder than ever. “Great tall flaming creatures that
gallop across the ground burning everything in front of —”
“They don’t exist, Neville,” said Hermione tartly.
“Oh yes they do!” said Luna angrily.
“I’m sorry, but where’s the proof of that?” snapped Hermione.
“There are plenty of eyewitness accounts, just because you’re so
narrow-minded you need to have everything shoved under your nose
before you —”
“Hem, hem,” said Ginny in such a good imitation of Professor Umbridge that several people looked around in alarm and then laughed.
“Weren’t we trying to decide how often we’re going to meet and get
Defense lessons?”
“Yes,” said Hermione at once, “yes, we were, you’re right. . . .”
“Well, once a week sounds cool,” said Lee Jordan.
“As long as —” began Angelina.
“Yes, yes, we know about the Quidditch,” said Hermione in a tense
voice. “Well, the other thing to decide is where we’re going to
meet. . . .”
This was rather more difficult; the whole group fell silent.
“Library?” suggested Katie Bell after a few moments.
“I can’t see Madam Pince being too chuffed with us doing jinxes in
the library,” said Harry.
“Maybe an unused classroom?” said Dean.
“Yeah,” said Ron, “McGonagall might let us have hers, she did
when Harry was practicing for the Triwizard. . . .”
But Harry was pretty certain that McGonagall would not be so accommodating this time. For all that Hermione had said about study
and homework groups being allowed, he had the distinct feeling this
one might be considered a lot more rebellious.
“Right, well, we’ll try to find somewhere,” said Hermione. “We’ll
send a message round to everybody when we’ve got a time and a place
for the first meeting.”
She rummaged in her bag and produced parchment and a quill,
then hesitated, rather as though she was steeling herself to say
something.
“I-I think everybody should write their name down, just so we
know who was here. But I also think,” she took a deep breath, “that
we all ought to agree not to shout about what we’re doing. So if you
sign, you’re agreeing not to tell Umbridge — or anybody else — what
we’re up to.”
Fred reached out for the parchment and cheerfully put down his
signature, but Harry noticed at once that several people looked less
than happy at the prospect of putting their names on the list.
“Er . . .” said Zacharias slowly, not taking the parchment that
George was trying to pass him. “Well . . . I’m sure Ernie will tell me
when the meeting is.”
But Ernie was looking rather hesitant about signing too. Hermione
raised her eyebrows at him.
“I — well, we are prefects,” Ernie burst out. “And if this list was
found . . . well, I mean to say . . . you said yourself, if Umbridge finds
out . . .”
“You just said this group was the most important thing you’d do
this year,” Harry reminded him.
“I — yes,” said Ernie, “yes, I do believe that, it’s just . . .”
“Ernie, do you really think I’d leave that list lying around?” said
Hermione testily.
“No. No, of course not,” said Ernie, looking slightly less anxious.
“I — yes, of course I’ll sign.”
Nobody raised objections after Ernie, though Harry saw Cho’s
friend give her a rather reproachful look before adding her name.
When the last person — Zacharias — had signed, Hermione took
the parchment back and slipped it carefully into her bag. There was an
odd feeling in the group now. It was as though they had just signed
some kind of contract.
“Well, time’s ticking on,” said Fred briskly, getting to his feet.
“George, Lee, and I have got items of a sensitive nature to purchase,
we’ll be seeing you all later.”
In twos and threes the rest of the group took their leave too. Cho
made rather a business of fastening the catch on her bag before leaving, her long dark curtain of hair swinging forward to hide her face,
but her friend stood beside her, arms folded, clicking her tongue, so
that Cho had little choice but to leave with her. As her friend ushered
her through the door, Cho looked back and waved at Harry.
“Well, I think that went quite well,” said Hermione happily, as she,
Harry, and Ron walked out of the Hog’s Head into the bright sunlight
a few moments later, Harry and Ron still clutching their bottles of
butterbeer.
“That Zacharias bloke’s a wart,” said Ron, who was glowering after
the figure of Smith just discernible in the distance.
“I don’t like him much either,” admitted Hermione, “but he overheard me talking to Ernie and Hannah at the Hufflepuff table and he
seemed really interested in coming, so what could I say? But the more
people the better really — I mean, Michael Corner and his friends
wouldn’t have come if he hadn’t been going out with Ginny —”
Ron, who had been draining the last few drops from his butterbeer
bottle, gagged and sprayed butterbeer down his front.
CHAPTER SIXTEEN
 348 
“He’s WHAT?” said Ron, outraged, his ears now resembling curls
of raw beef. “She’s going out with — my sister’s going — what d’you
mean, Michael Corner?”
“Well, that’s why he and his friends came, I think — well, they’re
obviously interested in learning defense, but if Ginny hadn’t told
Michael what was going on —”
“When did this — when did she — ?”
“They met at the Yule Ball and they got together at the end of last
year,” said Hermione composedly. They had turned into the High
Street and she paused outside Scrivenshaft’s Quill Shop, where there
was a handsome display of pheasant-feather quills in the window.
“Hmm . . . I could do with a new quill.”
She turned into the shop. Harry and Ron followed her.
“Which one was Michael Corner?” Ron demanded furiously.
“The dark one,” said Hermione.
“I didn’t like him,” said Ron at once.
“Big surprise,” said Hermione under her breath.
“But,” said Ron, following Hermione along a row of quills in copper pots, “I thought Ginny fancied Harry!”
Hermione looked at him rather pityingly and shook her head.
“Ginny used to fancy Harry, but she gave up on him months ago.
Not that she doesn’t like you, of course,” she added kindly to Harry
while she examined a long black-and-gold quill.
Harry, whose head was still full of Cho’s parting wave, did not find
this subject quite as interesting as Ron, who was positively quivering
with indignation, but it did bring something home to him that until
now he had not really registered.
“So that’s why she talks now?” he asked Hermione. “She never used
to talk in front of me.”
“Exactly,” said Hermione. “Yes, I think I’ll have this one. . . .”
She went up to the counter and handed over fifteen Sickles and two
Knuts, Ron still breathing down her neck.
“Ron,” she said severely as she turned and trod on his feet, “this is
exactly why Ginny hasn’t told you she’s seeing Michael, she knew
you’d take it badly. So don’t harp on about it, for heaven’s sake.”
“What d’you mean, who’s taking anything badly? I’m not going to
harp on about anything . . .”
Ron continued to chunter under his breath all the way down the
street. Hermione rolled her eyes at Harry and then said in an undertone, while Ron was muttering imprecations about Michael Corner,
“And talking about Michael and Ginny . . . what about Cho and
you?”
“What d’you mean?” said Harry quickly.
It was as though boiling water was rising rapidly inside him; a
burning sensation that was causing his face to smart in the cold —
had he been that obvious?
“Well,” said Hermione, smiling slightly, “she just couldn’t keep her
eyes off you, could she?”
Harry had never before appreciated just how beautiful the village of
Hogsmeade was.

C H A P T E R S E V E N T E E N
EDUCATIONAL DECREE NUMBER TWENTY-FOUR

Harry felt happier for the rest of the weekend than he had done
all term. He and Ron spent much of Sunday catching up
with all their homework again, and although this could hardly be
called fun, the last burst of autumn sunshine persisted, so rather than
sitting hunched over tables in the common room, they took their work
outside and lounged in the shade of a large beech tree on the edge of
the lake. Hermione, who of course was up to date with all her work,
brought more wool outside with her and bewitched her knitting needles so that they flashed and clicked in midair beside her, producing
more hats and scarves.
The knowledge that they were doing something to resist Umbridge
and the Ministry, and that he was a key part of the rebellion, gave
Harry a feeling of immense satisfaction. He kept reliving Saturday’s
meeting in his mind: all those people, coming to him to learn Defense
Against the Dark Arts . . . and the looks on their faces as they had
heard some of the things he had done . . . and Cho praising his performance in the Triwizard Tournament. . . . The knowledge that all
 those people did not think him a lying weirdo, but someone to be admired, buoyed him up so much that he was still cheerful on Monday
morning, despite the imminent prospect of all his least favorite classes.
He and Ron headed downstairs from their dormitory together, discussing Angelina’s idea that they were to work on a new move called
the Sloth Grip Roll during that night’s Quidditch practice, and not
until they were halfway across the sunlit common room did they notice the addition to the room that had already attracted the attention
of a small group of people.
A large sign had been affixed to the Gryffindor notice board, so
large that it covered everything else on there — the lists of secondhand spellbooks for sale, the regular reminders of school rules from
Argus Filch, the Quidditch team training schedule, the offers to barter
certain Chocolate Frog cards for others, the Weasleys’ new advertisement for testers, the dates of the Hogsmeade weekends, and the lostand-found notices. The new sign was printed in large black letters and
there was a highly official-looking seal at the bottom beside a neat
and curly signature.
— by order of —
The High Inquisitor of Hogwarts
All Student Organizations, Societies, Teams, Groups, and
Clubs are henceforth disbanded.
An Organization, Society, Team, Group, or Club is hereby
defined as a regular meeting of three or more students.
Permission to re-form may be sought from the High
Inquisitor (Professor Umbridge).
No Student Organization, Society, Team, Group, or Club
may exist without the knowledge and approval of the High
Inquisitor.
Any student found to have formed, or to belong to, an
Organization, Society, Team, Group, or Club that has not
been approved by the High Inquisitor will be expelled.
The above is in accordance with
Educational Decree Number Twenty-four.
Signed:
high inquisitor
Harry and Ron read the notice over the heads of some anxiouslooking second years.
“Does this mean they’re going to shut down the Gobstones Club?”
one of them asked his friend.
“I reckon you’ll be okay with Gobstones,” Ron said darkly, making
the second year jump. “I don’t think we’re going to be as lucky,
though, do you?” he asked Harry as the second years hurried away.
Harry was reading the notice through again. The happiness that
had filled him since Saturday was gone. His insides were pulsing with
rage.
“This isn’t a coincidence,” he said, his hands forming fists. “She
knows.”
“She can’t,” said Ron at once.
“There were people listening in that pub. And let’s face it, we don’t
know how many of the people who turned up we can trust. . . . Any
of them could have run off and told Umbridge. . . .”
And he had thought they believed him, thought they even admired
him . . .
“Zacharias Smith!” said Ron at once, punching a fist into his hand.
“Or — I thought that Michael Corner had a really shifty look too —”
“I wonder if Hermione’s seen this yet?” Harry said, looking around
at the door to the girls’ dormitories.
“Let’s go and tell her,” said Ron. He bounded forward, pulled open
the door, and set off up the spiral staircase.
He was on the sixth stair when it happened. There was a loud, wailing, klaxonlike sound and the steps melted together to make a long,
smooth stone slide. There was a brief moment when Ron tried to keep
running, arms working madly like windmills, then he toppled over
backward and shot down the newly created slide, coming to rest on
his back at Harry’s feet.
“Er — I don’t think we’re allowed in the girls’ dormitories,” said
Harry, pulling Ron to his feet and trying not to laugh.
Two fourth-year girls came zooming gleefully down the stone slide.
“Oooh, who tried to get upstairs?” they giggled happily, leaping to
their feet and ogling Harry and Ron.
“Me,” said Ron, who was still rather disheveled. “I didn’t realize
that would happen. It’s not fair!” he added to Harry, as the girls
headed off for the portrait hole, still giggling madly. “Hermione’s allowed in our dormitory, how come we’re not allowed — ?”
“Well, it’s an old-fashioned rule,” said Hermione, who had just slid
neatly onto a rug in front of them and was now getting to her feet,
“but it says in Hogwarts, A History that the founders thought boys
were less trustworthy than girls. Anyway, why were you trying to get
in there?”
“To see you — look at this!” said Ron, dragging her over to the notice board.
Hermione’s eyes slid rapidly down the notice. Her expression became stony.
“Someone must have blabbed to her!” Ron said angrily.
“They can’t have done,” said Hermione in a low voice.
“You’re so naive,” said Ron, “you think just because you’re all honorable and trustworthy —”
“No, they can’t have done because I put a jinx on that piece of
parchment we all signed,” said Hermione grimly. “Believe me, if anyone’s run off and told Umbridge, we’ll know exactly who they are and
they will really regret it.”
“What’ll happen to them?” said Ron eagerly.
“Well, put it this way,” said Hermione, “it’ll make Eloise Midgen’s
acne look like a couple of cute freckles. Come on, let’s get down to
breakfast and see what the others think. . . . I wonder whether this has
been put up in all the Houses?”
It was immediately apparent on entering the Great Hall that Umbridge’s sign had not only appeared in Gryffindor Tower. There was a
peculiar intensity about the chatter and an extra measure of movement in the Hall as people scurried up and down their tables conferring on what they had read. Harry, Ron, and Hermione had barely
taken their seats when Neville, Dean, Fred, George, and Ginny descended upon them.
“Did you see it?”
“D’you reckon she knows?”
“What are we going to do?”
They were all looking at Harry. He glanced around to make sure
there were no teachers near them.
“We’re going to do it anyway, of course,” he said quietly.
“Knew you’d say that,” said George, beaming and thumping Harry
on the arm.
“The prefects as well?” said Fred, looking quizzically at Ron and
Hermione.
“Of course,” said Hermione coolly.
“Here comes Ernie and Hannah Abbott,” said Ron, looking over
his shoulder. “And those Ravenclaw blokes and Smith . . . and no one
looks very spotty.”
Hermione looked alarmed.
“Never mind spots, the idiots can’t come over here now, it’ll look
really suspicious — sit down!” she mouthed to Ernie and Hannah,
gesturing frantically to them to rejoin the Hufflepuff table. “Later!
We’ll — talk — to — you — later!”
“I’ll tell Michael,” said Ginny impatiently, swinging herself off her
bench. “The fool, honestly . . .”
She hurried off toward the Ravenclaw table; Harry watched her go.
Cho was sitting not far away, talking to the curly-haired friend she
had brought along to the Hog’s Head. Would Umbridge’s notice scare
her off meeting them again?
But the full repercussions of the sign were not felt until they were
leaving the Great Hall for History of Magic.
“Harry! Ron!”
It was Angelina and she was hurrying toward them looking perfectly desperate.
“It’s okay,” said Harry quietly, when she was near enough to hear
him. “We’re still going to —”
“You realize she’s including Quidditch in this?” Angelina said over
him. “We have to go and ask permission to re-form the Gryffindor
team!”
“What?” said Harry.
“No way,” said Ron, appalled.
“You read the sign, it mentions teams too! So listen, Harry . . . I am
saying this for the last time. . . . Please, please don’t lose your temper
with Umbridge again or she might not let us play anymore!”
“Okay, okay,” said Harry, for Angelina looked as though she was on
the verge of tears. “Don’t worry, I’ll behave myself. . . .”
“Bet Umbridge is in History of Magic,” said Ron grimly, as they set
off for Binns’s lesson. “She hasn’t inspected Binns yet. . . . Bet you
anything she’s there. . . .”
But he was wrong; the only teacher present when they entered was
Professor Binns, floating an inch or so above his chair as usual and
preparing to continue his monotonous drone on giant wars. Harry
did not even attempt to follow what he was saying today; he doodled
idly on his parchment ignoring Hermione’s frequent glares and
nudges, until a particularly painful poke in the ribs made him look up
angrily.
“What?”
She pointed at the window. Harry looked around. Hedwig was
perched on the narrow window ledge, gazing through the thick glass
at him, a letter tied to her leg. Harry could not understand it; they had
just had breakfast, why on earth hadn’t she delivered the letter then, as
usual? Many of his classmates were pointing out Hedwig to each other
too.
“Oh, I’ve always loved that owl, she’s so beautiful,” Harry heard
Lavender sigh to Parvati.
He glanced around at Professor Binns who continued to read his
notes, serenely unaware that the class’s attention was even less focused
upon him than usual. Harry slipped quietly off his chair, crouched
down, and hurried along the row to the window, where he slid the
catch and opened it very slowly.
He had expected Hedwig to hold out her leg so that he could remove the letter and then fly off to the Owlery, but the moment the
window was open wide enough she hopped inside, hooting dolefully.
He closed the window with an anxious glance at Professor Binns,
crouched low again, and sped back to his seat with Hedwig on his
shoulder. He regained his seat, transferred Hedwig to his lap, and
made to remove the letter tied to her leg.
It was only then that he realized that Hedwig’s feathers were oddly
ruffled; some were bent the wrong way, and she was holding one of
her wings at an odd angle.
“She’s hurt!” Harry whispered, bending his head low over her.
Hermione and Ron leaned in closer; Hermione even put down her
quill. “Look — there’s something wrong with her wing —”
Hedwig was quivering; when Harry made to touch the wing she
gave a little jump, all her feathers on end as though she was inflating
herself, and gazed at him reproachfully.
“Professor Binns,” said Harry loudly, and everyone in the class
turned to look at him. “I’m not feeling well.”
Professor Binns raised his eyes from his notes, looking amazed, as
always, to find the room in front of him full of people.
“Not feeling well?” he repeated hazily.
“Not at all well,” said Harry firmly, getting to his feet while concealing Hedwig behind his back. “So I think I’ll need to go to the hospital wing.”
“Yes,” said Professor Binns, clearly very much wrong-footed. “Yes
. . . yes, hospital wing . . . well, off you go, then, Perkins . . .”
Once outside the room Harry returned Hedwig to his shoulder and
hurried off up the corridor, pausing to think only when he was out of
sight of Binns’s door. His first choice of somebody to cure Hedwig
would have been Hagrid, of course, but as he had no idea where
Hagrid was, his only remaining option was to find Professor GrubblyPlank and hope she would help.
He peered out of a window at the blustery, overcast grounds. There
was no sign of her anywhere near Hagrid’s cabin; if she was not teaching, she was probably in the staffroom. He set off downstairs, Hedwig
hooting feebly as she swayed on his shoulder.
Two stone gargoyles flanked the staffroom door. As Harry approached, one of them croaked, “You should be in class, sunny Jim.”
“This is urgent,” said Harry curtly.
“Ooooh, urgent, is it?” said the other gargoyle in a high-pitched
voice. “Well, that’s put us in our place, hasn’t it?”
Harry knocked; he heard footsteps and then the door opened and
he found himself face-to-face with Professor McGonagall.
“You haven’t been given another detention!” she said at once, her
square spectacles flashing alarmingly.
“No, Professor!” said Harry hastily.
“Well then, why are you out of class?”
“It’s urgent, apparently,” said the second gargoyle snidely.
“I’m looking for Professor Grubbly-Plank,” Harry explained. “It’s
my owl, she’s injured.”
“Injured owl, did you say?”
Professor Grubbly-Plank appeared at Professor McGonagall’s
shoulder, smoking a pipe and holding a copy of the Daily Prophet.
“Yes,” said Harry, lifting Hedwig carefully off his shoulder, “she
turned up after the other post owls and her wing’s all funny, look —”
Professor Grubbly-Plank stuck her pipe firmly between her teeth
and took Hedwig from Harry while Professor McGonagall watched.
“Hmm,” said Professor Grubbly-Plank, her pipe waggling slightly
as she talked. “Looks like something’s attacked her. Can’t think what
would have done it, though. . . . Thestrals will sometimes go for
birds, of course, but Hagrid’s got the Hogwarts thestrals well trained
not to touch owls . . .”
Harry neither knew nor cared what thestrals were, he just wanted
to know that Hedwig was going to be all right. Professor McGonagall,
however, looked sharply at Harry and said, “Do you know how far
this owl’s traveled, Potter?”
“Er,” said Harry. “From London, I think.”
He met her eyes briefly and knew that she understood “London” to
mean “number twelve, Grimmauld Place” by the way her eyebrows
had joined in the middle.
Professor Grubbly-Plank pulled a monocle out of the inside of her
robes and screwed it into her eye to examine Hedwig’s wing closely. “I
should be able to sort this out if you leave her with me, Potter,” she
said. “She shouldn’t be flying long distances for a few days, in any case.”
“Er — right — thanks,” said Harry, just as the bell rang for break.
“No problem,” said Professor Grubbly-Plank gruffly, turning back
into the staffroom.
“Just a moment, Wilhelmina!” said Professor McGonagall. “Potter’s letter!”
“Oh yeah!” said Harry, who had momentarily forgotten the scroll
tied to Hedwig’s leg. Professor Grubbly-Plank handed it over and then
disappeared into the staffroom carrying Hedwig, who was staring at
Harry as though unable to believe he would give her away like this.
Feeling slightly guilty, he turned to go, but Professor McGonagall
called him back.
“Potter!”
“Yes, Professor?”
She glanced up and down the corridor; there were students coming
from both directions.
“Bear in mind,” she said quickly and quietly, her eyes on the scroll
in his hand, “that channels of communication in and out of Hogwarts
may be being watched, won’t you?”
“I —” said Harry, but the flood of students rolling along the corridor was almost upon him. Professor McGonagall gave him a curt nod
and retreated into the staffroom, leaving Harry to be swept out into
the courtyard with the crowd. Here he spotted Ron and Hermione already standing in a sheltered corner, their cloak collars turned up
against the wind. Harry slit open the scroll as he hurried toward them
and found five words in Sirius’s handwriting:
Today, same time, same place.
“Is Hedwig okay?” asked Hermione anxiously, the moment he was
within earshot.
“Where did you take her?” asked Ron.
“To Grubbly-Plank,” said Harry. “And I met McGonagall. . . .
Listen. . . .”
And he told them what Professor McGonagall had said. To his
surprise, neither of the others looked shocked; on the contrary, they
exchanged significant looks.
“What?” said Harry, looking from Ron to Hermione and back
again.
“Well, I was just saying to Ron . . . what if someone had tried to intercept Hedwig? I mean, she’s never been hurt on a flight before, has
she?”
“Who’s the letter from anyway?” asked Ron, taking the note from
Harry.
“Snuffles,” said Harry quietly.
“ ‘Same time, same place’? Does he mean the fire in the common
room?”
“Obviously,” said Hermione, also reading the note. She looked uneasy. “I just hope nobody else has read this. . . .”
“But it was still sealed and everything,” said Harry, trying to convince himself as much as her. “And nobody would understand what it
meant if they didn’t know where we’d spoken to him before, would
they?”
“I don’t know,” said Hermione anxiously, hitching her bag back
over her shoulder as the bell rang again. “It wouldn’t be exactly difficult to reseal the scroll by magic. . . . And if anyone’s watching the
Floo Network . . . but I don’t really see how we can warn him not to
come without that being intercepted too!”
They trudged down the stone steps to the dungeons for Potions, all
three of them lost in thought, but as they reached the bottom of the
stairs they were recalled to themselves by the voice of Draco Malfoy,
who was standing just outside Snape’s classroom door, waving around
an official-looking piece of parchment and talking much louder than
was necessary so that they could hear every word.
“Yeah, Umbridge gave the Slytherin Quidditch team permission to
continue playing straightaway, I went to ask her first thing this morning. Well, it was pretty much automatic, I mean, she knows my father
really well, he’s always popping in and out of the Ministry. . . . It’ll be
interesting to see whether Gryffindor are allowed to keep playing,
wont it?”
“Don’t rise,” Hermione whispered imploringly to Harry and Ron,
who were both watching Malfoy, faces set and fists clenched. “It’s
what he wants. . . .”
“I mean,” said Malfoy, raising his voice a little more, his gray eyes
glittering malevolently in Harry and Ron’s direction, “if it’s a question
of influence with the Ministry, I don’t think they’ve got much chance.
. . . From what my father says, they’ve been looking for an excuse to
sack Arthur Weasley for years. . . . And as for Potter . . . My father
says it’s a matter of time before the Ministry has him carted off to St.
Mungo’s. . . . apparently they’ve got a special ward for people whose
brains have been addled by magic. . . .”
Malfoy made a grotesque face, his mouth sagging open and his eyes
rolling. Crabbe and Goyle gave their usual grunts of laughter, Pansy
Parkinson shrieked with glee.
Something collided hard with Harry’s shoulder, knocking him
sideways. A split second later he realized that Neville had just charged
past him, heading straight for Malfoy.
“Neville, no!”
Harry leapt forward and seized the back of Neville’s robes; Neville
struggled frantically, his fists flailing, trying desperately to get at Malfoy who looked, for a moment, extremely shocked.
“Help me!” Harry flung at Ron, managing to get an arm around
Neville’s neck and dragging him backward, away from the Slytherins.
Crabbe and Goyle were now flexing their arms, closing in front of
Malfoy, ready for the fight. Ron hurried forward and seized Neville’s
arms; together, he and Harry succeeded in dragging Neville back into
the Gryffindor line. Neville’s face was scarlet; the pressure Harry was
exerting on his throat rendered him quite incomprehensible, but odd
words spluttered from his mouth.
“Not. . . funny . . . don’t . . . Mungo’s . . . show . . . him . . .”
The dungeon door opened. Snape appeared there. His black eyes
swept up the Gryffindor line to the point where Harry and Ron were
wrestling with Neville.
“Fighting, Potter, Weasley, Longbottom?” Snape said in his cold,
sneering voice. “Ten points from Gryffindor. Release Longbottom,
Potter, or it will be detention. Inside, all of you.”
Harry let go of Neville, who stood panting and glaring at him.
“I had to stop you,” Harry gasped, picking up his bag. “Crabbe and
Goyle would’ve torn you apart.”
Neville said nothing, he merely snatched up his own bag and
stalked off into the dungeon.
“What in the name of Merlin,” said Ron slowly, as they followed
Neville, “was that about?”
Harry did not answer. He knew exactly why the subject of people
who were in St. Mungo’s because of magical damage to their brains
was highly distressing to Neville, but he had sworn to Dumbledore
that he would not tell anyone Neville’s secret. Even Neville did not
know that Harry knew.
Harry, Ron, and Hermione took their usual seats at the back of the
class and pulled out parchment, quills, and their copies of One Thousand Magical Herbs and Fungi. The class around them was whispering
about what Neville had just done, but when Snape closed the dungeon door with an echoing bang everybody fell silent immediately.
“You will notice,” said Snape in his low, sneering voice, “that we
have a guest with us today.”
He gestured toward the dim corner of the dungeon, and Harry saw
Professor Umbridge sitting there, clipboard on her knee. He glanced
sideways at Ron and Hermione, his eyebrows raised. Snape and Umbridge, the two teachers he hated most . . . it was hard to decide
which he wanted to triumph over the other.
“We are continuing with our Strengthening Solutions today, you
will find your mixtures as you left them last lesson, if correctly made
they should have matured well over the weekend — instructions” —
he waved his wand again — “on the board. Carry on.”
Professor Umbridge spent the first half hour of the lesson making
notes in her corner. Harry was very interested in hearing her question
Snape, so interested, that he was becoming careless with his potion
again.
“Salamander blood, Harry!” Hermione moaned, grabbing his wrist
to prevent him adding the wrong ingredient for the third time. “Not
pomegranate juice!”
“Right,” said Harry vaguely, putting down the bottle and continuing to watch the corner. Umbridge had just gotten to her feet. “Ha,”
he said softly, as she strode between two lines of desks toward Snape,
who was bending over Dean Thomas’s cauldron.
“Well, the class seems fairly advanced for their level,” she said
briskly to Snape’s back. “Though I would question whether it is advisable to teach them a potion like the Strengthening Solution. I think
the Ministry would prefer it if that was removed from the syllabus.”
Snape straightened up slowly and turned to look at her.
“Now . . . how long have you been teaching at Hogwarts?” she
asked, her quill poised over her clipboard.
“Fourteen years,” Snape replied. His expression was unfathomable.
His eyes on Snape, Harry added a few drops to his potion; it hissed
menacingly and turned from turquoise to orange.
“You applied first for the Defense Against the Dark Arts post, I
believe?” Professor Umbridge asked Snape.
“Yes,” said Snape quietly.
“But you were unsuccessful?”
Snape’s lip curled.
“Obviously.”
Professor Umbridge scribbled on her clipboard.
“And you have applied regularly for the Defense Against the Dark
Arts post since you first joined the school, I believe?”
“Yes,” said Snape quietly, barely moving his lips. He looked very
angry.
“Do you have any idea why Dumbledore has consistently refused
to appoint you?” asked Umbridge.
“I suggest you ask him,” said Snape jerkily.
“Oh I shall,” said Professor Umbridge with a sweet smile.
“I suppose this is relevant?” Snape asked, his black eyes narrowed.
“Oh yes,” said Professor Umbridge. “Yes, the Ministry wants a
thorough understanding of teachers’ — er — backgrounds. . . .”
She turned away, walked over to Pansy Parkinson and began questioning her about the lessons. Snape looked around at Harry and their
eyes met for a second. Harry hastily dropped his gaze to his potion,
which was now congealing foully and giving off a strong smell of
burned rubber.
“No marks again, then, Potter,” said Snape maliciously, emptying
Harry’s cauldron with a wave of his wand. “You will write me an essay
on the correct composition of this potion, indicating how and why
you went wrong, to be handed in next lesson, do you understand?”
“Yes,” said Harry furiously. Snape had already given them homework, and he had Quidditch practice this evening; this would mean
another couple of sleepless nights. It did not seem possible that he had
awoken that morning feeling very happy. All he felt now was a fervent
desire for this day to end as soon as possible.
“Maybe I’ll skive off Divination,” he said glumly as they stood
again in the courtyard after lunch, the wind whipping at the hems of
robes and brims of hats. “I’ll pretend to be ill and do Snape’s essay instead, then I won’t have to stay up half the night. . . .”
“You can’t skive off Divination,” said Hermione severely.
“Hark who’s talking, you walked out of Divination, you hate
Trelawney!” said Ron indignantly.
“I don’t hate her,” said Hermione loftily. “I just think she’s an absolutely appalling teacher and a real old fraud. . . . But Harry’s already
missed History of Magic and I don’t think he ought to miss anything
else today!”
There was too much truth in this to ignore, so half an hour later
Harry took his seat in the hot, over-perfumed atmosphere of the Divination classroom feeling angry at everybody. Professor Trelawney was
handing out copies of The Dream Oracle yet again; he would surely be
much better employed doing Snape’s punishment essay than sitting
here trying to find meaning in a lot of made-up dreams.
It seemed, however, that he was not the only person in Divination
who was in a temper. Professor Trelawney slammed a copy of the Oracle down on the table between Harry and Ron and swept away, her
lips pursed; she threw the next copy of the Oracle at Seamus and
Dean, narrowly avoiding Seamus’s head, and thrust the final one into
Neville’s chest with such force that he slipped off his pouf.
“Well, carry on!” said Professor Trelawney loudly, her voice high
pitched and somewhat hysterical. “You know what to do! Or am I such
a substandard teacher that you have never learned how to open a book?”
The class stared perplexedly at her and then at each other. Harry,
however, thought he knew what was the matter. As Professor
Trelawney flounced back to the high-backed teacher’s chair, her magnified eyes full of angry tears, he leaned his head closer to Ron’s and
muttered, “I think she’s got the results of her inspection back.”
“Professor?” said Parvati Patil in a hushed voice (she and Lavender
had always rather admired Professor Trelawney). “Professor, is there
anything — er — wrong?”
“Wrong!” cried Professor Trelawney in a voice throbbing with emotion. “Certainly not! I have been insulted, certainly. . . . Insinuations
have been made against me. . . . Unfounded accusations levelled . . .
but no, there is nothing wrong, certainly not. . . .”
She took a great shuddering breath and looked away from Parvati,
angry tears spilling from under her glasses.
“I say nothing,” she choked, “of sixteen years’ devoted service. . . .
It has passed, apparently, unnoticed. . . . But I shall not be insulted,
no, I shall not!”
“But Professor, who’s insulting you?” asked Parvati timidly.
“The establishment!” said Professor Trelawney in a deep, dramatic,
wavering voice. “Yes, those with eyes too clouded by the Mundane to
See as I See, to Know as I Know . . . Of course, we Seers have always
been feared, always persecuted. . . . It is — alas — our fate. . . .”
She gulped, dabbed at her wet cheeks with the end of her shawl,
and then pulled a small, embroidered handkerchief from her sleeve,
into which she blew her nose very hard with a sound like Peeves blowing a raspberry. Ron sniggered. Lavender shot him a disgusted look.
“Professor,” said Parvati, “do you mean . . . is it something Professor Umbridge . . . ?”
“Do not speak to me about that woman!” cried Professor
Trelawney, leaping to her feet, her beads rattling and her spectacles
flashing. “Kindly continue with your work!”
And she spent the rest of the lesson striding among them, tears still
leaking from behind her glasses, muttering what sounded like threats
under her breath.
“. . . may well choose to leave . . . the indignity of it . . . on probation . . . we shall see . . . how she dares . . .”
“You and Umbridge have got something in common,” Harry told
Hermione quietly when they met again in Defense Against the Dark
Arts. “She obviously reckons Trelawney’s an old fraud too. . . . Looks
like she’s put her on probation.”
Umbridge entered the room as he spoke, wearing her black velvet
bow and an expression of great smugness.
“Good afternoon, class.”
“Good afternoon, Professor Umbridge,” they chanted drearily.
“Wands away, please . . .”
But there was no answering flurry of movement this time; nobody
had bothered to take out their wands.
“Please turn to page thirty-four of Defensive Magical Theory and read
the third chapter, entitled ‘The Case for Non-Offensive Responses to
Magical Attack.’ There will be —”
“— no need to talk,” Harry, Ron, and Hermione said together under their breaths.
“No Quidditch practice,” said Angelina in hollow tones when Harry,
Ron, and Hermione entered the common room that night after
dinner.
“But I kept my temper!” said Harry, horrified. “I didn’t say anything to her, Angelina, I swear, I —”
“I know, I know,” said Angelina miserably. “She just said she
needed a bit of time to consider.”
“Consider what?” said Ron angrily. “She’s given the Slytherins permission, why not us?”
But Harry could imagine how much Umbridge was enjoying holding the threat of no Gryffindor Quidditch team over their heads and
could easily understand why she would not want to relinquish that
weapon over them too soon.
“Well,” said Hermione, “look on the bright side — at least now
you’ll have time to do Snape’s essay!”
“That’s a bright side, is it?” snapped Harry, while Ron stared incredulously at Hermione. “No Quidditch practice and extra Potions?”
Harry slumped down into a chair, dragged his Potions essay reluctantly from his bag, and set to work.
It was very hard to concentrate; even though he knew that Sirius
was not due in the fire until much later he could not help glancing
into the flames every few minutes just in case. There was also an incredible amount of noise in the room: Fred and George appeared finally to have perfected one type of Skiving Snackbox, which they were
taking turns to demonstrate to a cheering and whooping crowd.
First, Fred would take a bite out of the orange end of a chew, at
which he would vomit spectacularly into a bucket they had placed in
front of them. Then he would force down the purple end of the chew,
at which the vomiting would immediately cease. Lee Jordan, who was
assisting the demonstration, was lazily vanishing the vomit at regular
intervals with the same Vanishing Spell Snape kept using on Harry’s
potions.
What with the regular sounds of retching, cheering, and Fred and
George taking advance orders from the crowd, Harry was finding it
exceptionally difficult to focus on the correct method for Strengthening Solutions. Hermione was not helping matters; the cheers and
sound of vomit hitting the bottom of Fred and George’s bucket were
punctuated by loud and disapproving sniffs that Harry found, if anything, more distracting.
“Just go and stop them, then!” he said irritably, after crossing out
the wrong weight of powdered griffin claw for the fourth time.
“I can’t, they’re not technically doing anything wrong,” said Hermione through gritted teeth. “They’re quite within their rights to eat
the foul things themselves, and I can’t find a rule that says the other
idiots aren’t entitled to buy them, not unless they’re proven to be dangerous in some way, and it doesn’t look as though they are. . . .”
She, Harry, and Ron watched George projectile-vomit into the
bucket, gulp down the rest of the chew, and straighten up, beaming
with his arms wide to protracted applause.
“You know, I don’t get why Fred and George only got three O.W.L.s
each,” said Harry, watching as Fred, George, and Lee collected gold
from the eager crowd. “They really know their stuff. . . .”
“Oh, they only know flashy stuff that’s no real use to anyone,” said
Hermione disparagingly.
“No real use?” said Ron in a strained voice. “Hermione, they’ve got
about twenty-six Galleons already. . . .”
It was a long while before the crowd around the Weasleys dispersed,
and then Fred, Lee, and George sat up counting their takings even
longer, so that it was well past midnight when Harry, Ron, and
Hermione finally had the common room to themselves again. At long
last, Fred closed the doorway to the boys’ dormitories behind him,
rattling his box of Galleons ostentatiously so that Hermione scowled.
Harry, who was making very little progress with his Potions essay, decided to give it up for the night. As he put his books away, Ron, who
was dozing lightly in an armchair, gave a muffled grunt, awoke,
looked blearily into the fire and said, “Sirius!”
Harry whipped around; Sirius’s untidy dark head was sitting in the
fire again.
“Hi,” he said, grinning.
“Hi,” chorused Harry, Ron, and Hermione, all three kneeling
down upon the hearthrug. Crookshanks purred loudly and approached the fire, trying, despite the heat, to put his face close to
Sirius’s.
“How’re things?” said Sirius.
“Not that good,” said Harry, as Hermione pulled Crookshanks
back to stop him singeing his whiskers. “The Ministry’s forced
through another decree, which means we’re not allowed to have Quidditch teams —”
“— or secret Defense Against the Dark Arts groups?” said Sirius.
There was a short pause.
“How did you know about that?” Harry demanded.
“You want to choose your meeting places more carefully,” said Sirius, grinning still more broadly. “The Hog’s Head, I ask you . . .”
“Well, it was better than the Three Broomsticks!” said Hermione
defensively. “That’s always packed with people —”
“— which means you’d have been harder to overhear,” said Sirius.
“You’ve got a lot to learn, Hermione.”
“Who overheard us?” Harry demanded.
“Mundungus, of course,” said Sirius, and when they all looked
puzzled he laughed. “He was the witch under the veil.”
“That was Mundungus?” Harry said, stunned. “What was he doing
in the Hog’s Head?”
“What do you think he was doing?” said Sirius impatiently. “Keeping an eye on you, of course.”
“I’m still being followed?” asked Harry angrily.
“Yeah, you are,” said Sirius, “and just as well, isn’t it, if the first
thing you’re going to do on your weekend off is organize an illegal defense group.”
But he looked neither angry nor worried; on the contrary, he was
looking at Harry with distinct pride.
“Why was Dung hiding from us?” asked Ron, sounding disappointed. “We’d’ve liked to’ve seen him.”
“He was banned from the Hog’s Head twenty years ago,” said Sirius,
“and that barman’s got a long memory. We lost Moody’s spare Invisibility Cloak when Sturgis was arrested, so Dung’s been dressing as a
witch a lot lately. . . . Anyway . . . First of all, Ron — I’ve sworn to
pass on a message from your mother.”
“Oh yeah?” said Ron, sounding apprehensive.
“She says on no account whatsoever are you to take part in an illegal secret Defense Against the Dark Arts group. She says you’ll be expelled for sure and your future will be ruined. She says there will be
plenty of time to learn how to defend yourself later and that you are
too young to be worrying about that right now. She also” — Sirius’s
eyes turned to the other two — “advises Harry and Hermione not to
proceed with the group, though she accepts that she has no authority
over either of them and simply begs them to remember that she has
their best interests at heart. She would have written all this to you, but
if the owl had been intercepted you’d all have been in real trouble, and
she can’t say it for herself because she’s on duty tonight.”
“On duty doing what?” said Ron quickly.
“Never you mind, just stuff for the Order,” said Sirius. “So it’s
fallen to me to be the messenger and make sure you tell her I passed it
all on, because I don’t think she trusts me to.”
There was another pause in which Crookshanks, mewing, attempted to paw Sirius’s head, and Ron fiddled with a hole in the
hearthrug.
“So you want me to say I’m not going to take part in the defense
group?” he muttered finally.
“Me? Certainly not!” said Sirius, looking surprised. “I think it’s an
excellent idea!”
“You do?” said Harry, his heart lifting.
“Of course I do!” said Sirius. “D’you think your father and I
would’ve lain down and taken orders from an old hag like Umbridge?”
“But — last term all you did was tell me to be careful and not take
risks —”
“Last year all the evidence was that someone inside Hogwarts was
trying to kill you, Harry!” said Sirius impatiently. “This year we know
that there’s someone outside Hogwarts who’d like to kill us all, so I
think learning to defend yourselves properly is a very good idea!”
“And if we do get expelled?” Hermione asked, a quizzical look on
her face.
“Hermione, this whole thing was your idea!” said Harry, staring at
her.
“I know it was. . . . I just wondered what Sirius thought,” she said,
shrugging.
“Well, better expelled and able to defend yourselves than sitting
safely in school without a clue,” said Sirius.
“Hear, hear,” said Harry and Ron enthusiastically.
“So,” said Sirius, “how are you organizing this group? Where are
you meeting?”
“Well, that’s a bit of a problem now,” said Harry. “Dunno where
we’re going to be able to go. . . .”
“How about the Shrieking Shack?” suggested Sirius.
“Hey, that’s an idea!” said Ron excitedly, but Hermione made a
skeptical noise and all three of them looked at her, Sirius’s head turning in the flames.
“Well, Sirius, it’s just that there were only four of you meeting in the
Shrieking Shack when you were at school,” said Hermione, “and all of
you could transform into animals and I suppose you could all have
squeezed under a single Invisibility Cloak if you’d wanted to. But there
are twenty-eight of us and none of us is an Animagus, so we wouldn’t
need so much an Invisibility Cloak as an Invisibility Marquee —”
“Fair point,” said Sirius, looking slightly crestfallen. “Well, I’m sure
you’ll come up with somewhere. . . . There used to be a pretty roomy
secret passageway behind that big mirror on the fourth floor, you
might have enough space to practice jinxes in there —”
“Fred and George told me it’s blocked,” said Harry, shaking his
head. “Caved in or something.”
“Oh . . .” said Sirius, frowning. “Well, I’ll have a think and get
back to —”
He broke off. His face was suddenly tense, alarmed. He turned
sideways, apparently looking into the solid brick wall of the fireplace.
“Sirius?” said Harry anxiously.
But he had vanished. Harry gaped at the flames for a moment, then
turned to look at Ron and Hermione.
“Why did he — ?”
Hermione gave a horrified gasp and leapt to her feet, still staring at
the fire.
EDUCATIONAL DECREE
NUMBER TWENTY-FOUR
A hand had appeared amongst the flames, groping as though to
catch hold of something; a stubby, short-fingered hand covered in
ugly old-fashioned rings. . . .
The three of them ran for it; at the door of the boys’ dormitory
Harry looked back. Umbridge’s hand was still making snatching
movements amongst the flames, as though she knew exactly where
Sirius’s hair had been moments before and was determined to seize it.

C H A P T E R E I G H T E E N
DUMBLEDORE’S ARMY

Umbridge has been reading your mail, Harry. There’s no other
explanation.”
“You think Umbridge attacked Hedwig?” he said, outraged.
“I’m almost certain of it,” said Hermione grimly. “Watch your frog,
it’s escaping.”
Harry pointed his wand at the bullfrog that had been hopping
hopefully toward the other side of the table — “Accio!”— and it
zoomed gloomily back into his hand.
Charms was always one of the best lessons in which to enjoy a private chat: There was generally so much movement and activity that
the danger of being overheard was very slight. Today, with the room
full of croaking bullfrogs and cawing ravens, and with a heavy downpour of rain clattering and pounding against the classroom windows,
Harry, Ron, and Hermione’s whispered discussion about how Umbridge had nearly caught Sirius went quite unnoticed.
“I’ve been suspecting this ever since Filch accused you of ordering
Dungbombs, because it seemed such a stupid lie,” Hermione whispered. “I mean, once your letter had been read, it would have been
quite clear you weren’t ordering them, so you wouldn’t have been in
trouble at all — it’s a bit of a feeble joke, isn’t it? But then I thought,
what if somebody just wanted an excuse to read your mail? Well then,
it would be a perfect way for Umbridge to manage it — tip off Filch,
let him do the dirty work and confiscate the letter, then either find a
way of stealing it from him or else demand to see it — I don’t think
Filch would object, when’s he ever stuck up for a student’s rights?
Harry, you’re squashing your frog.”
Harry looked down; he was indeed squeezing his bullfrog so tightly
its eyes were popping; he replaced it hastily upon the desk.
“It was a very, very close call last night,” said Hermione. “I just
wonder if Umbridge knows how close it was. Silencio!”
The bullfrog on which she was practicing her Silencing Charm was
struck dumb mid-croak and glared at her reproachfully.
“If she’d caught Snuffles . . .”
Harry finished the sentence for her.
“He’d probably be back in Azkaban this morning.” He waved his
wand without really concentrating; his bullfrog swelled like a green
balloon and emitted a high-pitched whistle.
“Silencio!” said Hermione hastily, pointing her wand at Harry’s
frog, which deflated silently before them. “Well, he mustn’t do it
again, that’s all. I just don’t know how we’re going to let him know. We
can’t send him an owl.”
“I don’t reckon he’ll risk it again,” said Ron. “He’s not stupid, he
knows she nearly got him. Silencio!”
The large and ugly raven in front of him let out a derisive caw.
“Silencio! SILENCIO!”
The raven cawed more loudly.
“It’s the way you’re moving your wand,” said Hermione, watching
Ron critically. “You don’t want to wave it, it’s more a sharp jab.”
“Ravens are harder than frogs,” said Ron testily.
“Fine, let’s swap,” said Hermione, seizing Ron’s raven and replacing
it with her own fat bullfrog. “Silencio!” The raven continued to open
and close its sharp beak, but no sound came out.
“Very good, Miss Granger!” said Professor Flitwick’s squeaky little
voice and Harry, Ron, and Hermione all jumped. “Now, let me see
you try, Mr. Weasley!”
“Wha — ? Oh — oh, right,” said Ron, very flustered. “Er — Silencio!”
He jabbed at the bullfrog so hard that he poked it in the eye; the
frog gave a deafening croak and leapt off the desk.
It came as no surprise to any of them that Harry and Ron were
given additional practice of the Silencing Charm for homework.
They were allowed to remain inside over break due to the downpour outside. They found seats in a noisy and overcrowded classroom
on the first floor in which Peeves was floating dreamily up near the
chandelier, occasionally blowing an ink pellet at the top of somebody’s
head. They had barely sat down when Angelina came struggling toward them through the groups of gossiping students.
“I’ve got permission!” she said. “To re-form the Quidditch team!”
“Excellent!” said Ron and Harry together.
“Yeah,” said Angelina, beaming. “I went to McGonagall and I think
she might have appealed to Dumbledore — anyway, Umbridge had
to give in. Ha! So I want you down at the pitch at seven o’clock
tonight, all right, because we’ve got to make up time, you realize we’re
only three weeks away from our first match?”
She squeezed away from them, narrowly dodged an ink pellet from
Peeves, which hit a nearby first year instead, and vanished from sight.
Ron’s smile slipped slightly as he looked out of the window, which
was now opaque with hammering rain.
“Hope this clears up . . . What’s up with you, Hermione?”
She too was gazing at the window, but not as though she really saw
it. Her eyes were unfocused and there was a frown on her face.
“Just thinking . . .” she said, still frowning at the rain-washed
window.
“About Siri . . . Snuffles?” said Harry.
“No . . . not exactly . . .” said Hermione slowly. “More . . . wondering . . . I suppose we’re doing the right thing . . . I think . . . aren’t
we?
Harry and Ron looked at each other.
“Well, that clears that up,” said Ron. “It would’ve been really annoying if you hadn’t explained yourself properly.”
Hermione looked at him as though she had only just realized he
was there.
“I was just wondering,” she said, her voice stronger now, “whether
we’re doing the right thing, starting this Defense Against the Dark
Arts group.”
“What!” said Harry and Ron together.
“Hermione, it was your idea in the first place!” said Ron
indignantly.
“I know,” said Hermione, twisting her fingers together. “But after
talking to Snuffles . . .”
“But he’s all for it!” said Harry.
“Yes,” said Hermione, staring at the window again. “Yes, that’s
what made me think maybe it wasn’t a good idea after all. . . .”
Peeves floated over them on his stomach, peashooter at the ready;
automatically all three of them lifted their bags to cover their heads
until he had passed.
“Let’s get this straight,” said Harry angrily, as they put their bags
back on the floor, “Sirius agrees with us, so you don’t think we should
do it anymore?”
Hermione looked tense and rather miserable. Now staring at her
own hands she said, “Do you honestly trust his judgment?”
“Yes, I do!” said Harry at once. “He’s always given us great advice!”
An ink pellet whizzed past them, striking Katie Bell squarely in
the ear. Hermione watched Katie leap to her feet and start throwing things at Peeves; it was a few moments before Hermione spoke
again and it sounded as though she was choosing her words very
carefully.
“You don’t think he has become . . . sort of . . . reckless . . . since
he’s been cooped up in Grimmauld Place? You don’t think he’s . . .
kind of . . . living through us?”
“What d’you mean, ‘living through us’?” Harry retorted.
“I mean . . . well, I think he’d love to be forming secret defense
societies right under the nose of someone from the Ministry. . . . I
think he’s really frustrated at how little he can do where he is . . . so
I think he’s keen to kind of . . . egg us on.”
Ron looked utterly perplexed.
“Sirius is right,” he said, “you do sound just like my mother.”
Hermione bit her lip and did not answer. The bell rang just as
Peeves swooped down upon Katie and emptied an entire ink bottle
over her head.
The weather did not improve as the day wore on, so that at seven
o’clock that evening, when Harry and Ron went down to the Quidditch pitch for practice, they were soaked through within minutes,
their feet slipping and sliding on the sodden grass. The sky was a deep,
thundery gray and it was a relief to gain the warmth and light of the
changing rooms, even if they knew the respite was only temporary.
They found Fred and George debating whether to use one of their
own Skiving Snackboxes to get out of flying.
“— but I bet she’d know what we’d done,” Fred said out of the corner of his mouth. “If only I hadn’t offered to sell her some Puking
Pastilles yesterday —”
“We could try the Fever Fudge,” George muttered, “no one’s seen
that yet —”
“Does it work?” inquired Ron hopefully, as the hammering of rain
on the roof intensified and wind howled around the building.
“Well, yeah,” said Fred, “your temperature’ll go right up —”
“— but you get these massive pus-filled boils too,” said George,
“and we haven’t worked out how to get rid of them yet.”
“I can’t see any boils,” said Ron, staring at the twins.
“No, well, you wouldn’t,” said Fred darkly, “they’re not in a place
we generally display to the public —”
“— but they make sitting on a broom a right pain in the —”
“All right, everyone, listen up,” said Angelina loudly, emerging
from the Captain’s office. “I know it’s not ideal weather, but there’s a
good chance we’ll be playing Slytherin in conditions like this so it’s a
good idea to work out how we’re going to cope with them. Harry,
didn’t you do something to your glasses to stop the rain fogging them
up when we played Hufflepuff in that storm?”
“Hermione did it,” said Harry. He pulled out his wand, tapped his
glasses and said, “Impervius!”
“I think we all ought to try that,” said Angelina. “If we could just
keep the rain off our faces it would really help visibility — all together, come on — Impervius! Okay. Let’s go.”
They all stowed their wands back in the inside pockets of their
robes, shouldered their brooms, and followed Angelina out of the
changing rooms.
They squelched through the deepening mud to the middle of the
pitch; visibility was still very poor even with the Impervius Charm;
light was fading fast and curtains of rain were sweeping the grounds.
“All right, on my whistle,” shouted Angelina.
Harry kicked off from the ground, spraying mud in all directions,
and shot upward, the wind pulling him slightly off course. He had no
idea how he was going to see the Snitch in this weather; he was having enough difficulty seeing the one Bludger with which they were
practicing; a minute into the practice it almost unseated him and he
had to use the Sloth Grip Roll to avoid it. Unfortunately Angelina did
not see this; in fact, she did not appear to be able to see anything;
none of them had a clue what the others were doing. The wind was
picking up; even at a distance Harry could hear the swishing, pounding sounds of the rain pummeling the surface of the lake.
Angelina kept them at it for nearly an hour before conceding defeat. She led her sodden and disgruntled team back into the changing
rooms, insisting that the practice had not been a waste of time, though
without any real conviction in her voice. Fred and George were looking particularly annoyed; both were bandy-legged and winced with
every movement. Harry could hear them complaining in low voices as
he toweled his hair dry.
“I think a few of mine have ruptured,” said Fred in a hollow voice.
“Mine haven’t,” said George, wincing. “They’re throbbing like mad
. . . feel bigger if anything . . .”
“OUCH!” said Harry.
He pressed the towel to his face, his eyes screwed tight with pain.
The scar on his forehead had seared again, more painfully than in
months.
“What’s up?” said several voices.
Harry emerged from behind his towel; the changing room was
blurred because he was not wearing his glasses; but he could still tell
that everyone’s face was turned toward him.
“Nothing,” he muttered, “I — poked myself in the eye, that’s
all. . . .”
But he gave Ron a significant look and the two of them hung back
as the rest of the team filed back outside, muffled in their cloaks, their
hats pulled low over their ears.
“What happened?” said Ron, the moment that Alicia had disappeared through the door. “Was it your scar?”
Harry nodded.
“But . . .” Looking scared, Ron strode across to the window and
stared out into the rain, “He — he can’t be near us now, can he?”
“No,” Harry muttered, sinking onto a bench and rubbing his
forehead. “He’s probably miles away. It hurt because . . . he’s . . .
angry.”
Harry had not meant to say that at all, and heard the words as
though a stranger had spoken them — yet he knew at once that they
were true. He did not know how he knew it, but he did; Voldemort,
wherever he was, whatever he was doing, was in a towering temper.
“Did you see him?” said Ron, looking horrified. “Did you . . . get a
vision, or something?”
Harry sat quite still, staring at his feet, allowing his mind and his
memory to relax in the aftermath of the pain. . . .
A confused tangle of shapes, a howling rush of voices . . .
“He wants something done, and it’s not happening fast enough,”
he said.
Again, he felt surprised to hear the words coming out of his mouth,
and yet quite certain that they were true.
“But . . . how do you know?” said Ron.
Harry shook his head and covered his eyes with his hands, pressing
down upon them with his palms. Little stars erupted in them. He felt
Ron sit down on the bench beside him and knew Ron was staring at
him.
“Is this what it was about last time?” said Ron in a hushed voice.
“When your scar hurt in Umbridge’s office? You-Know-Who was
angry?”
Harry shook his head.
“What is it, then?”
Harry was thinking himself back. He had been looking into Umbridge’s face. . . . His scar had hurt . . . and he had had that odd feeling in his stomach . . . a strange, leaping feeling . . . a happy feeling.
. . . But, of course, he had not recognized it for what it was, as he had
been feeling so miserable himself. . . .
“Last time, it was because he was pleased,” he said. “Really pleased.
He thought . . . something good was going to happen. And the night
before we came back to Hogwarts . . .” He thought back to the moment when his scar had hurt so badly in his and Ron’s bedroom in
Grimmauld Place. “He was furious. . . .”
He looked around at Ron, who was gaping at him.
“You could take over from Trelawney, mate,” he said in an awed
voice.
“I’m not making prophecies,” said Harry.
“No, you know what you’re doing?” Ron said, sounding both scared
and impressed. “Harry, you’re reading You-Know-Who’s mind. . . .”
“No,” said Harry, shaking his head. “It’s more like . . . his mood, I
suppose. I’m just getting flashes of what mood he’s in. . . . Dumbledore said something like this was happening last year. . . . He said that
when Voldemort was near me, or when he was feeling hatred, I could
tell. Well, now I’m feeling it when he’s pleased too. . . .”
There was a pause. The wind and rain lashed at the building.
“You’ve got to tell someone,” said Ron.
“I told Sirius last time.”
“Well, tell him about this time!”
“Can’t, can I?” said Harry grimly. “Umbridge is watching the owls
and the fires, remember?”
“Well then, Dumbledore —”
“I’ve just told you, he already knows,” said Harry shortly, getting to
his feet, taking his cloak off his peg, and swinging it around himself.
“There’s no point telling him again.”
Ron did up the fastening of his own cloak, watching Harry
thoughtfully.
“Dumbledore’d want to know,” he said.
Harry shrugged.
“C’mon . . . we’ve still got Silencing Charms to practice . . .”
They hurried back through the dark grounds, sliding and stumbling up the muddy lawns, not talking. Harry was thinking hard.
What was it that Voldemort wanted done that was not happening
quickly enough?
“He’s got other plans . . . plans he can put into operation very quietly
indeed . . . stuff he can only get by stealth . . . like a weapon. Something
he didn’t have last time.”
He had not thought about those words in weeks; he had been too
absorbed in what was going on at Hogwarts, too busy dwelling on the
ongoing battles with Umbridge, the injustice of all the Ministry interference. . . . But now they came back to him and made him wonder.
. . . Voldemort’s anger would make sense if he was no nearer laying
hands on the weapon, whatever it was. . . . Had the Order thwarted
him, stopped him from seizing it? Where was it kept? Who had it now?
“Mimbulus mimbletonia,” said Ron’s voice and Harry came back to
his senses just in time to clamber through the portrait hole into the
common room.
It appeared that Hermione had gone to bed early, leaving Crookshanks curled in a nearby chair and an assortment of knobbly, knitted
elf hats lying on a table by the fire. Harry was rather grateful that she
was not around because he did not much want to discuss his scar
hurting and have her urge him to go to Dumbledore too. Ron kept
throwing him anxious glances, but Harry pulled out his Potions book
and set to work to finish his essay, though he was only pretending to
concentrate and, by the time that Ron said he was going to bed too,
had written hardly anything.
Midnight came and went while Harry was reading and rereading a
passage about the uses of scurvy-grass, lovage, and sneezewort and not
taking in a word of it. . . .
These plantes are moste efficacious in the inflaming of the braine, and
are therefore much used in Confusing and Befuddlement Draughts, where
the wizard is desirous of producing hot-headedness and recklessness. . . .
. . . Hermione said Sirius was becoming reckless cooped up in
Grimmauld Place. . . .
. . . moste efficacious in the inflaming of the braine, and are therefore
much used . . .
. . . the Daily Prophet would think his brain was inflamed if they
found out that he knew what Voldemort was feeling . . .
. . . therefore much used in Confusing and Befuddlement Draughts . . .
. . . confusing was the word, all right; why did he know what Voldemort was feeling? What was this weird connection between them,
which Dumbledore had never been able to explain satisfactorily?
. . . where the wizard is desirous . . .
. . . how he would like to sleep . . .
. . . of producing hot-headedness . . .
. . . It was warm and comfortable in his armchair before the fire,
with the rain still beating heavily on the windowpanes and Crookshanks purring and the crackling of the flames. . . .
The book slipped from Harry’s slack grip and landed with a dull
thud on the hearthrug. His head fell sideways. . . .
He was walking once more along a windowless corridor, his footsteps echoing in the silence. As the door at the end of the passage
loomed larger his heart beat fast with excitement. . . . If he could only
open it . . . enter beyond . . .
He stretched out his hand. . . . His fingertips were inches from it. . . .
“Harry Potter, sir!”
He awoke with a start. The candles had all been extinguished in the
common room, but there was something moving close by.
“Whozair?” said Harry, sitting upright in his chair. The fire was almost extinguished, the room very dark.
“Dobby has your owl, sir!” said a squeaky voice.
“Dobby?” said Harry thickly, peering through the gloom toward
the source of the voice.
Dobby the house-elf was standing beside the table on which
Hermione had left her half a dozen knitted hats. His large, pointed
ears were now sticking out from beneath what looked like all the hats
that Hermione had ever knitted; he was wearing one on top of the
other, so that his head seemed elongated by two or three feet, and on
the very topmost bobble sat Hedwig, hooting serenely and obviously
cured.
“Dobby volunteered to return Harry Potter’s owl!” said the elf
squeakily, with a look of positive adoration on his face. “Professor
Grubbly-Plank says she is all well now, sir!”
He sank into a deep bow so that his pencil-like nose brushed the
threadbare surface of the hearthrug and Hedwig gave an indignant
hoot and fluttered onto the arm of Harry’s chair.
“Thanks, Dobby!” said Harry, stroking Hedwig’s head and blinking
hard, trying to rid himself of the image of the door in his dream. . . .
It had been very vivid. . . . Looking back at Dobby, he noticed that the
elf was also wearing several scarves and innumerable socks, so that his
feet looked far too big for his body.
“Er . . . have you been taking all the clothes Hermione’s been leaving out?”
“Oh no, sir,” said Dobby happily, “Dobby has been taking some for
Winky too, sir.”
“Yeah, how is Winky?” asked Harry.
Dobby’s ears drooped slightly.
“Winky is still drinking lots, sir,” he said sadly, his enormous round
green eyes, large as tennis balls, downcast. “She still does not care for
clothes, Harry Potter. Nor do the other house-elves. None of them
will clean Gryffindor Tower anymore, not with the hats and socks hidden everywhere, they finds them insulting, sir. Dobby does it all himself, sir, but Dobby does not mind, sir, for he always hopes to meet
Harry Potter and tonight, sir, he has got his wish!” Dobby sank into a
deep bow again. “But Harry Potter does not seem happy,” Dobby
went on, straightening up again and looking timidly at Harry.
“Dobby heard him muttering in his sleep. Was Harry Potter having
bad dreams?”
“Not really bad,” said Harry, yawning and rubbing his eyes. “I’ve
had worse.”
The elf surveyed Harry out of his vast, orblike eyes. Then he said
very seriously, his ears drooping, “Dobby wishes he could help Harry
Potter, for Harry Potter set Dobby free and Dobby is much, much
happier now. . . .”
Harry smiled.
“You can’t help me, Dobby, but thanks for the offer. . . .”
He bent and picked up his Potions book. He’d have to try and finish the essay tomorrow. He closed the book and as he did so the firelight illuminated the thin white scars on the back of his hand — the
result of his detention with Umbridge.
“Wait a moment — there is something you can do for me, Dobby,”
said Harry slowly.
The elf looked around, beaming.
“Name it, Harry Potter, sir!”
“I need to find a place where twenty-eight people can practice Defense Against the Dark Arts without being discovered by any of the
teachers. Especially,” Harry clenched his hand on the book, so that
the scars shone pearly white, “Professor Umbridge.”
He expected the elf’s smile to vanish, his ears to droop; he expected
him to say that this was impossible, or else that he would try, but his
hopes were not high. . . . What he had not expected was for Dobby to
give a little skip, his ears waggling happily, and clap his hands together.
“Dobby knows the perfect place, sir!” he said happily. “Dobby
heard tell of it from the other house-elves when he came to Hogwarts,
sir. It is known by us as the Come and Go Room, sir, or else as the
Room of Requirement!”
“Why?” said Harry curiously.
“Because it is a room that a person can only enter,” said Dobby seriously, “when they have real need of it. Sometimes it is there, and
sometimes it is not, but when it appears, it is always equipped for the
seeker’s needs. Dobby has used it, sir,” said the elf, dropping his voice
and looking guilty, “when Winky has been very drunk. He has hidden
her in the Room of Requirement and he has found antidotes to
butterbeer there, and a nice elf-sized bed to settle her on while she
sleeps it off, sir. . . . And Dobby knows Mr. Filch has found extra
cleaning materials there when he has run short, sir, and —”
“— and if you really needed a bathroom,” said Harry, suddenly remembering something Dumbledore had said at the Yule Ball the previous Christmas, “would it fill itself with chamber pots?”
“Dobby expects so, sir,” said Dobby, nodding earnestly. “It is a
most amazing room, sir.”
“How many people know about it?” said Harry, sitting up straighter
in his chair.
“Very few, sir. Mostly people stumbles across it when they needs it,
sir, but often they never finds it again, for they do not know that it is
always there waiting to be called into service, sir.”
“It sounds brilliant,” said Harry, his heart racing. “It sounds perfect, Dobby. When can you show me where it is?”
“Anytime, Harry Potter, sir,” said Dobby, looking delighted at
Harry’s enthusiasm. “We could go now, if you like!”
For a moment Harry was tempted to go now; he was halfway out
of his seat, intending to hurry upstairs for his Invisibility Cloak when,
not for the first time, a voice very much like Hermione’s whispered in
his ear: reckless. It was, after all, very late, he was exhausted and had
Snape’s essay to finish.
“Not tonight, Dobby,” said Harry reluctantly, sinking back into his
chair. “This is really important. . . . I don’t want to blow it, it’ll need
proper planning. . . . Listen, can you just tell me exactly where this
Room of Requirement is and how to get in there?”
Their robes billowed and swirled around them as they splashed across
the flooded vegetable patch to double Herbology, where they could
hardly hear what Professor Sprout was saying over the hammering of
raindrops hard as hailstones on the greenhouse roof. The afternoon’s
Care of Magical Creatures lesson was to be relocated from the stormswept grounds to a free classroom on the ground floor and, to their
intense relief, Angelina sought out her team at lunch to tell them that
Quidditch practice was canceled.
“Good,” said Harry quietly, when she told him, “because we’ve
found somewhere to have our first Defense meeting. Tonight, eight
o’clock, seventh floor opposite that tapestry of Barnabas the Barmy
being clubbed by those trolls. Can you tell Katie and Alicia?”
She looked slightly taken aback but promised to tell the others;
Harry returned hungrily to his sausages and mash. When he looked
up to take a drink of pumpkin juice, he found Hermione watching
him.
“What?” he said thickly.
“Well . . . it’s just that Dobby’s plans aren’t always that safe. Don’t
you remember when he lost you all the bones in your arm?”
“This room isn’t just some mad idea of Dobby’s; Dumbledore
knows about it too, he mentioned it to me at the Yule Ball.”
Hermione’s expression cleared.
“Dumbledore told you about it?”
“Just in passing,” said Harry, shrugging.
“Oh well, that’s all right then,” said Hermione briskly and she
raised no more objections.
Together with Ron they had spent most of the day seeking out
those people who had signed their names to the list in the Hog’s Head
and telling them where to meet that evening. Somewhat to Harry’s
disappointment, it was Ginny who managed to find Cho Chang and
her friend first; however, by the end of dinner he was confident that
the news had been passed to every one of the twenty-five people who
had turned up in the Hog’s Head.
At half-past seven Harry, Ron, and Hermione left the Gryffindor
common room, Harry clutching a certain piece of aged parchment in
his hand. Fifth years were allowed to be out in the corridors until nine
o’clock, but all three of them kept looking around nervously as they
made their way up to the seventh floor.
“Hold it,” said Harry warningly, unfolding the piece of parchment
at the top of the last staircase, tapping it with his wand, and muttering, “I solemnly swear that I am up to no good.”
A map of Hogwarts appeared upon the blank surface of the parchment. Tiny black moving dots, labeled with names, showed where
various people were.
“Filch is on the second floor,” said Harry, holding the map close to
his eyes and scanning it closely, “and Mrs. Norris is on the fourth.”
“And Umbridge?” said Hermione anxiously.
“In her office,” said Harry, pointing. “Okay, let’s go.”
They hurried along the corridor to the place Dobby had described
to Harry, a stretch of blank wall opposite an enormous tapestry depicting Barnabas the Barmy’s foolish attempt to train trolls for the
ballet.
“Okay,” said Harry quietly, while a moth-eaten troll paused in his
relentless clubbing of the would-be ballet teacher to watch. “Dobby
said to walk past this bit of wall three times, concentrating hard on
what we need.”
They did so, turning sharply at the window just beyond the blank
stretch of wall, then at the man-size vase on its other side. Ron had
screwed up his eyes in concentration, Hermione was whispering
something under her breath, Harry’s fists were clenched as he stared
ahead of him.
We need somewhere to learn to fight. . . . he thought. Just give us a
place to practice . . . somewhere they can’t find us . . .
“Harry,” said Hermione sharply, as they wheeled around after their
third walk past.
A highly polished door had appeared in the wall. Ron was staring
at it, looking slightly wary. Harry reached out, seized the brass handle,
pulled open the door, and led the way into a spacious room lit with
flickering torches like those that illuminated the dungeons eight floors
below.
The walls were lined with wooden bookcases, and instead of chairs
there were large silk cushions on the floor. A set of shelves at the far
end of the room carried a range of instruments such as Sneakoscopes,
Secrecy Sensors, and a large, cracked Foe-Glass that Harry was sure
had hung, the previous year, in the fake Moody’s office.
“These will be good when we’re practicing Stunning,” said Ron
enthusiastically, prodding one of the cushions with his foot.
“And just look at these books!” said Hermione excitedly, running a
finger along the spines of the large leather-bound tomes. “A Compendium of Common Curses and Their Counter-Actions . . . The Dark
Arts Outsmarted . . . Self-Defensive Spellwork . . . wow . . .” She looked
around at Harry, her face glowing, and he saw that the presence of
hundreds of books had finally convinced Hermione that what they
were doing was right. “Harry, this is wonderful, there’s everything we
need here!”
And without further ado she slid Jinxes for the Jinxed from its shelf,
sank onto the nearest cushion, and began to read.
There was a gentle knock on the door. Harry looked around;
Ginny, Neville, Lavender, Parvati, and Dean had arrived.
“Whoa,” said Dean, staring around, impressed. “What is this
place?”
Harry began to explain, but before he had finished more people
had arrived, and he had to start all over again. By the time eight
o’clock arrived, every cushion was occupied. Harry moved across to
the door and turned the key protruding from the lock; it clicked in a
satisfyingly loud way and everybody fell silent, looking at him.
Hermione carefully marked her page of Jinxes for the Jinxed and set the
book aside.
“Well,” said Harry, slightly nervously. “This is the place we’ve
found for practices, and you’ve — er — obviously found it okay —”
“It’s fantastic!” said Cho, and several people murmured their
agreement.
“It’s bizarre,” said Fred, frowning around at it. “We once hid from
Filch in here, remember, George? But it was just a broom cupboard
then. . . .”
“Hey, Harry, what’s this stuff?” asked Dean from the rear of the
room, indicating the Sneakoscopes and the Foe-Glass.
“Dark Detectors,” said Harry, stepping between the cushions to
reach them. “Basically they all show when Dark wizards or enemies
are around, but you don’t want to rely on them too much, they can be
fooled. . . .”
He gazed for a moment into the cracked Foe-Glass; shadowy figures were moving around inside it, though none was recognizable. He
turned his back on it.
“Well, I’ve been thinking about the sort of stuff we ought to do first
and — er —” He noticed a raised hand. “What, Hermione?”
“I think we ought to elect a leader,” said Hermione.
“Harry’s leader,” said Cho at once, looking at Hermione as though
she were mad, and Harry’s stomach did yet another back flip.
“Yes, but I think we ought to vote on it properly,” said Hermione,
unperturbed. “It makes it formal and it gives him authority. So —
everyone who thinks Harry ought to be our leader?”
Everybody put up their hands, even Zacharias Smith, though he
did it very halfheartedly.
“Er — right, thanks,” said Harry, who could feel his face burning.
“And — what, Hermione?”
“I also think we ought to have a name,” she said brightly, her hand
still in the air. “It would promote a feeling of team spirit and unity,
don’t you think?”
“Can we be the Anti-Umbridge League?” said Angelina hopefully.
“Or the Ministry of Magic Are Morons Group?” suggested Fred.
“I was thinking,” said Hermione, frowning at Fred, “more of a
name that didn’t tell everyone what we were up to, so we can refer to
it safely outside meetings.”
“The Defense Association?” said Cho. “The D.A. for short, so nobody knows what we’re talking about?”
“Yeah, the D.A.’s good,” said Ginny. “Only let’s make it stand for
Dumbledore’s Army because that’s the Ministry’s worst fear, isn’t it?”
There was a good deal of appreciative murmuring and laughter at
this.
“All in favor of the D.A.?” said Hermione bossily, kneeling up on
her cushion to count. “That’s a majority — motion passed!”
She pinned the piece of paper with all of their names on it on the
wall and wrote  across the top in large
letters.
“Right,” said Harry, when she had sat down again, “shall we get
practicing then? I was thinking, the first thing we should do is Expelliarmus, you know, the Disarming Charm. I know it’s pretty basic but
I’ve found it really useful —”
“Oh please,” said Zacharias Smith, rolling his eyes and folding his
arms. “I don’t think Expelliarmus is exactly going to help us against
You-Know-Who, do you?”
“I’ve used it against him,” said Harry quietly. “It saved my life last
June.”
Smith opened his mouth stupidly. The rest of the room was very
quiet.
“But if you think it’s beneath you, you can leave,” Harry said.
Smith did not move. Nor did anybody else.
“Okay,” said Harry, his mouth slightly drier than usual with all
those eyes upon him, “I reckon we should all divide into pairs and
practice.”
It felt very odd to be issuing instructions, but not nearly as odd as
seeing them followed. Everybody got to their feet at once and divided
up. Predictably, Neville was left partnerless.
“You can practice with me,” Harry told him. “Right — on the
count of three, then — one, two, three —”
The room was suddenly full of shouts of “Expelliarmus!”: Wands
flew in all directions, missed spells hit books on shelves and sent them
flying into the air. Harry was too quick for Neville, whose wand went
spinning out of his hand, hit the ceiling in a shower of sparks, and
landed with a clatter on top of a bookshelf, from which Harry retrieved it with a Summoning Charm. Glancing around he thought he
had been right to suggest that they practice the basics first; there was
a lot of shoddy spellwork going on; many people were not succeeding
in disarming their opponents at all, but merely causing them to jump
backward a few paces or wince as the feeble spell whooshed over
them.
“Expelliarmus!” said Neville, and Harry, caught unawares, felt his
wand fly out of his hand.
“I DID IT!” said Neville gleefully. “I’ve never done it before — I
DID IT!”
“Good one!” said Harry encouragingly, deciding not to point out
that in a real duel situation Neville’s opponent was unlikely to be staring in the opposite direction with his wand held loosely at his side.
“Listen, Neville, can you take it in turns to practice with Ron and
Hermione for a couple of minutes so I can walk around and see how
the rest are doing?”
Harry moved off into the middle of the room. Something very odd
was happening to Zacharias Smith; every time he opened his mouth
to disarm Anthony Goldstein, his own wand would fly out of his
hand, yet Anthony did not seem to be making a sound. Harry did not
have to look far for the solution of the mystery, however; Fred and
George were several feet from Smith and taking it in turns to point
their wands at his back.
“Sorry, Harry,” said George hastily, when Harry caught his eye.
“Couldn’t resist . . .”
Harry walked around the other pairs, trying to correct those who
were doing the spell wrong. Ginny was teamed with Michael Corner;
she was doing very well, whereas Michael was either very bad or unwilling to jinx her. Ernie Macmillan was flourishing his wand unnecessarily, giving his partner time to get in under his guard; the Creevey
brothers were enthusiastic but erratic and mainly responsible for all
the books leaping off the shelves around them. Luna Lovegood was
similarly patchy, occasionally sending Justin Finch-Fletchley’s wand
spinning out of his hand, at other times merely causing his hair to
stand on end.
“Okay, stop!” Harry shouted. “Stop! STOP !”
I need a whistle, he thought, and immediately spotted one lying on
top of the nearest row of books. He caught it up and blew hard. Everyone lowered their wands.
“That wasn’t bad,” said Harry, “but there’s definite room for improvement.” Zacharias Smith glared at him. “Let’s try again. . . .”
He moved off around the room again, stopping here and there to
make suggestions. Slowly the general performance improved. He
avoided going near Cho and her friend for a while, but after walking
twice around every other pair in the room felt he could not ignore
them any longer.
“Oh no,” said Cho rather wildly as he approached. “Expelliarmious!
I mean, Expellimellius! I — oh, sorry, Marietta!”
Her curly-haired friend’s sleeve had caught fire; Marietta extinguished it with her own wand and glared at Harry as though it was his
fault.
“You made me nervous, I was doing all right before then!” Cho told
Harry ruefully.
“That was quite good,” Harry lied, but when she raised her eye-
brows he said, “Well, no, it was lousy, but I know you can do it properly, I was watching from over there. . . .”
She laughed. Her friend Marietta looked at them rather sourly and
turned away.
“Don’t mind her,” Cho muttered. “She doesn’t really want to be
here but I made her come with me. Her parents have forbidden her to
do anything that might upset Umbridge, you see — her mum works
for the Ministry.”
“What about your parents?” asked Harry.
“Well, they’ve forbidden me to get on the wrong side of Umbridge
too,” said Cho, drawing herself up proudly. “But if they think I’m not
going to fight You-Know-Who after what happened to Cedric —”
She broke off, looking rather confused, and an awkward silence fell
between them; Terry Boot’s wand went whizzing past Harry’s ear and
hit Alicia Spinnet hard on the nose.
“Well, my father is very supportive of any anti-Ministry action!”
said Luna Lovegood proudly from just behind Harry; evidently she
had been eavesdropping on his conversation while Justin FinchFletchley attempted to disentangle himself from the robes that had
flown up over his head. “He’s always saying he’d believe anything of
Fudge, I mean, the number of goblins Fudge has had assassinated!
And of course he uses the Department of Mysteries to develop terrible
poisons, which he feeds secretly to anybody who disagrees with him.
And then there’s his Umgubular Slashkilter —”
“Don’t ask,” Harry muttered to Cho as she opened her mouth,
looking puzzled. She giggled.
“Hey, Harry,” Hermione called from the other end of the room,
“have you checked the time?”
He looked down at his watch and received a shock — it was already ten past nine, which meant they needed to get back to their
common rooms immediately or risk being caught and punished by
Filch for being out-of-bounds. He blew his whistle; everybody
stopped shouting, “Expelliarmus!” and the last couple of wands clattered to the floor.
“Well, that was pretty good,” said Harry, “but we’ve overrun, we’d
better leave it here. Same time, same place next week?”
“Sooner!” said Dean Thomas eagerly and many people nodded in
agreement.
Angelina, however, said quickly, “The Quidditch season’s about to
start, we need team practices too!”
“Let’s say next Wednesday night, then,” said Harry, “and we can
decide on additional meetings then. . . . Come on, we’d better get
going. . . .”
He pulled out the Marauder’s Map again and checked it carefully
for signs of teachers on the seventh floor. He let them all leave in
threes and fours, watching their tiny dots anxiously to see that they returned safely to their dormitories: the Hufflepuffs to the basement
corridor that also led to the kitchens, the Ravenclaws to a tower on the
west side of the castle, and the Gryffindors along the corridor to the
seventh floor and the Fat Lady’s portrait.
“That was really, really good, Harry,” said Hermione, when finally
it was just her, Harry, and Ron left.
“Yeah, it was!” said Ron enthusiastically, as they slipped out of the
door and watched it melt back into stone behind them. “Did you see
me disarm Hermione, Harry?”
“Only once,” said Hermione, stung. “I got you loads more than
you got me —”
“I did not only get you once, I got you at least three times —”
“Well, if you’re counting the one where you tripped over your own
feet and knocked the wand out of my hand —”
They argued all the way back to the common room, but Harry was
not listening to them. He had one eye on the Marauder’s Map, but he
was also thinking of how Cho had said he made her nervous. . . .
C H A P T E R N I N E T E E N
THE LION AND THE SERPENT

Harry felt as though he were carrying some kind of talisman
inside his chest over the following two weeks, a glowing secret that supported him through Umbridge’s classes and even made it
possible for him to smile blandly as he looked into her horrible
bulging eyes. He and the D.A. were resisting her under her very nose,
doing the very thing that she and the Ministry most feared, and whenever he was supposed to be reading Wilbert Slinkhard’s book during
her lessons he dwelled instead on satisfying memories of their most recent meetings, remembering how Neville had successfully disarmed
Hermione, how Colin Creevey had mastered the Impediment Jinx after three meetings’ hard effort, how Parvati Patil had produced such a
good Reductor Curse that she had reduced the table carrying all the
Sneakoscopes to dust.
He was finding it almost impossible to fix a regular night of the
week for D.A. meetings, as they had to accommodate three separate
Quidditch teams’ practices, which were often rearranged depending on
the weather conditions; but Harry was not sorry about this, he had a
feeling that it was probably better to keep the timing of their meetings
unpredictable. If anyone was watching them, it would be hard to make
out a pattern.
Hermione soon devised a very clever method of communicating
the time and date of the next meeting to all the members in case they
needed to change it at short notice, because it would look so suspicious if people from different Houses were seen crossing the Great
Hall to talk to each other too often. She gave each of the members of
the D.A. a fake Galleon (Ron became very excited when he saw the
basket at first, convinced that she was actually giving out gold).
“You see the numerals around the edge of the coins?” Hermione
said, holding one up for examination at the end of their fourth meeting. The coin gleamed fat and yellow in the light from the torches.
“On real Galleons that’s just a serial number referring to the goblin
who cast the coin. On these fake coins, though, the numbers will
change to reflect the time and date of the next meeting. The coins will
grow hot when the date changes, so if you’re carrying them in a pocket
you’ll be able to feel them. We take one each, and when Harry sets the
date of the next meeting he’ll change the numbers on his coin, and because I’ve put a Protean Charm on them, they’ll all change to mimic
his.”
A blank silence greeted Hermione’s words. She looked around at all
the faces upturned to her, rather disconcerted.
“Well — I thought it was a good idea,” she said uncertainly, “I
mean, even if Umbridge asked us to turn out our pockets, there’s
nothing fishy about carrying a Galleon, is there? But . . . well, if you
don’t want to use them . . .”
“You can do a Protean Charm?” said Terry Boot.
“Yes,” said Hermione.
“But that’s . . . that’s N.E.W.T. standard, that is,” he said weakly.
“Oh,” said Hermione, trying to look modest. “Oh . . . well . . . yes,
I suppose it is. . . .”
“How come you’re not in Ravenclaw?” he demanded, staring at
Hermione with something close to wonder. “With brains like yours?”
“Well, the Sorting Hat did seriously consider putting me in Ravenclaw during my Sorting,” said Hermione brightly, “but it decided on
Gryffindor in the end. So does that mean we’re using the Galleons?”
There was a murmur of assent and everybody moved forward to
collect one from the basket. Harry looked sideways at Hermione.
“You know what these remind me of?”
“No, what’s that?”
“The Death Eaters’ scars. Voldemort touches one of them, and all
their scars burn, and they know they’ve got to join him.”
“Well . . . yes,” said Hermione quietly. “That is where I got the idea
. . . but you’ll notice I decided to engrave the date on bits of metal
rather than on our members’ skin. . . .”
“Yeah . . . I prefer your way,” said Harry, grinning, as he slipped his
Galleon into his pocket. “I suppose the only danger with these is that
we might accidentally spend them.”
“Fat chance,” said Ron, who was examining his own fake Galleon
with a slightly mournful air. “I haven’t got any real Galleons to confuse it with.”
As the first Quidditch match of the season, Gryffindor versus
Slytherin, drew nearer, their D.A. meetings were put on hold because
Angelina insisted on almost daily practices. The fact that the Quidditch Cup had not been held for so long added considerably to the interest and excitement surrounding the forthcoming game. The
Ravenclaws and Hufflepuffs were taking a lively interest in the outcome, for they, of course, would be playing both teams over the coming year; and the Heads of House of the competing teams, though
they attempted to disguise it under a decent pretense of sportsmanship, were determined to see their side’s victory. Harry realized how
much Professor McGonagall cared about beating Slytherin when she
abstained from giving them homework in the week leading up to the
match.
“I think you’ve got enough to be getting on with at the moment,”
she said loftily. Nobody could quite believe their ears until she looked
directly at Harry and Ron and said grimly, “I’ve become accustomed
to seeing the Quidditch Cup in my study, boys, and I really don’t
want to have to hand it over to Professor Snape, so use the extra time to
practice, won’t you?”
Snape was no less obviously partisan: He had booked the Quidditch pitch for Slytherin practice so often that the Gryffindors had
difficulty getting on it to play. He was also turning a deaf ear to the
many reports of Slytherin attempts to hex Gryffindor players in the
corridors. When Alicia Spinnet turned up in the hospital wing with
her eyebrows growing so thick and fast that they obscured her vision
and obstructed her mouth, Snape insisted that she must have attempted a Hair-Thickening Charm on herself and refused to listen to
the fourteen eyewitnesses who insisted that they had seen the
Slytherin Keeper, Miles Bletchley, hit her from behind with a jinx
while she worked in the library.
Harry felt optimistic about Gryffindor’s chances; they had, after all,
never lost to Malfoy’s team. Admittedly Ron was still not performing
to Wood’s standard, but he was working extremely hard to improve.
His greatest weakness was a tendency to lose confidence when he
made a blunder; if he let in one goal he became flustered and was
therefore likely to miss more. On the other hand, Harry had seen Ron
make some truly spectacular saves when he was on form: During one
memorable practice, he had hung one-handed from his broom and
kicked the Quaffle so hard away from the goal hoop that it soared the
length of the pitch and through the center hoop at the other end. The
rest of the team felt this save compared favorably with one made recently by Barry Ryan, the Irish International Keeper, against Poland’s
top Chaser, Ladislaw Zamojski. Even Fred had said that Ron might
yet make him and George proud, and that they were seriously considering admitting that he was related to them, something he assured
Ron they had been trying to deny for four years.
The only thing really worrying Harry was how much Ron was allowing the tactics of the Slytherin team to upset him before they even
got onto the pitch. Harry, of course, had endured their snide comments for more than four years, so whispers of, “Hey, Potty, I heard
Warrington’s sworn to knock you off your broom on Saturday,” far
from chilling his blood, made him laugh. “Warrington’s aim’s so pathetic I’d be more worried if he was aiming for the person next to me,”
he retorted, which made Ron and Hermione laugh and wiped the
smirk off Pansy Parkinson’s face.
But Ron had never endured a relentless campaign of insults, jeers, and
intimidation. When Slytherins, some of them seventh years and considerably larger than he was, muttered as they passed in the corridors, “Got
your bed booked in the hospital wing, Weasley?” he did not laugh, but
turned a delicate shade of green. When Draco Malfoy imitated Ron
dropping the Quaffle (which he did whenever they were within sight of
each other), Ron’s ears glowed red and his hands shook so badly that he
was likely to drop whatever he was holding at the time too.
October extinguished itself in a rush of howling winds and driving
rain and November arrived, cold as frozen iron, with hard frosts every
morning and icy drafts that bit at exposed hands and faces. The skies
and the ceiling of the Great Hall turned a pale, pearly gray, the mountains around Hogwarts became snowcapped, and the temperature in
the castle dropped so far that many students wore their thick protective dragon skin gloves in the corridors between lessons.
The morning of the match dawned bright and cold. When Harry
awoke he looked around at Ron’s bed and saw him sitting bolt upright, his arms around his knees, staring fixedly into space.
“You all right?” said Harry.
Ron nodded but did not speak. Harry was reminded forcibly of the
time that Ron had accidentally put a slug-vomiting charm on himself.
He looked just as pale and sweaty as he had done then, not to mention as reluctant to open his mouth.
“You just need some breakfast,” Harry said bracingly. “C’mon.”
The Great Hall was filling up fast when they arrived, the talk
louder and the mood more exuberant than usual. As they passed the
Slytherin table there was an upsurge of noise; Harry looked around
and saw that nearly everyone there was wearing, in addition to the
usual green-and-silver scarves and hats, silver badges in the shape of
what seemed to be crowns. For some reason many of them waved at
Ron, laughing uproariously. Harry tried to see what was written on
the badges as he walked by, but he was too concerned to get Ron past
their table quickly to linger long enough to read them.
They received a rousing welcome at the Gryffindor table, where
everyone was wearing red and gold, but far from raising Ron’s spirits
the cheers seemed to sap the last of his morale; he collapsed onto the
nearest bench looking as though he were facing his final meal.
“I must’ve been mental to do this,” he said in a croaky whisper.
“Mental.”
“Don’t be thick,” said Harry firmly, passing him a choice of cereals.
“You’re going to be fine. It’s normal to be nervous.”
“I’m rubbish,” croaked Ron. “I’m lousy. I can’t play to save my life.
What was I thinking?”
“Get a grip,” said Harry sternly. “Look at that save you made with
your foot the other day, even Fred and George said it was brilliant —”
Ron turned a tortured face to Harry.
“That was an accident,” he whispered miserably. “I didn’t mean to
do it — I slipped off my broom when none of you were looking and
I was trying to get back on and I kicked the Quaffle by accident.”
“Well,” said Harry, recovering quickly from this unpleasant surprise, “a few more accidents like that and the game’s in the bag, isn’t it?”
Hermione and Ginny sat down opposite them wearing red-andgold scarves, gloves, and rosettes.
“How’re you feeling?” Ginny asked Ron, who was now staring into
the dregs of milk at the bottom of his empty cereal bowl as though seriously considering attempting to drown himself in them.
“He’s just nervous,” said Harry.
“Well, that’s a good sign, I never feel you perform as well in exams
if you’re not a bit nervous,” said Hermione heartily.
“Hello,” said a vague and dreamy voice from behind them. Harry
looked up: Luna Lovegood had drifted over from the Ravenclaw table.
Many people were staring at her and a few openly laughing and pointing; she had managed to procure a hat shaped like a life-size lion’s
head, which was perched precariously on her head.
“I’m supporting Gryffindor,” said Luna, pointing unnecessarily at
her hat. “Look what it does. . . .”
She reached up and tapped the hat with her wand. It opened its
mouth wide and gave an extremely realistic roar that made everyone
in the vicinity jump.
“It’s good, isn’t it?” said Luna happily. “I wanted to have it chewing
up a serpent to represent Slytherin, you know, but there wasn’t time.
Anyway . . . good luck, Ronald!”
She drifted away. They had not quite recovered from the shock of
Luna’s hat before Angelina came hurrying toward them, accompanied
by Katie and Alicia, whose eyebrows had mercifully been returned to
normal by Madam Pomfrey.
“When you’re ready,” she said, “we’re going to go straight down to
the pitch, check out conditions and change.”
“We’ll be there in a bit,” Harry assured her. “Ron’s just got to have
some breakfast.”
It became clear after ten minutes, however, that Ron was not capable of eating anything more and Harry thought it best to get him
down to the changing rooms. As they rose from the table, Hermione
got up too, and taking Harry’s arm, she drew him to one side.
“Don’t let Ron see what’s on those Slytherins’ badges,” she whispered urgently.
Harry looked questioningly at her, but she shook her head warningly; Ron had just ambled over to them, looking lost and desperate.
“Good luck, Ron,” said Hermione, standing on tiptoe and kissing
him on the cheek. “And you, Harry —”
Ron seemed to come to himself slightly as they walked back across
the Great Hall. He touched the spot on his face where Hermione had
kissed him, looking puzzled, as though he was not quite sure what had
just happened. He seemed too distracted to notice much around him,
but Harry cast a curious glance at the crown-shaped badges as they
passed the Slytherin table, and this time he made out the words etched
onto them:
With an unpleasant feeling that this could mean nothing good, he
hurried Ron across the entrance hall, down the stone steps, and out
into the icy air.
The frosty grass crunched under their feet as they hurried down the
sloping lawns toward the stadium. There was no wind at all and the
sky was a uniform pearly white, which meant that visibility would be
good without the drawback of direct sunlight in the eyes. Harry
pointed out these encouraging factors to Ron as they walked, but he
was not sure that Ron was listening.
Angelina had changed already and was talking to the rest of the
team when they entered. Harry and Ron pulled on their robes (Ron
attempted to do his up back-to-front for several minutes before Alicia
took pity on him and went to help) and then sat down to listen to the
pre-match talk while the babble of voices outside grew steadily louder
as the crowd came pouring out of the castle toward the pitch.
“Okay, I’ve only just found out the final lineup for Slytherin,” said
Angelina, consulting a piece of parchment. “Last year’s Beaters, Derrick and Bole, have left now, but it looks as though Montague’s replaced them with the usual gorillas, rather than anyone who can fly
particularly well. They’re two blokes called Crabbe and Goyle, I don’t
know much about them —”
“We do,” said Harry and Ron together.
“Well, they don’t look bright enough to tell one end of a broom
from another,” said Angelina, pocketing her parchment, “but then I
was always surprised Derrick and Bole managed to find their way
onto the pitch without signposts.”
“Crabbe and Goyle are in the same mold,” Harry assured her.
They could hear hundreds of footsteps mounting the banked
benches of the spectators’ stands now. Some people were singing,
though Harry could not make out the words. He was starting to feel
nervous, but he knew his butterflies were as nothing to Ron’s, who
was clutching his stomach and staring straight ahead again, his jaw set
and his complexion pale gray.
“It’s time,” said Angelina in a hushed voice, looking at her watch.
“C’mon everyone . . . good luck.”
The team rose, shouldered their brooms, and marched in single file
out of the changing room and into the dazzling sunlight. A roar of
sound greeted them in which Harry could still hear singing, though it
was muffled by the cheers and whistles.
The Slytherin team were standing waiting for them. They too were
wearing those silver crown-shaped badges. The new captain, Montague, was built along the same lines as Dudley, with massive forearms
like hairy hams. Behind him lurked Crabbe and Goyle, almost as
large, blinking stupidly in the sunlight, swinging their new Beaters’
bats. Malfoy stood to one side, the sunlight gleaming on his whiteblond head. He caught Harry’s eye and smirked, tapping the crownshaped badge on his chest.
“Captains shake hands,” ordered the umpire, Madam Hooch, as
Angelina and Montague reached each other. Harry could tell that
Montague was trying to crush Angelina’s fingers, though she did not
wince. “Mount your brooms. . . .”
Madam Hooch placed her whistle in her mouth and blew.
The balls were released and the fourteen players shot upward; out
of the corner of his eye Harry saw Ron streak off toward the goal
hoops. He zoomed higher, dodging a Bludger, and set off on a wide
lap of the pitch, gazing around for a glint of gold; on the other side of
the stadium, Draco Malfoy was doing exactly the same.
“And it’s Johnson, Johnson with the Quaffle, what a player that girl
is, I’ve been saying it for years but she still won’t go out with me —”
“JORDAN!” yelled Professor McGonagall.
“Just a fun fact, Professor, adds a bit of interest — and she’s ducked
Warrington, she’s passed Montague, she’s — ouch — been hit from
behind by a Bludger from Crabbe. . . . Montague catches the Quaffle,
Montague heading back up the pitch and — nice Bludger there from
George Weasley, that’s a Bludger to the head for Montague, he drops
the Quaffle, caught by Katie Bell, Katie Bell of Gryffindor reverse
passes to Alicia Spinnet and Spinnet’s away —”
Lee Jordan’s commentary rang through the stadium and Harry listened as hard as he could through the wind whistling in his ears and
the din of the crowd, all yelling and booing and singing —
“— dodges Warrington, avoids a Bludger — close call, Alicia —
and the crowd are loving this, just listen to them, what’s that they’re
singing?”
And as Lee paused to listen the song rose loud and clear from the
sea of green and silver in the Slytherin section of the stands:
Weasley cannot save a thing,
He cannot block a single ring,
That’s why Slytherins all sing:
Weasley is our King.
Weasley was born in a bin,
He always lets the Quaffle in,
Weasley will make sure we win,
Weasley is our King.
“— and Alicia passes back to Angelina!” Lee shouted, and as Harry
swerved, his insides boiling at what he had just heard, he knew Lee
was trying to drown out the sound of the singing. “Come on now,
Angelina — looks like she’s got just the Keeper to beat! — SHE
SHOOTS — SHE — aaaah . . .”
Bletchley, the Slytherin Keeper, had saved the goal; he threw the
Quaffle to Warrington who sped off with it, zigzagging in between
Alicia and Katie; the singing from below grew louder and louder as he
drew nearer and nearer Ron —
Weasley is our King,
Weasley is our King,
He always lets the Quaffle in,
Weasley is our King.
Harry could not help himself: Abandoning his search for the Snitch,
he turned his Firebolt toward Ron, a lone figure at the far end of the
pitch, hovering before the three goal hoops while the massive Warrington pelted toward him . . .
“— and it’s Warrington with the Quaffle, Warrington heading for
goal, he’s out of Bludger range with just the Keeper ahead —”
A great swell of song rose from the Slytherin stands below:
Weasley cannot save a thing,
He cannot block a single ring . . .
“— so it’s the first test for new Gryffindor Keeper, Weasley, brother
of Beaters, Fred and George, and a promising new talent on the
team — come on, Ron!”
But the scream of delight came from the Slytherin end: Ron had
dived wildly, his arms wide, and the Quaffle had soared between
them, straight through Ron’s central hoop.
“Slytherin score!” came Lee’s voice amid the cheering and booing
from the crowds below. “So that’s ten-nil to Slytherin — bad luck,
Ron . . .”
The Slytherins sang even louder:
WEASLEY WAS BORN IN A BIN,
HE ALWAYS LETS THE QUAFFLE IN . . .
“— and Gryffindor back in possession and it’s Katie Bell tanking
up the pitch —” cried Lee valiantly, though the singing was now so
deafening that he could hardly make himself heard above it.
WEASLEY WILL MAKE SURE WE WIN,
WEASLEY IS OUR KING . . .
“Harry, WHAT ARE YOU DOING?” screamed Angelina, soaring
past him to keep up with Katie. “GET GOING!”
Harry realized that he had been stationary in midair for more than
a minute, watching the progress of the match without sparing a
thought for the whereabouts of the Snitch; horrified, he went into a
dive and started circling the pitch again, staring around, trying to ignore the chorus now thundering through the stadium:
WEASLEY IS OUR KING,
WEASLEY IS OUR KING . . .
There was no sign of the Snitch anywhere he looked; Malfoy was
still circling the stadium just like Harry. They passed midway around
the pitch going in opposite directions and Harry heard Malfoy
singing loudly,
WEASLEY WAS BORN IN A BIN . . .
“— and it’s Warrington again,” bellowed Lee, “who passes to Pucey,
Pucey’s off past Spinnet, come on now Angelina, you can take him —
turns out you can’t — but nice Bludger from Fred Weasley, I mean,
George Weasley, oh who cares, one of them anyway, and Warrington
drops the Quaffle and Katie Bell — er — drops it too — so that’s
Montague with the Quaffle, Slytherin Captain Montague takes the
Quaffle, and he’s off up the pitch, come on now Gryffindor, block him!”
Harry zoomed around the end of the stadium behind the Slytherin
goal hoops, willing himself not to look at what was going on at Ron’s
end; as he sped past the Slytherin Keeper, he heard Bletchley singing
along with the crowd below,
WEASLEY CANNOT SAVE A THING . . .
“— and Pucey’s dodged Alicia again, and he’s heading straight for
goal, stop it, Ron!”
Harry did not have to look to see what had happened: There was a
terrible groan from the Gryffindor end, coupled with fresh screams
and applause from the Slytherins. Looking down, Harry saw the pugfaced Pansy Parkinson right at the front of the stands, her back to the
pitch as she conducted the Slytherin supporters who were roaring:
THAT’S WHY SLYTHERINS ALL SING:
WEASLEY IS OUR KING.
But twenty-nil was nothing, there was still time for Gryffindor to
catch up or catch the Snitch, a few goals and they would be in the lead
as usual, Harry assured himself, bobbing and weaving through the
other players in pursuit of something shiny that turned out to be
Montague’s watch strap. . . .
But Ron let in two more goals. There was an edge of panic in
Harry’s desire to find the Snitch now. If he could just get it soon and
finish the game quickly . . .
“— and Katie Bell of Gryffindor dodges Pucey, ducks Montague,
nice swerve, Katie, and she throws to Johnson, Angelina Johnson
takes the Quaffle, she’s past Warrington, she’s heading for goal, come
on now Angelina — GRYFFINDOR SCORE! It’s forty-ten, fortyten to Slytherin and Pucey has the Quaffle. . . .”
Harry could hear Luna’s ludicrous lion hat roaring amidst the
Gryffindor cheers and felt heartened; only thirty points in it, that was
nothing, they could pull back easily. Harry ducked a Bludger that
Crabbe had sent rocketing in his direction and resumed his frantic
scouring of the pitch for the Snitch, keeping one eye on Malfoy in
case he showed signs of having spotted it, but Malfoy, like him, was
continuing to soar around the stadium, searching fruitlessly . . .
“— Pucey throws to Warrington, Warrington to Montague, Montague back to Pucey — Johnson intervenes, Johnson takes the Quaffle, Johnson to Bell, this looks good — I mean bad — Bell’s hit by a
Bludger from Goyle of Slytherin and it’s Pucey in possession
again . . .”
WEASLEY WAS BORN IN A BIN,
HE ALWAYS LETS THE QUAFFLE IN,
WEASLEY WILL MAKE SURE WE WIN —
But Harry had seen it at last: The tiny fluttering Golden Snitch was
hovering feet from the ground at the Slytherin end of the pitch.
He dived. . . .
In a matter of seconds, Malfoy was streaking out of the sky on
Harry’s left, a green-and-silver blur lying flat on his broom. . . .
The Snitch skirted the foot of one of the goal hoops and scooted off
toward the other side of the stands; its change of direction suited Malfoy, who was nearer. Harry pulled his Firebolt around, he and Malfoy
were now neck and neck . . .
Feet from the ground, Harry lifted his right hand from his broom,
stretching toward the Snitch . . . to his right, Malfoy’s arm extended
too, reaching, groping . . .
It was over in two breathless, desperate, windswept seconds —
Harry’s fingers closed around the tiny, struggling ball — Malfoy’s fingernails scrabbled the back of Harry’s hand hopelessly — Harry
pulled his broom upward, holding the struggling ball in his hand and
the Gryffindor spectators screamed their approval. . . .
They were saved, it did not matter that Ron had let in those goals,
nobody would remember as long as Gryffindor had won —
WHAM!
A Bludger hit Harry squarely in the small of the back and he flew
forward off his broom; luckily he was only five or six feet above the
ground, having dived so low to catch the Snitch, but he was winded
all the same as he landed flat on his back on the frozen pitch. He heard
Madam Hooch’s shrill whistle, an uproar in the stands compounded
of catcalls, angry yells and jeering, a thud, then Angelina’s frantic
voice.
“Are you all right?”
“ ’Course I am,” said Harry grimly, taking her hand and allowing
her to pull him to his feet. Madam Hooch was zooming toward one
of the Slytherin players above him, though he could not see who it
was at this angle.
“It was that thug, Crabbe,” said Angelina angrily. “He whacked the
Bludger at you the moment he saw you’d got the Snitch — but we
won, Harry, we won!”
Harry heard a snort from behind him and turned around, still
holding the Snitch tightly in his hand: Draco Malfoy had landed close
by; white-faced with fury, he was still managing to sneer.
“Saved Weasley’s neck, haven’t you?” he said to Harry. “I’ve never
seen a worse Keeper . . . but then he was born in a bin. . . . Did you
like my lyrics, Potter?”
Harry did not answer; he turned away to meet the rest of the team
who were now landing one by one, yelling and punching the air in triumph, all except Ron, who had dismounted from his broom over by
the goalposts and was making his way slowly back to the changing
rooms alone.
“We wanted to write another couple of verses!” Malfoy called, as
Katie and Alicia hugged Harry. “But we couldn’t find rhymes for fat
and ugly — we wanted to sing about his mother, see —”
“Talk about sour grapes,” said Angelina, casting Malfoy a disgusted
look.
“— we couldn’t fit in useless loser either — for his father, you
know —”
Fred and George had realized what Malfoy was talking about.
Halfway through shaking Harry’s hand they stiffened, looking around
at Malfoy.
“Leave it,” said Angelina at once, taking Fred by the arm. “Leave it,
Fred, let him yell, he’s just sore he lost, the jumped-up little —”
“— but you like the Weasleys, don’t you, Potter?” said Malfoy,
sneering. “Spend holidays there and everything, don’t you? Can’t see
how you stand the stink, but I suppose when you’ve been dragged up
by Muggles even the Weasleys’ hovel smells okay —”
Harry grabbed hold of George; meanwhile it was taking the combined efforts of Angelina, Alicia, and Katie to stop Fred leaping on
Malfoy, who was laughing openly. Harry looked around for Madam
Hooch, but she was still berating Crabbe for his illegal Bludger attack.
“Or perhaps,” said Malfoy, leering as he backed away, “you can remember what your mother’s house stank like, Potter, and Weasley’s
pigsty reminds you of it —”
Harry was not aware of releasing George, all he knew was that a
second later both of them were sprinting at Malfoy. He had completely forgotten the fact that all the teachers were watching: All he
wanted to do was cause Malfoy as much pain as possible. With no
time to draw out his wand, he merely drew back the fist clutching the
Snitch and sank it as hard as he could into Malfoy’s stomach —
“Harry! HARRY! GEORGE! NO !”
He could hear girls’ voices screaming, Malfoy yelling, George
swearing, a whistle blowing, and the bellowing of the crowd around
him, but he did not care, not until somebody in the vicinity yelled
“IMPEDIMENTA!” and only when he was knocked over backward by
the force of the spell did he abandon the attempt to punch every inch
of Malfoy he could reach. . . .
“What do you think you’re doing?” screamed Madam Hooch, as
Harry leapt to his feet again; it was she who had hit him with the Impediment Jinx. She was holding her whistle in one hand and a wand
in the other, her broom lay abandoned several feet away. Malfoy was
curled up on the ground, whimpering and moaning, his nose bloody;
George was sporting a swollen lip; Fred was still being forcibly restrained by the three Chasers, and Crabbe was cackling in the background. “I’ve never seen behavior like it — back up to the castle, both
of you, and straight to your Head of House’s office! Go! Now!”
Harry and George marched off the pitch, both panting, neither saying a word to each other. The howling and jeering of the crowd grew
fainter and fainter until they reached the entrance hall, where they
could hear nothing except the sound of their own footsteps. Harry became aware that something was still struggling in his right hand, the
knuckles of which he had bruised against Malfoy’s jaw; looking down
he saw the Snitch’s silver wings protruding from between his fingers,
struggling for release.
They had barely reached the door of Professor McGonagall’s office
when she came marching along the corridor behind them. She was
wearing a Gryffindor scarf, but tore it from her throat with shaking
hands as she strode toward them, looking livid.
“In!” she said furiously, pointing to the door. Harry and George entered. She strode around behind her desk and faced them, quivering
with rage as she threw the Gryffindor scarf aside onto the floor.
“Well?” she said. “I have never seen such a disgraceful exhibition.
Two onto one! Explain yourselves!”
“Malfoy provoked us,” said Harry stiffly.
“Provoked you?” shouted Professor McGonagall, slamming a fist
onto her desk so that her tartan biscuit tin slid sideways off it and
burst open, littering the floor with Ginger Newts. “He’d just lost,
hadn’t he, of course he wanted to provoke you! But what on earth he
can have said that justified what you two —”
“He insulted my parents,” snarled George. “And Harry’s mother.”
“But instead of leaving it to Madam Hooch to sort out, you two decided to give an exhibition of Muggle dueling, did you?” bellowed
Professor McGonagall. “Have you any idea what you’ve — ?”
“Hem, hem.”
George and Harry both spun around. Dolores Umbridge was
standing in the doorway wrapped in a green tweed cloak that greatly
enhanced her resemblance to a giant toad, and smiling in the horribly
sickly, ominous way that Harry had come to associate with imminent
misery.
“May I help, Professor McGonagall?” asked Professor Umbridge in
her most poisonously sweet voice.
Blood rushed into Professor McGonagall’s face.
“Help?” she repeated in a constricted voice. “What do you mean,
‘help’?”
Professor Umbridge moved forward into the office, still smiling her
sickly smile.
“Why, I thought you might be grateful for a little extra authority.”
Harry would not have been surprised to see sparks fly from Professor McGonagall’s nostrils.
“You thought wrong,” she said, turning her back on Umbridge.
“Now, you two had better listen closely. I do not care what provocation Malfoy offered you, I do not care if he insulted every family
member you possess, your behavior was disgusting and I am giving
each of you a week’s worth of detention! Do not look at me like that,
Potter, you deserve it! And if either of you ever —”
“Hem, hem.”
Professor McGonagall closed her eyes as though praying for patience as she turned her face toward Professor Umbridge again.
“Yes?”
“I think they deserve rather more than detentions,” said Umbridge,
smiling still more broadly.
Professor McGonagall’s eyes flew open. “But unfortunately,” she
said, with an attempt at a reciprocal smile that made her look as
though she had lockjaw, “it is what I think that counts, as they are in
my House, Dolores.”
“Well, actually, Minerva,” simpered Umbridge, “I think you’ll find
that what I think does count. Now, where is it? Cornelius just sent it.
. . . I mean,” she gave a little false laugh as she rummaged in her handbag, “the Minister just sent it. . . . Ah yes . . .”
She had pulled out a piece of parchment that she now unfurled,
clearing her throat fussily before starting to read what it said.
“Hem, hem . . . ‘Educational Decree Number Twenty-five . . .’ ”
“Not another one!” exclaimed Professor McGonagall violently.
“Well, yes,” said Umbridge, still smiling. “As a matter of fact, Minerva, it was you who made me see that we needed a further amendment. . . . You remember how you overrode me, when I was unwilling
to allow the Gryffindor Quidditch team to re-form? How you took
the case to Dumbledore, who insisted that the team be allowed to
play? Well, now, I couldn’t have that. I contacted the Minister at once,
and he quite agreed with me that the High Inquisitor has to have the
power to strip pupils of privileges, or she — that is to say, I — would
have less authority than common teachers! And you see now, don’t
you, Minerva, how right I was in attempting to stop the Gryffindor
team re-forming? Dreadful tempers . . . Anyway, I was reading out our
amendment . . . hem, hem . . . ‘The High Inquisitor will henceforth
have supreme authority over all punishments, sanctions, and removal
of privileges pertaining to the students of Hogwarts, and the power to
alter such punishments, sanctions, and removals of privileges as may
have been ordered by other staff members. Signed, Cornelius Fudge,
Minister of Magic, Order of Merlin First Class, etc., etc. . . .’ ”
She rolled up the parchment and put it back into her handbag, still
smiling.
“So . . . I really think I will have to ban these two from playing
Quidditch ever again,” she said, looking from Harry to George and
back again.
Harry felt the Snitch fluttering madly in his hand.
“Ban us?” he said, and his voice sounded strangely distant. “From
playing . . . ever again?”
“Yes, Mr. Potter, I think a lifelong ban ought to do the trick,” said
Umbridge, her smile widening still further as she watched him struggle to comprehend what she had said. “You and Mr. Weasley here.
And I think, to be safe, this young man’s twin ought to be stopped
too — if his teammates had not restrained him, I feel sure he would
have attacked young Mr. Malfoy as well. I will want their broomsticks
confiscated, of course; I shall keep them safely in my office, to make
sure there is no infringement of my ban. But I am not unreasonable,
Professor McGonagall,” she continued, turning back to Professor
McGonagall who was now standing as still as though carved from ice,
staring at her. “The rest of the team can continue playing, I saw no
signs of violence from any of them. Well . . . good afternoon to you.”
And with a look of the utmost satisfaction Umbridge left the room,
leaving a horrified silence in her wake.
“Banned,” said Angelina in a hollow voice, late that evening in the
common room. “Banned. No Seeker and no Beaters . . . What on
earth are we going to do?”
It did not feel as though they had won the match at all. Everywhere
Harry looked there were disconsolate and angry faces; the team themselves were slumped around the fire, all apart from Ron, who had not
been seen since the end of the match.
“It’s just so unfair,” said Alicia numbly. “I mean, what about
Crabbe and that Bludger he hit after the whistle had been blown? Has
she banned him?”
“No,” said Ginny miserably; she and Hermione were sitting on either side of Harry. “He just got lines, I heard Montague laughing
about it at dinner.”
“And banning Fred when he didn’t even do anything!” said Alicia
furiously, pummeling her knee with her fist.
“It’s not my fault I didn’t,” said Fred, with a very ugly look on his
face. “I would’ve pounded the little scumbag to a pulp if you three
hadn’t been holding me back.”
Harry stared miserably at the dark window. Snow was falling. The
Snitch he had caught earlier was now zooming around and around the
common room; people were watching its progress as though hypnotized and Crookshanks was leaping from chair to chair, trying to
catch it.
“I’m going to bed,” said Angelina, getting slowly to her feet.
“Maybe this will all turn out to have been a bad dream. . . . Maybe I’ll
wake up tomorrow and find we haven’t played yet. . . .”
She was soon followed by Alicia and Katie. Fred and George sloped
off to bed some time later, glowering at everyone they passed, and
Ginny went not long after that. Only Harry and Hermione were left
beside the fire.
“Have you seen Ron?” Hermione asked in a low voice.
Harry shook his head.
“I think he’s avoiding us,” said Hermione. “Where do you think
he — ?”
But at that precise moment, there was a creaking sound behind
them as the Fat Lady swung forward and Ron came clambering
through the portrait hole. He was very pale indeed and there was
snow in his hair. When he saw Harry and Hermione he stopped dead
in his tracks.
“Where have you been?” said Hermione anxiously, springing up.
“Walking,” Ron mumbled. He was still wearing his Quidditch
things.
“You look frozen,” said Hermione. “Come and sit down!”
Ron walked to the fireside and sank into the chair farthest from
Harry’s, not looking at him. The stolen Snitch zoomed over their
heads.
“I’m sorry,” Ron mumbled, looking at his feet.
“What for?” said Harry.
“For thinking I can play Quidditch,” said Ron. “I’m going to resign
first thing tomorrow.”
“If you resign,” said Harry testily, “there’ll only be three players left
on the team.” And when Ron looked puzzled, he said, “I’ve been
given a lifetime ban. So’ve Fred and George.”
“What?” Ron yelped.
Hermione told him the full story; Harry could not bear to tell it
again. When she had finished, Ron looked more anguished than ever.
“This is all my fault —”
“You didn’t make me punch Malfoy,” said Harry angrily.
“— if I wasn’t so lousy at Quidditch —”
“— it’s got nothing to do with that —”
“— it was that song that wound me up —”
“— it would’ve wound anyone up —”
Hermione got up and walked to the window, away from the argument, watching the snow swirling down against the pane.
“Look, drop it, will you!” Harry burst out. “It’s bad enough without you blaming yourself for everything!”
Ron said nothing but sat gazing miserably at the damp hem of his
robes. After a while he said in a dull voice, “This is the worst I’ve ever
felt in my life.”
“Join the club,” said Harry bitterly.
“Well,” said Hermione, her voice trembling slightly. “I can think of
one thing that might cheer you both up.”
“Oh yeah?” said Harry skeptically.
“Yeah,” said Hermione, turning away from the pitch-black, snowflecked window, a broad smile spreading across her face. “Hagrid’s
back.”

C H A P T E R T W E N T Y
HAGRID’S TALE

Harry sprinted up to the boys’ dormitory to fetch the Invisibility Cloak and the Marauder’s Map from his trunk; he was
so quick that he and Ron were ready to leave at least five minutes before Hermione hurried back down from the girls’ dormitories, wearing scarf, gloves, and one of her own knobbly elf hats.
“Well, it’s cold out there!” she said defensively, as Ron clicked his
tongue impatiently.
They crept through the portrait hole and covered themselves
hastily in the cloak — Ron had grown so much he now needed to
crouch to prevent his feet showing — then, moving slowly and cautiously, they proceeded down the many staircases, pausing at intervals
to check the map for signs of Filch or Mrs. Norris. They were lucky;
they saw nobody but Nearly Headless Nick, who was gliding along
absentmindedly humming something that sounded horribly like
“Weasley Is Our King.” They crept across the entrance hall and then
out into the silent, snowy grounds. With a great leap of his heart,
Harry saw little golden squares of light ahead and smoke coiling up
from Hagrid’s chimney. He set off at a quick march, the other two
jostling and bumping along behind him, and they crunched excitedly
through the thickening snow until at last they reached the wooden
front door; when Harry raised his fist and knocked three times, a dog
started barking frantically inside.
“Hagrid, it’s us!” Harry called through the keyhole.
“Shoulda known!” said a gruff voice.
They beamed at one another under the cloak; they could tell that
Hagrid’s voice was pleased. “Bin home three seconds . . . Out the way,
Fang . . . Out the way, yeh dozy dog . . .”
The bolt was drawn back, the door creaked open, and Hagrid’s
head appeared in the gap.
Hermione screamed.
“Merlin’s beard, keep it down!” said Hagrid hastily, staring wildly
over their heads. “Under that cloak, are yeh? Well, get in, get in!”
“I’m sorry!” Hermione gasped, as the three of them squeezed past
Hagrid into the house and pulled the cloak off themselves so he could
see them. “I just — oh, Hagrid !”
“It’s nuthin’, it’s nuthin’!” said Hagrid hastily, shutting the door
behind them and hurrying to close all the curtains, but Hermione
continued to gaze up at him in horror.
Hagrid’s hair was matted with congealed blood, and his left eye had
been reduced to a puffy slit amid a mass of purple-and-black bruises.
There were many cuts on his face and hands, some of them still bleeding, and he was moving gingerly, which made Harry suspect broken
ribs. It was obvious that he had only just got home; a thick black traveling cloak lay over the back of a chair and a haversack large enough
to carry several small children leaned against the wall inside the door.
Hagrid himself, twice the size of a normal man and three times as
broad, was now limping over to the fire and placing a copper kettle
over it.
“What happened to you?” Harry demanded, while Fang danced
around them all, trying to lick their faces.
CHAPTER TWENTY
 422 
“Told yeh, nuthin’,” said Hagrid firmly. “Want a cuppa?”
“Come off it,” said Ron, “you’re in a right state!”
“I’m tellin’ yeh, I’m fine,” said Hagrid, straightening up and turning to beam at them all, but wincing. “Blimey, it’s good ter see you
three again — had good summers, did yeh?”
“Hagrid, you’ve been attacked!” said Ron.
“Fer the las’ time, it’s nuthin’!” said Hagrid firmly.
“Would you say it was nothing if one of us turned up with a pound
of mince instead of a face?” Ron demanded.
“You ought to go and see Madam Pomfrey, Hagrid,” said Hermione anxiously. “Some of those cuts look nasty.”
“I’m dealin’ with it, all righ’?” said Hagrid repressively.
He walked across to the enormous wooden table that stood in the
middle of his cabin and twitched aside a tea towel that had been lying
on it. Underneath was a raw, bloody, green-tinged steak slightly larger
than the average car tire.
“You’re not going to eat that, are you, Hagrid?” said Ron, leaning
in for a closer look. “It looks poisonous.”
“It’s s’posed ter look like that, it’s dragon meat,” Hagrid said. “An’ I
didn’ get it ter eat.”
He picked up the steak and slapped it over the left side of his face.
Greenish blood trickled down into his beard as he gave a soft moan of
satisfaction.
“Tha’s better. It helps with the stingin’, yeh know.”
“So are you going to tell us what’s happened to you?” Harry asked.
“Can’, Harry. Top secret. More’n me job’s worth ter tell yeh that.”
“Did the giants beat you up, Hagrid?” asked Hermione quietly.
Hagrid’s fingers slipped on the dragon steak, and it slid squelchily
onto his chest.
“Giants?” said Hagrid, catching the steak before it reached his belt
and slapping it back over his face. “Who said anythin’ abou’ giants?
Who yeh bin talkin’ to? Who’s told yeh what I’ve — who’s said I’ve
bin — eh?”
“We guessed,” said Hermione apologetically.
“Oh, yeh did, did yeh?” said Hagrid, fixing her sternly with the eye
that was not hidden by the steak.
“It was kind of . . . obvious,” said Ron. Harry nodded.
Hagrid glared at them, then snorted, threw the steak onto the table
again and strode back to the kettle, which was now whistling.
“Never known kids like you three fer knowin’ more’n yeh oughta,”
he muttered, splashing boiling water into three of his bucket-shaped
mugs. “An’ I’m not complimentin’ yeh, neither. Nosy, some’d call it.
Interferin’.”
But his beard twitched.
“So you have been to look for giants?” said Harry, grinning as he sat
down at the table.
Hagrid set tea in front of each of them, sat down, picked up his
steak again, and slapped it back over his face.
“Yeah, all righ’,” he grunted, “I have.”
“And you found them?” said Hermione in a hushed voice.
“Well, they’re not that difficult ter find, ter be honest,” said Hagrid.
“Pretty big, see.”
“Where are they?” said Ron.
“Mountains,” said Hagrid unhelpfully.
“So why don’t Muggles — ?”
“They do,” said Hagrid darkly. “O’ny their deaths are always put
down ter mountaineerin’ accidents, aren’ they?”
He adjusted the steak a little so that it covered the worst of the
bruising.
“Come on, Hagrid, tell us what you’ve been up to!” said Ron. “Tell
us about being attacked by the giants and Harry can tell you about being attacked by the dementors —”
Hagrid choked in his mug and dropped his steak at the same time;
a large quantity of spit, tea, and dragon blood was sprayed over the
table as Hagrid coughed and spluttered and the steak slid, with a soft
splat, onto the floor.
“Whadda yeh mean, attacked by dementors?” growled Hagrid.
“Didn’t you know?” Hermione asked him, wide-eyed.
“I don’ know anything that’s been happenin’ since I left. I was on a
secret mission, wasn’ I, didn’ wan’ owls followin’ me all over the
place — ruddy dementors! Yeh’re not serious?”
“Yeah, I am, they turned up in Little Whinging and attacked my
cousin and me, and then the Ministry of Magic expelled me —”
“WHAT?”
“— and I had to go to a hearing and everything, but tell us about
the giants first.”
“You were expelled?”
“Tell us about your summer and I’ll tell you about mine.”
Hagrid glared at him through his one open eye. Harry looked right
back, an expression of innocent determination on his face.
“Oh, all righ’,” Hagrid said in a resigned voice.
He bent down and tugged the dragon steak out of Fang’s mouth.
“Oh, Hagrid, don’t, it’s not hygien —” Hermione began, but Hagrid had already slapped the meat back over his swollen eye. He took
another fortifying gulp of tea and then said, “Well, we set off righ’ after term ended —”
“Madame Maxime went with you, then?” Hermione interjected.
“Yeah, tha’s right,” said Hagrid, and a softened expression appeared
on the few inches of face that were not obscured by beard or green
steak. “Yeah, it was jus’ the pair of us. An’ I’ll tell yeh this, she’s not
afraid of roughin’ it, Olympe. Yeh know, she’s a fine, well-dressed
woman, an’ knowin’ where we was goin’ I wondered ’ow she’d feel
abou’ clamberin’ over boulders an’ sleepin’ in caves an’ tha’, bu’ she
never complained once.”
“You knew where you were going?” Harry asked. “You knew where
the giants were?”
“Well, Dumbledore knew, an’ he told us,” said Hagrid.
“Are they hidden?” asked Ron. “Is it a secret, where they are?”
“Not really,” said Hagrid, shaking his shaggy head. “It’s jus’ that
mos’ wizards aren’ bothered where they are, s’ long as it’s a good long
way away. But where they are’s very difficult ter get ter, fer humans
anyway, so we needed Dumbledore’s instructions. Took us abou’ a
month ter get there —”
“A month?” said Ron, as though he had never heard of a journey
lasting such a ridiculously long time. “But — why couldn’t you just
grab a Portkey or something?”
There was an odd expression in Hagrid’s unobscured eye as he
squinted at Ron; it was almost pitying.
“We’re bein’ watched, Ron,” he said gruffly.
“What d’you mean?”
“Yeh don’ understand,” said Hagrid. “The Ministry’s keepin’ an eye
on Dumbledore an’ anyone they reckon’s in league with him, an’ —”
“We know about that,” said Harry quickly, keen to hear the rest
of Hagrid’s story. “We know about the Ministry watching Dumbledore —”
“So you couldn’t use magic to get there?” asked Ron, looking thunderstruck. “You had to act like Muggles all the way?”
“Well, not exactly all the way,” said Hagrid cagily. “We jus’ had ter
be careful, ’cause Olympe an’ me, we stick out a bit —”
Ron made a stifled noise somewhere between a snort and a sniff
and hastily took a gulp of tea.
“— so we’re not hard ter follow. We was pretendin’ we was goin’ on
holiday together, so we got inter France an’ we made like we was
headin’ fer where Olympe’s school is, ’cause we knew we was bein’
tailed by someone from the Ministry. We had to go slow, ’cause I’m
not really s’posed ter use magic an’ we knew the Ministry’d be lookin’
fer a reason ter run us in. But we managed ter give the berk tailin’ us
the slip round abou’ Dee-John —”
“Ooooh, Dijon?” said Hermione excitedly. “I’ve been there on holiday, did you see — ?”
She fell silent at the look on Ron’s face.
“We chanced a bit o’ magic after that, and it wasn’ a bad journey.
Ran inter a couple o’ mad trolls on the Polish border, an’ I had a sligh’
disagreement with a vampire in a pub in Minsk, but apart from tha’,
couldn’t’a bin smoother.
“An’ then we reached the place, an’ we started trekkin’ up through
the mountains, lookin’ fer signs of ’em . . .
“We had ter lay off the magic once we got near ’em. Partly ’cause they
don’ like wizards an’ we didn’ want ter put their backs up too soon, and
partly ’cause Dumbledore had warned us You-Know-Who was bound
ter be after the giants an’ all. Said it was odds on he’d sent a messenger
off ter them already. Told us ter be very careful of drawin’ attention ter
ourselves as we got nearer in case there was Death Eaters around.”
Hagrid paused for a long draft of tea.
“Go on!” said Harry urgently.
“Found ’em,” said Hagrid baldly. “Went over a ridge one nigh’ an’
there they was, spread ou’ underneath us. Little fires burnin’ below an’
huge shadows . . . It was like watchin’ bits o’ the mountain movin’.”
“How big are they?” asked Ron in a hushed voice.
“ ’Bout twenty feet,” said Hagrid casually. “Some o’ the bigger ones
mighta bin twenty-five.”
“And how many were there?” asked Harry.
“I reckon abou’ seventy or eighty,” said Hagrid.
“Is that all?” said Hermione.
“Yep,” said Hagrid sadly, “eighty left, an’ there was loads once,
musta bin a hundred diff’rent tribes from all over the world. But
they’ve bin dyin’ out fer ages. Wizards killed a few, o’ course, but
mostly they killed each other, an’ now they’re dyin’ out faster than
ever. They’re not made ter live bunched up together like tha’. Dumbledore says it’s our fault, it was the wizards who forced ’em to go an’
made ’em live a good long way from us an’ they had no choice but ter
stick together fer their own protection.”
“So,” said Harry, “you saw them and then what?”
“Well, we waited till morning, didn’ want ter go sneakin’ up on ’em
in the dark, fer our own safety,” said Hagrid. “ ’Bout three in the
mornin’ they fell asleep jus’ where they was sittin’. We didn’ dare sleep.
Fer one thing, we wanted ter make sure none of ’em woke up an’
came up where we were, an’ fer another, the snorin’ was unbelievable.
Caused an avalanche near mornin’.
“Anyway, once it was light we wen’ down ter see ’em.”
“Just like that?” said Ron, looking awestruck. “You just walked
right into a giant camp?”
“Well, Dumbledore’d told us how ter do it,” said Hagrid. “Give the
Gurg gifts, show some respect, yeh know.”
“Give the what gifts?” asked Harry.
“Oh, the Gurg — means the chief.”
“How could you tell which one was the Gurg?” asked Ron.
Hagrid grunted in amusement.
“No problem,” he said. “He was the biggest, the ugliest, an’ the
laziest. Sittin’ there waitin’ ter be brought food by the others. Dead
goats an’ such like. Name o’ Karkus. I’d put him at twenty-two,
twenty-three feet, an’ the weight of a couple o’ bull elephants. Skin
like rhino hide an’ all.”
“And you just walked up to him?” said Hermione breathlessly.
“Well . . . down ter him, where he was lyin’ in the valley. They was
in this dip between four pretty high mountains, see, beside a mountain lake, an’ Karkus was lyin’ by the lake roarin’ at the others ter feed
him an’ his wife. Olympe an’ I went down the mountainside —”
“But didn’t they try and kill you when they saw you?” asked Ron
incredulously.
“It was def’nitely on some of their minds,” said Hagrid, shrugging,
“but we did what Dumbledore told us ter do, which was ter hold our
gift up high an’ keep our eyes on the Gurg an’ ignore the others. So
tha’s what we did. An’ the rest of ’em went quiet an’ watched us pass
an’ we got right up ter Karkus’s feet an’ we bowed an’ put our present
down in front o’ him.”
“What do you give a giant?” asked Ron eagerly. “Food?”
“Nah, he can get food all righ’ fer himself,” said Hagrid. “We took
him magic. Giants like magic, jus’ don’t like us usin’ it against ’em.
Anyway, that firs’ day we gave him a branch o’ Gubraithian fire.”
Hermione said “wow” softly, but Harry and Ron both frowned in
puzzlement.
“A branch of — ?”
“Everlasting fire,” said Hermione irritably, “you ought to know that
by now, Professor Flitwick’s mentioned it at least twice in class!”
“Well anyway,” said Hagrid quickly, intervening before Ron could
answer back, “Dumbledore’d bewitched this branch to burn evermore, which isn’ somethin’ any wizard could do, an’ so I lies it down
in the snow by Karkus’s feet and says, ‘A gift to the Gurg of the giants
from Albus Dumbledore, who sends his respectful greetings.’ ”
“And what did Karkus say?” asked Harry eagerly.
“Nothin’,” said Hagrid. “Didn’ speak English.”
“You’re kidding!”
“Didn’ matter,” said Hagrid imperturbably, “Dumbledore had
warned us tha’ migh’ happen. Karkus knew enough to yell fer a couple o’ giants who knew our lingo an’ they translated fer us.”
“And did he like the present?” asked Ron.
“Oh yeah, it went down a storm once they understood what it
was,” said Hagrid, turning his dragon steak over to press the cooler
side to his swollen eye. “Very pleased. So then I said, ‘Albus Dumbledore asks the Gurg to speak with his messenger when he returns tomorrow with another gift.’ ”
“Why couldn’t you speak to them that day?” asked Hermione.
“Dumbledore wanted us ter take it very slow,” said Hagrid. “Let
’em see we kept our promises. We’ll come back tomorrow with another
present, an’ then we do come back with another present — gives a
good impression, see? An’ gives them time ter test out the firs’ present
an’ find out it’s a good one, an’ get ’em eager fer more. In any case, giants like Karkus — overload ’em with information an’ they’ll kill yeh
jus’ to simplify things. So we bowed outta the way an’ went off an’
found ourselves a nice little cave ter spend that night in, an’ the followin’ mornin’ we went back an’ this time we found Karkus sittin’ up
waitin’ fer us lookin’ all eager.”
“And you talked to him?”
“Oh yeah. Firs’ we presented him with a nice battle helmet —
goblin-made an’ indestructible, yeh know — an’ then we sat down an’
we talked.”
“What did he say?”
“Not much,” said Hagrid. “Listened mostly. But there were good
signs. He’d heard o’ Dumbledore, heard he’d argued against the killin’
of the last giants in Britain. Karkus seemed ter be quite int’rested in
what Dumbledore had ter say. An’ a few o’ the others, ’specially the
ones who had some English, they gathered round an’ listened too. We
were hopeful when we left that day. Promised ter come back next day
with another present.
“But that night it all wen’ wrong.”
“What d’you mean?” said Ron quickly.
“Well, like I say, they’re not meant ter live together, giants,” said
Hagrid sadly. “Not in big groups like that. They can’ help themselves,
they half kill each other every few weeks. The men fight each other an’
the women fight each other, the remnants of the old tribes fight each
other, an’ that’s even without squabbles over food an’ the best fires an’
sleepin’ spots. Yeh’d think, seein’ as how their whole race is abou’ finished, they’d lay off each other, but . . .”
Hagrid sighed deeply
“That night a fight broke out, we saw it from the mouth of our
cave, lookin’ down on the valley. Went on fer hours, yeh wouldn’ believe the noise. An’ when the sun came up the snow was scarlet an’ his
head was lyin’ at the bottom o’ the lake.”
“Whose head?” gasped Hermione.
“Karkus’s,” said Hagrid heavily. “There was a new Gurg, Golgomath.” He sighed deeply. “Well, we hadn’ bargained on a new Gurg
two days after we’d made friendly contact with the firs’ one, an’ we had
a funny feelin’ Golgomath wouldn’ be so keen ter listen to us, but we
had ter try.”
“You went to speak to him?” asked Ron incredulously. “After you’d
watched him rip off another giant’s head?”
“ ’Course we did,” said Hagrid, “we hadn’ gone all that way ter give
up after two days! We wen’ down with the next present we’d meant ter
give ter Karkus.
“I knew it was no go before I’d opened me mouth. He was sitting
there wearin’ Karkus’s helmet, leerin’ at us as we got nearer. He’s massive, one o’ the biggest ones there. Black hair an’ matchin’ teeth an’ a
necklace o’ bones. Human-lookin’ bones, some of ’em. Well, I gave it
a go — held out a great roll o’ dragon skin — an’ said A gift fer the
Gurg of the giants —’ Nex’ thing I knew, I was hangin’ upside down
in the air by me feet, two of his mates had grabbed me.”
Hermione clapped her hands to her mouth.
“How did you get out of that?” asked Harry.
“Wouldn’ta done if Olympe hadn’ bin there,” said Hagrid. “She
pulled out her wand an’ did some o’ the fastes’ spellwork I’ve ever seen.
Ruddy marvelous. Hit the two holdin’ me right in the eyes with Conjunctivitus Curses an’ they dropped me straightaway — bu’ we were
in trouble then, ’cause we’d used magic against ’em, an’ that’s what giants hate abou’ wizards. We had ter leg it an’ we knew there was no
way we was going ter be able ter march inter camp again.”
“Blimey, Hagrid,” said Ron quietly.
“So how come it’s taken you so long to get home if you were only
there for three days?” asked Hermione.
“We didn’ leave after three days!” said Hagrid, looking outraged.
“Dumbledore was relyin’ on us!”
“But you’ve just said there was no way you could go back!”
“Not by daylight, we couldn’, no. We just had ter rethink a bit.
Spent a couple o’ days lyin’ low up in the cave an’ watchin’. An’ wha’
we saw wasn’ good.”
“Did he rip off more heads?” asked Hermione, sounding squeamish.
“No,” said Hagrid. “I wish he had.”
“What d’you mean?”
“I mean we soon found out he didn’ object ter all wizards — just us.”
“Death Eaters?” said Harry quickly.
“Yep,” said Hagrid darkly. “Couple of ’em were visitin’ him ev’ry
day, bringin’ gifts ter the Gurg, an’ he wasn’ dangling them upside
down.”
“How d’you know they were Death Eaters?” said Ron.
“Because I recognized one of ’em,” Hagrid growled. “Macnair, remember him? Bloke they sent ter kill Buckbeak? Maniac, he is. Likes
killin’ as much as Golgomath, no wonder they were gettin’ on so well.”
“So Macnair’s persuaded the giants to join You-Know-Who?” said
Hermione desperately.
“Hold yer hippogriffs, I haven’ finished me story yet!” said Hagrid
indignantly, who, considering he had not wanted to tell them anything in the first place, now seemed to be rather enjoying himself. “Me
an’ Olympe talked it over an’ we agreed, jus’ ’cause the Gurg looked
like favorin’ You-Know-Who didn’ mean all of ’em would. We had ter
try an’ persuade some o’ the others, the ones who hadn’ wanted Golgomath as Gurg.”
“How could you tell which ones they were?” asked Ron.
“Well, they were the ones bein’ beaten to a pulp, weren’ they?” said
Hagrid patiently. “The ones with any sense were keepin’ outta Golgomath’s way, hidin’ out in caves roun’ the gully jus’ like we were. So we
decided we’d go pokin’ round the caves by night an’ see if we couldn’
persuade a few o’ them.”
“You went poking around dark caves looking for giants?” said Ron
with awed respect in his voice.
“Well, it wasn’ the giants who worried us most,” said Hagrid. “We
were more concerned abou’ the Death Eaters. Dumbledore had told us
before we wen’ not ter tangle with ’em if we could avoid it, an’ the trouble was they knew we was around — ’spect Golgomath told him abou’
us. At night when the giants were sleepin’ an’ we wanted ter be creepin’
inter the caves, Macnair an’ the other one were sneakin’ round the
mountains lookin’ fer us. I was hard put to stop Olympe jumpin’ out
at them,” said Hagrid, the corners of his mouth lifting his wild beard.
“She was rarin’ ter attack ’em. . . . she’s somethin’ when she’s roused,
Olympe. . . . Fiery, yeh know . . . ’spect it’s the French in her . . .”
Hagrid gazed misty-eyed into the fire. Harry allowed him thirty
seconds’ reminiscence before clearing his throat loudly.
“So what happened? Did you ever get near any of the other giants?”
“What? Oh . . . oh yeah, we did. Yeah, on the third night after
Karkus was killed, we crept outta the cave we’d bin hidin’ in and
headed back down inter the gully, keepin’ our eyes skinned fer the
Death Eaters. Got inside a few o’ the caves, no go — then, in abou’
the sixth one, we found three giants hidin’.”
“Cave must’ve been cramped,” said Ron.
“Wasn’ room ter swing a kneazle,” said Hagrid.
“Didn’t they attack you when they saw you?” asked Hermione.
“Probably woulda done if they’d bin in any condition,” said Hagrid, “but they was badly hurt, all three o’ them. Golgomath’s lot had
beaten ’em unconscious; they’d woken up an’ crawled inter the nearest shelter they could find. Anyway, one o’ them had a bit of English
an’ ’e translated fer the others, an’ what we had ter say didn’ seem ter
go down too badly. So we kep’ goin’ back, visitin’ the wounded. . . . I
reckon we had abou’ six or seven o’ them convinced at one poin’.”
“Six or seven?” said Ron eagerly. “Well that’s not bad — are they
going to come over here and start fighting You-Know-Who with us?”
But Hermione said, “What do you mean ‘at one point,’ Hagrid?”
Hagrid looked at her sadly.
“Golgomath’s lot raided the caves. The ones tha’ survived didn’
wan’ no more ter to do with us after that.”
“So . . . so there aren’t any giants coming?” said Ron, looking
disappointed.
“Nope,” said Hagrid, heaving a deep sigh as he turned over his
steak again and applied the cooler side to his face, “but we did wha’ we
meant ter do, we gave ’em Dumbledore’s message an’ some o’ them
heard it an’ I ’spect some o’ them’ll remember it. Jus’ maybe, them that
don’ want ter stay around Golgomath’ll move outta the mountains,
an’ there’s gotta be a chance they’ll remember Dumbledore’s friendly
to ’em. . . . Could be they’ll come . . .”
Snow was filling up the window now. Harry became aware that the
knees of his robes were soaked through; Fang was drooling with his
head in Harry’s lap.
“Hagrid?” said Hermione quietly after a while.
“Mmm?”
“Did you . . . was there any sign of . . . did you hear anything about
your . . . your . . . mother while you were there?”
Hagrid’s unobscured eye rested upon her, and Hermione looked
rather scared.
“I’m sorry . . . I . . . forget it —”
“Dead,” Hagrid grunted. “Died years ago. They told me.”
“Oh . . . I’m . . . I’m really sorry,” said Hermione in a very small
voice.
Hagrid shrugged his massive shoulders. “No need,” he said shortly.
“Can’ remember her much. Wasn’ a great mother.”
They were silent again. Hermione glanced nervously at Harry and
Ron, plainly wanting them to speak.
“But you still haven’t explained how you got in this state, Hagrid,”
Ron said, gesturing toward Hagrid’s bloodstained face.
“Or why you’re back so late,” said Harry. “Sirius says Madame
Maxime got back ages ago —”
“Who attacked you?” said Ron.
“I haven’ bin attacked!” said Hagrid emphatically. “I —”
But the rest of his words were drowned in a sudden outbreak of
rapping on the door. Hermione gasped; her mug slipped through her
fingers and smashed on the floor; Fang yelped. All four of them stared
at the window beside the doorway. The shadow of somebody small
and squat rippled across the thin curtain.
“It’s her!” Ron whispered.
“Get under here!” Harry said quickly; seizing the Invisibility Cloak
he whirled it over himself and Hermione while Ron tore around the
table and dived beneath the cloak as well. Huddled together they
backed away into a corner. Fang was barking madly at the door. Hagrid looked thoroughly confused.
“Hagrid, hide our mugs!”
Hagrid seized Harry’s and Ron’s mugs and shoved them under
the cushion in Fang’s basket. Fang was now leaping up at the door;
Hagrid pushed him out of the way with his foot and pulled it open.
Professor Umbridge was standing in the doorway wearing her
green tweed cloak and a matching hat with earflaps. Lips pursed, she
leaned back so as to see Hagrid’s face; she barely reached his navel.
“So,” she said slowly and loudly, as though speaking to somebody
deaf. “You’re Hagrid, are you?”
Without waiting for an answer she strolled into the room, her
bulging eyes rolling in every direction.
“Get away,” she snapped, waving her handbag at Fang, who had
bounded up to her and was attempting to lick her face.
“Er — I don’ want ter be rude,” said Hagrid, staring at her, “but
who the ruddy hell are you?”
“My name is Dolores Umbridge.”
Her eyes were sweeping the cabin. Twice they stared directly into
the corner where Harry stood, sandwiched between Ron and Hermione.
“Dolores Umbridge?” Hagrid said, sounding thoroughly confused.
“I thought you were one o’ them Ministry — don’ you work with
Fudge?”
“I was Senior Undersecretary to the Minister, yes,” said Umbridge,
now pacing around the cabin, taking in every tiny detail within, from
the haversack against the wall to the abandoned traveling cloak. “I am
now the Defense Against the Dark Arts teacher —”
“Tha’s brave of yeh,” said Hagrid, “there’s not many’d take tha’ job
anymore —”
“— and Hogwarts High Inquisitor,” said Umbridge, giving no sign
that she had heard him.
“Wha’s that?” said Hagrid, frowning.
“Precisely what I was going to ask,” said Umbridge, pointing at the
broken shards of china on the floor that had been Hermione’s mug.
“Oh,” said Hagrid, with a most unhelpful glance toward the corner
where Harry, Ron, and Hermione stood hidden, “oh, tha’ was . . . was
Fang. He broke a mug. So I had ter use this one instead.”
Hagrid pointed to the mug from which he had been drinking, one
hand still clamped over the dragon steak pressed to his eye. Umbridge
stood facing him now, taking in every detail of his appearance instead
of the cabin’s.
“I heard voices,” she said quietly.
“I was talkin’ ter Fang,” said Hagrid stoutly.
“And was he talking back to you?”
“Well . . . in a manner o’ speakin’,” said Hagrid, looking uncomfortable. “I sometimes say Fang’s near enough human —”
“There are three sets of footprints in the snow leading from the castle doors to your cabin,” said Umbridge sleekly.
Hermione gasped; Harry clapped a hand over her mouth. Luckily,
Fang was sniffing loudly around the hem of Professor Umbridge’s
robes, and she did not appear to have heard.
“Well, I on’y jus’ got back,” said Hagrid, waving an enormous hand
at the haversack. “Maybe someone came ter call earlier an’ I missed
em.
“There are no footsteps leading away from your cabin door.”
“Well I . . . I don’ know why that’d be. . . .” said Hagrid, tugging
nervously at his beard and again glancing toward the corner where
Harry, Ron, and Hermione stood, as though asking for help.
“Erm . . .”
Umbridge wheeled around and strode the length of the cabin,
looking around carefully. She bent and peered under the bed. She
opened Hagrid’s cupboards. She passed within two inches of where
Harry, Ron, and Hermione stood pressed against the wall; Harry actually pulled in his stomach as she walked by. After looking carefully
inside the enormous cauldron Hagrid used for cooking she wheeled
around again and said, “What has happened to you? How did you
sustain those injuries?”
Hagrid hastily removed the dragon steak from his face, which in
Harry’s opinion was a mistake, because the black-and-purple bruising
all around his eye was now clearly visible, not to mention the large
amount of fresh and congealed blood on his face. “Oh, I . . . had a bit
of an accident,” he said lamely.
“What sort of accident?”
“I-I tripped.”
“You tripped,” she repeated coolly.
“Yeah, tha’s right. Over . . . over a friends broomstick. I don’ fly,
meself. Well, look at the size o’ me, I don’ reckon there’s a broomstick
that’d hold me. Friend o’ mine breeds Abraxan horses, I dunno if
you’ve ever seen ’em, big beasts, winged, yeh know, I’ve had a bit of a
ride on one o’ them an’ it was —”
“Where have you been?” asked Umbridge, cutting coolly through
Hagrid’s babbling.
“Where’ve I . . . ?”
“Been, yes,” she said. “Term started more than two months ago.
Another teacher has had to cover your classes. None of your colleagues
has been able to give me any information as to your whereabouts. You
left no address. Where have you been?”
There was a pause in which Hagrid stared at her with his newly uncovered eye. Harry could almost hear his brain working furiously.
“I — I’ve been away for me health,” he said.
“For your health,” said Umbridge. Her eyes traveled over Hagrid’s
discolored and swollen face; dragon blood dripped gently onto his
waistcoat in the silence. “I see.”
“Yeah,” said Hagrid, “bit o’ — o’ fresh air, yeh know —”
“Yes, as gamekeeper fresh air must be so difficult to come by,” said
Umbridge sweetly. The small patch of Hagrid’s face that was not black
or purple flushed.
“Well — change o’ scene, yeh know —”
“Mountain scenery?” said Umbridge swiftly.
She knows, Harry thought desperately.
“Mountains?” Hagrid repeated, clearly thinking fast. “Nope, South
of France fer me. Bit o’ sun an’ . . . an’ sea.”
“Really?” said Umbridge. “You don’t have much of a tan.”
“Yeah . . . well . . . sensitive skin,” said Hagrid, attempting an ingratiating smile. Harry noticed that two of his teeth had been knocked
out. Umbridge looked at him coldly; his smile faltered. Then she
hoisted her handbag a little higher into the crook of her arm and said,
“I shall, of course, be informing the Minister of your late return.”
“Righ’,” said Hagrid, nodding.
“You ought to know too that as High Inquisitor it is my unfortunate but necessary duty to inspect my fellow teachers. So I daresay we
shall meet again soon enough.”
She turned sharply and marched back to the door.
“You’re inspectin’ us?” Hagrid echoed blankly, looking after her.
“Oh yes,” said Umbridge softly, looking back at him with her hand
on the door handle. “The Ministry is determined to weed out unsatisfactory teachers, Hagrid. Good night.”
She left, closing the door behind her with a snap. Harry made to
pull off the Invisibility Cloak but Hermione seized his wrist.
“Not yet,” she breathed in his ear. “She might not be gone yet.”
Hagrid seemed to be thinking the same way; he stumped across the
room and pulled back the curtain an inch or so.
“She’s goin’ back ter the castle,” he said in a low voice. “Blimey . . .
inspectin’ people, is she?”
“Yeah,” said Harry, pulling the cloak off. “Trelawney’s on probation
already. . . .”
“Um . . . what sort of thing are you planning to do with us in class,
Hagrid?” asked Hermione.
“Oh, don’ you worry abou’ that, I’ve got a great load o’ lessons
planned,” said Hagrid enthusiastically, scooping up his dragon steak
from the table and slapping it over his eye again. “I’ve bin keepin’ a
couple o’ creatures saved fer yer O.W.L. year, you wait, they’re somethin’ really special.”
“Erm . . . special in what way?” asked Hermione tentatively.
“I’m not sayin’,” said Hagrid happily. “I don’ want ter spoil the
surprise.”
“Look, Hagrid,” said Hermione urgently, dropping all pretense,
“Professor Umbridge won’t be at all happy if you bring anything to
class that’s too dangerous —”
“Dangerous?” said Hagrid, looking genially bemused. “Don’ be
silly, I wouldn’ give yeh anythin’ dangerous! I mean, all righ’, they can
look after themselves —”
“Hagrid, you’ve got to pass Umbridge’s inspection, and to do that
it would really be better if she saw you teaching us how to look after
porlocks, how to tell the difference between knarls and hedgehogs,
stuff like that!” said Hermione earnestly.
“But tha’s not very interestin’, Hermione,” said Hagrid. “The stuff
I’ve got’s much more impressive, I’ve bin bringin’ ’em on fer years, I
reckon I’ve got the on’y domestic herd in Britain —”
“Hagrid . . . please . . .” said Hermione, a note of real desperation
in her voice. “Umbridge is looking for any excuse to get rid of teachers she thinks are too close to Dumbledore. Please, Hagrid, teach us
something dull that’s bound to come up in our O.W.L. . . .”
But Hagrid merely yawned widely and cast a one-eyed look of
longing toward the vast bed in the corner.
“Lis’en, it’s bin a long day an’ it’s late,” he said, patting Hermione
gently on the shoulder, so that her knees gave way and hit the floor
with a thud. “Oh — sorry —” He pulled her back up by the neck of
her robes. “Look, don’ you go worryin’ abou’ me, I promise yeh I’ve
got really good stuff planned fer yer lessons now I’m back. . . . Now
you lot had better get back up to the castle, an’ don’ forget ter wipe
yer footprints out behind yeh!”
“I dunno if you got through to him,” said Ron a short while later
when, having checked that the coast was clear, they walked back up to
the castle through the thickening snow, leaving no trace behind them
due to the Obliteration Charm Hermione was performing as they
went.
“Then I’ll go back again tomorrow,” said Hermione determinedly.
“I’ll plan his lessons for him if I have to. I don’t care if she throws out
Trelawney but she’s not taking Hagrid!”

C H A P T E R T W E N T Y - O N E
THE EYE OF THE SNAKE

Hermione plowed her way back to Hagrid’s cabin through two
feet of snow on Sunday morning. Harry and Ron wanted to
go with her, but their mountain of homework had reached an alarming height again, so they grudgingly remained in the common room,
trying to ignore the gleeful shouts drifting up from the grounds outside, where students were enjoying themselves skating on the frozen
lake, tobogganing, and worst of all, bewitching snowballs to zoom up
to Gryffindor Tower and rap hard on the windows.
“Oy!” bellowed Ron, finally losing patience and sticking his head
out of the window, “I am a prefect and if one more snowball hits this
window — OUCH!”
He withdrew his head sharply, his face covered in snow.
“It’s Fred and George,” he said bitterly, slamming the window behind him. “Gits . . .”
Hermione returned from Hagrid’s just before lunch, shivering
slightly, her robes damp to the knees.
“So?” said Ron, looking up when she entered. “Got all his lessons
planned for him?”
“Well, I tried,” she said dully, sinking into a chair beside Harry. She
pulled out her wand and gave it a complicated little wave so that hot
air streamed out of the tip; she then pointed this at her robes, which
began to steam as they dried out. “He wasn’t even there when I arrived, I was knocking for at least half an hour. And then he came
stumping out of the forest —”
Harry groaned. The Forbidden Forest was teeming with the kind of
creatures most likely to get Hagrid the sack. “What’s he keeping in
there? Did he say?” asked Harry.
“No,” said Hermione miserably. “He says he wants them to be a
surprise. I tried to explain about Umbridge, but he just doesn’t get it.
He kept saying nobody in their right mind would rather study knarls
than chimaeras — oh I don’t think he’s got a chimaera,” she added at
the appalled look on Harry and Ron’s faces, “but that’s not for lack of
trying from what he said about how hard it is to get eggs. . . . I don’t
know how many times I told him he’d be better off following
Grubbly-Plank’s plan, I honestly don’t think he listened to half of
what I said. He’s in a bit of a funny mood, you know. He still won’t
say how he got all those injuries. . . .”
Hagrid’s reappearance at the staff table at breakfast next day was
not greeted by enthusiasm from all students. Some, like Fred, George,
and Lee, roared with delight and sprinted up the aisle between the
Gryffindor and Hufflepuff tables to wring Hagrid’s enormous hand;
others, like Parvati and Lavender, exchanged gloomy looks and shook
their heads. Harry knew that many of them preferred Professor
Grubbly-Plank’s lessons, and the worst of it was that a very small, unbiased part of him knew that they had good reason: Grubbly-Plank’s
idea of an interesting class was not one where there was a risk that
somebody might have their head ripped off.
It was with a certain amount of apprehension that Harry, Ron, and
Hermione headed down to Hagrid’s on Tuesday, heavily muffled
against the cold. Harry was worried, not only about what Hagrid
might have decided to teach them, but also about how the rest of the
class, particularly Malfoy and his cronies, would behave if Umbridge
was watching them.
However, the High Inquisitor was nowhere to be seen as they struggled through the snow toward Hagrid, who stood waiting for them on
the edge of the forest. He did not present a reassuring sight; the
bruises that had been purple on Saturday night were now tinged with
green and yellow and some of his cuts still seemed to be bleeding.
Harry could not understand this: Had Hagrid perhaps been attacked
by some creature whose venom prevented the wounds it inflicted from
healing? As though to complete the ominous picture, Hagrid was
carrying what looked like half a dead cow over his shoulder.
“We’re workin’ in here today!” Hagrid called happily to the approaching students, jerking his head back at the dark trees behind
him. “Bit more sheltered! Anyway, they prefer the dark. . . .”
“What prefers the dark?” Harry heard Malfoy say sharply to
Crabbe and Goyle, a trace of panic in his voice. “What did he say
prefers the dark — did you hear?”
Harry remembered the only occasion on which Malfoy had entered
the forest before now; he had not been very brave then either. He
smiled to himself; after the Quidditch match anything that caused
Malfoy discomfort was all right with him.
“Ready?” said Hagrid happily, looking around at the class. “Right,
well, I’ve bin savin’ a trip inter the forest fer yer fifth year. Thought
we’d go an’ see these creatures in their natural habitat. Now, what
we’re studyin’ today is pretty rare, I reckon I’m probably the on’y person in Britain who’s managed ter train ’em —”
“And you’re sure they’re trained, are you?” said Malfoy, the panic in
his voice even more pronounced now. “Only it wouldn’t be the first
time you’d brought wild stuff to class, would it?”
The Slytherins murmured agreement and a few Gryffindors looked
as though they thought Malfoy had a fair point too.
“ ’Course they’re trained,” said Hagrid, scowling and hoisting the
dead cow a little higher on his shoulder.
“So what happened to your face, then?” demanded Malfoy.
“Mind yer own business!” said Hagrid, angrily. “Now if yeh’ve finished askin’ stupid questions, follow me!”
He turned and strode straight into the forest. Nobody seemed
much disposed to follow. Harry glanced at Ron and Hermione, who
sighed but nodded, and the three of them set off after Hagrid, leading
the rest of the class.
They walked for about ten minutes until they reached a place
where the trees stood so closely together that it was as dark as twilight
and there was no snow on the ground at all. Hagrid deposited his half
a cow with a grunt on the ground, stepped back, and turned to face
his class again, most of whom were creeping toward him from tree to
tree, peering around nervously as though expecting to be set upon at
any moment.
“Gather roun’, gather roun’,” said Hagrid encouragingly. “Now,
they’ll be attracted by the smell o’ the meat but I’m goin’ ter give ’em
a call anyway, ’cause they’ll like ter know it’s me. . . .”
He turned, shook his shaggy head to get the hair out of his face,
and gave an odd, shrieking cry that echoed through the dark trees like
the call of some monstrous bird. Nobody laughed; most of them
looked too scared to make a sound.
Hagrid gave the shrieking cry again. A minute passed in which the
class continued to peer nervously over their shoulders and around
trees for a first glimpse of whatever it was that was coming. And then,
as Hagrid shook his hair back for a third time and expanded his enormous chest, Harry nudged Ron and pointed into the black space between two gnarled yew trees.
A pair of blank, white, shining eyes were growing larger through
the gloom and a moment later the dragonish face, neck, and then
skeletal body of a great, black, winged horse emerged from the darkness. 
It looked around at the class for a few seconds, swishing its long
black tail, then bowed its head and began to tear flesh from the dead
cow with its pointed fangs.
A great wave of relief broke over Harry. Here at last was proof that
he had not imagined these creatures, that they were real: Hagrid knew
about them too. He looked eagerly at Ron, but Ron was still staring
around into the trees and after a few seconds he whispered, “Why
doesn’t Hagrid call again?”
Most of the rest of the class were wearing expressions as confused
and nervously expectant as Ron’s and were still gazing everywhere but
at the horse standing feet from them. There were only two other people who seemed to be able to see them: a stringy Slytherin boy standing
just behind Goyle was watching the horse eating with an expression of
great distaste on his face, and Neville, whose eyes were following the
swishing progress of the long black tail.
“Oh, an’ here comes another one!” said Hagrid proudly, as a second
black horse appeared out of the dark trees, folded its leathery wings
closer to its body, and dipped its head to gorge on the meat. “Now . . .
put yer hands up, who can see ’em?”
Immensely pleased to feel that he was at last going to understand the
mystery of these horses, Harry raised his hand. Hagrid nodded at him.
“Yeah . . . yeah, I knew you’d be able ter, Harry,” he said seriously.
“An’ you too, Neville, eh? An’ —”
“Excuse me,” said Malfoy in a sneering voice, “but what exactly are
we supposed to be seeing?”
For answer, Hagrid pointed at the cow carcass on the ground. The
whole class stared at it for a few seconds, then several people gasped
and Parvati squealed. Harry understood why: Bits of flesh stripping
themselves away from the bones and vanishing into thin air had to
look very odd indeed.
“What’s doing it?” Parvati demanded in a terrified voice, retreating
behind the nearest tree. “What’s eating it?”
“Thestrals,” said Hagrid proudly and Hermione gave a soft “oh!” of
comprehension at Harry’s shoulder. “Hogwarts has got a whole herd
of ’em in here. Now, who knows — ?”
“But they’re really, really unlucky!” interrupted Parvati, looking
alarmed. “They’re supposed to bring all sorts of horrible misfortune
on people who see them. Professor Trelawney told me once —”
“No, no, no,” said Hagrid, chuckling, “tha’s jus’ superstition, that
is, they aren’ unlucky, they’re dead clever an’ useful! ’Course, this lot
don’ get a lot o’ work, it’s mainly jus’ pullin’ the school carriages unless Dumbledore’s takin’ a long journey an’ don’ want ter Apparate —
an’ here’s another couple, look —”
Two more horses came quietly out of the trees, one of them passing
very close to Parvati, who shivered and pressed herself closer to the
tree, saying, “I think I felt something, I think it’s near me!”
“Don’ worry, it won’ hurt yeh,” said Hagrid patiently. “Righ’, now,
who can tell me why some o’ you can see them an’ some can’t?”
Hermione raised her hand.
“Go on then,” said Hagrid, beaming at her.
“The only people who can see thestrals,” she said, “are people who
have seen death.”
“Tha’s exactly right,” said Hagrid solemnly, “ten points ter Gryffindor. Now, thestrals —”
“Hem, hem.”
Professor Umbridge had arrived. She was standing a few feet away
from Harry, wearing her green hat and cloak again, her clipboard at
the ready. Hagrid, who had never heard Umbridge’s fake cough before, was gazing in some concern at the closest thestral, evidently under the impression that it had made the sound.
“Hem, hem.”
“Oh hello!” Hagrid said, smiling, having located the source of the
noise.
“You received the note I sent to your cabin this morning?” said
Umbridge, in the same loud, slow voice she had used with him earlier,
as though she was addressing somebody both foreign and very slow.
“Telling you that I would be inspecting your lesson?”
“Oh yeah,” said Hagrid brightly. “Glad yeh found the place all
righ’! Well, as you can see — or, I dunno — can you? We’re doin’
thestrals today —”
“I’m sorry?” said Umbridge loudly, cupping her hand around her
ear and frowning. “What did you say?”
Hagrid looked a little confused.
“Er — thestrals!” he said loudly. “Big — er — winged horses, yeh
know!”
He flapped his gigantic arms hopefully. Professor Umbridge raised
her eyebrows at him and muttered as she made a note on her clipboard,
“ ‘has . . . to . . . resort . . . to . . . crude . . . sign . . . language . . .’ ”
“Well . . . anyway . . .” said Hagrid, turning back to the class and
looking slightly flustered. “Erm . . . what was I sayin’?”
“ ‘Appears . . . to . . . have . . . poor . . . short . . . term . . . memory . . .’ ”
muttered Umbridge, loudly enough for everyone to hear her. Draco
Malfoy looked as though Christmas had come a month early; Hermione, on the other hand, had turned scarlet with suppressed rage.
“Oh yeah,” said Hagrid, throwing an uneasy glance at Umbridge’s
clipboard, but plowing on valiantly. “Yeah, I was gonna tell yeh how
come we got a herd. Yeah, so, we started off with a male an’ five females. This one,” he patted the first horse to have appeared, “name o’
Tenebrus, he’s my special favorite, firs’ one born here in the forest —”
“Are you aware,” Umbridge said loudly, interrupting him, “that the
Ministry of Magic has classified thestrals as ‘dangerous’?”
Harry’s heart sank like a stone, but Hagrid merely chuckled.
“Thestrals aren’ dangerous! All righ, they might take a bite outta
you if yeh really annoy them —”
“ ‘Shows . . . signs . . . of . . . pleasure . . . at . . . idea . . . of . . . violence . . . ’ ” muttered Umbridge, scribbling on her clipboard again.
“No — come on!” said Hagrid, looking a little anxious now. “I
mean, a dog’ll bite if yeh bait it, won’ it — but thestrals have jus’ got
a bad reputation because o’ the death thing — people used ter think
they were bad omens, didn’ they? Jus’ didn’ understand, did they?”
Umbridge did not answer; she finished writing her last note, then
looked up at Hagrid and said, again very loudly and slowly, “Please
continue teaching as usual. I am going to walk” — she mimed walking — Malfoy and Pansy Parkinson were having silent fits of laughter
— “among the students” — she pointed around at individual members of the class — “and ask them questions.” She pointed at her
mouth to indicate talking.
Hagrid stared at her, clearly at a complete loss to understand why
she was acting as though he did not understand normal English.
Hermione had tears of fury in her eyes now.
“You hag, you evil hag!” she whispered, as Umbridge walked toward Pansy Parkinson. “I know what you’re doing, you awful, twisted,
vicious —”
“Erm . . . anyway,” said Hagrid, clearly struggling to regain the
flow of his lesson, “so — thestrals. Yeah. Well, there’s loads o’ good
stuff abou’ them. . . .”
“Do you find,” said Professor Umbridge in a ringing voice to Pansy
Parkinson, “that you are able to understand Professor Hagrid when he
talks?”
Just like Hermione, Pansy had tears in her eyes, but these were tears
of laughter; indeed, her answer was almost incoherent because she was
trying to suppress her giggles. “No . . . because . . . well . . . it sounds
. . . like grunting a lot of the time. . . .”
Umbridge scribbled on her clipboard. The few unbruised bits of
Hagrid’s face flushed, but he tried to act as though he had not heard
Pansy’s answer.
“Er . . . yeah . . . good stuff abou’ thestrals. Well, once they’re
tamed, like this lot, yeh’ll never be lost again. ‘Mazin’ senses o’ direction, jus’ tell ’em where yeh want ter go —”
“Assuming they can understand you, of course,” said Malfoy
loudly, and Pansy Parkinson collapsed in a fit of renewed giggles. Professor Umbridge smiled indulgently at them and then turned to
Neville.
“You can see the thestrals, Longbottom, can you?” she said.
Neville nodded.
“Whom did you see die?” she asked, her tone indifferent.
“My . . . my grandad,” said Neville.
“And what do you think of them?” she said, waving her stubby
hand at the horses, who by now had stripped a great deal of the carcass down to bone.
“Erm,” said Neville nervously, with a glance at Hagrid. “Well,
they’re . . . er . . . okay. . . .”
“ ‘Students . . . are . . . too . . . intimidated . . . to . . . admit . . . they
. . . are . . . frightened. . . .’ ” muttered Umbridge, making another
note on her clipboard.
“No!” said Neville, looking upset, “no, I’m not scared of them — !”
“It’s quite all right,” said Umbridge, patting Neville on the shoulder with what she evidently intended to be an understanding smile,
though it looked more like a leer to Harry. “Well, Hagrid,” she turned
to look up at him again, speaking once more in that loud, slow voice,
“I think I’ve got enough to be getting along with. . . . You will receive” — she mimed taking something from the air in front of her —
“the results of your inspection” — she pointed at the clipboard — “in
ten days’ time.” She held up ten stubby little fingers, then, her smile
wider and more toadlike than ever before beneath her green hat, she
bustled from their midst, leaving Malfoy and Pansy Parkinson in fits
of laughter, Hermione actually shaking with fury, and Neville looking
confused and upset.
“That foul, lying, twisting old gargoyle!” stormed Hermione half
an hour later, as they made their way back up to the castle through the
channels they had made earlier in the snow. “You see what she’s up to?
It’s her thing about half-breeds all over again — she’s trying to make
out Hagrid’s some kind of dim-witted troll, just because he had a giantess for a mother — and oh, it’s not fair, that really wasn’t a bad lesson at all — I mean, all right, if it had been Blast-Ended Skrewts
again, but thestrals are fine — in fact, for Hagrid, they’re really good!”
“Umbridge said they’re dangerous,” said Ron.
“Well, it’s like Hagrid said, they can look after themselves,” said
Hermione impatiently, “and I suppose a teacher like Grubbly-Plank
wouldn’t usually show them to us before N.E.W.T. level, but, well,
they are very interesting, aren’t they? The way some people can see
them and some can’t! I wish I could.”
“Do you?” Harry asked her quietly.
She looked horrorstruck.
“Oh Harry — I’m sorry — no, of course I don’t — that was a really stupid thing to say —”
“It’s okay,” he said quickly, “don’t worry. . . .”
“I’m surprised so many people could see them,” said Ron. “Three in
a class —”
“Yeah, Weasley, we were just wondering,” said a malicious voice
nearby. Unheard by any of them in the muffling snow, Malfoy,
Crabbe, and Goyle were walking along right behind them. “D’you
reckon if you saw someone snuff it you’d be able to see the Quaffle
better?”
He, Crabbe, and Goyle roared with laughter as they pushed past on
their way to the castle and then broke into a chorus of “Weasley Is
Our King.” Ron’s ears turned scarlet.
“Ignore them, just ignore them,” intoned Hermione, pulling out
her wand and performing the charm to produce hot air again, so that
she could melt them an easier path through the untouched snow between them and the greenhouses.
December arrived, bringing with it more snow and a positive
avalanche of homework for the fifth years. Ron and Hermione’s prefect duties also became more and more onerous as Christmas approached. They were called upon to supervise the decoration of the
castle (“You try putting up tinsel when Peeves has got the other end
and is trying to strangle you with it,” said Ron), to watch over first
and second years spending their break times inside because of the bitter cold (“And they’re cheeky little snotrags, you know, we definitely
weren’t that rude when we were in first year,” said Ron), and to patrol
the corridors in shifts with Argus Filch, who suspected that the holiday spirit might show itself in an outbreak of wizard duels (“He’s got
dung for brains, that one,” said Ron furiously). They were so busy that
Hermione had stopped knitting elf hats and was fretting that she was
down to her last three.
“All those poor elves I haven’t set free yet, having to stay over during Christmas because there aren’t enough hats!”
Harry, who had not had the heart to tell her that Dobby was taking
everything she made, bent lower over his History of Magic essay. In
any case, he did not want to think about Christmas. For the first time
in his school career, he very much wanted to spend the holidays away
from Hogwarts. Between his Quidditch ban and worry about whether
or not Hagrid was going to be put on probation, he felt highly resentful toward the place at the moment. The only thing he really looked
forward to were the D.A. meetings, and they would have to stop over
the holidays, as nearly everybody in the D.A. would be spending the
time with their families. Hermione was going skiing with her parents,
something that greatly amused Ron, who had never before heard of
Muggles strapping narrow strips of wood to their feet to slide down
mountains. Ron, meanwhile, was going home to the Burrow. Harry
endured several days of jealousy before Ron said, in response to Harry
asking how Ron was going to get home for Christmas, “But you’re
coming too! Didn’t I say? Mum wrote and told me to invite you weeks
ago!
Hermione rolled her eyes, but Harry’s spirits soared: The thought
of Christmas at the Burrow was truly wonderful, only slightly marred
by Harry’s guilty feeling that he would not be able to spend the holiday with Sirius. He wondered whether he could possibly persuade
Mrs. Weasley to invite his godfather for the festivities too, but apart
from the fact that he doubted whether Dumbledore would permit Sirius to leave Grimmauld Place, he could not help but feel that Mrs.
Weasley might not want him; they were so often at loggerheads. Sirius had not contacted Harry at all since his last appearance in the fire,
and although Harry knew that with Umbridge on the constant watch
it would be unwise to attempt to contact him, he did not like to think
of Sirius alone in his mother’s old house, perhaps pulling a lonely
cracker with Kreacher.
Harry arrived early in the Room of Requirement for the last D.A.
meeting before the holidays and was very glad he had, because when
the lamps burst into light he saw that Dobby had taken it upon himself to decorate the place for Christmas. He could tell the elf had done
it, because nobody else would have strung a hundred golden baubles
from the ceiling, each showing a picture of Harry’s face and bearing
the legend HAVE A VERY HARRY CHRISTMAS!
Harry had only just managed to get the last of them down before
the door creaked open and Luna Lovegood entered, looking dreamy
as always.
“Hello,” she said vaguely, looking around at what remained of the
decorations. “These are nice, did you put them up?”
“No,” said Harry, “it was Dobby the house-elf.”
“Mistletoe,” said Luna dreamily, pointing at a large clump of white
berries placed almost over Harry’s head. He jumped out from under
it. “Good thinking,” said Luna very seriously. “It’s often infested with
nargles.”
Harry was saved the necessity of asking what nargles were by the
arrival of Angelina, Katie, and Alicia. All three of them were breathless and looked very cold.
“Well,” said Angelina dully, pulling off her cloak and throwing it
into a corner, “we’ve replaced you.”
“Replaced me?” said Harry blankly.
“You and Fred and George,” she said impatiently. “We’ve got another Seeker!”
“Who?” said Harry quickly.
“Ginny Weasley,” said Katie.
Harry gaped at her.
“Yeah, I know,” said Angelina, pulling out her wand and flexing her
arm. “But she’s pretty good, actually. Nothing on you, of course,” she
said, throwing him a very dirty look, “but as we can’t have you . . .”
Harry bit back the retort he was longing to utter: Did she imagine
for a second that he did not regret his expulsion from the team a hundred times more than she did?
“And what about the Beaters?” he asked, trying to keep his voice
even.
“Andrew Kirke,” said Alicia without enthusiasm, “and Jack Sloper.
Neither of them are brilliant, but compared with the rest of the idiots
who turned up . . .”
The arrival of Ron, Hermione, and Neville brought this depressing
discussion to an end and within five minutes, the room was full
enough to prevent him seeing Angelina’s burning, reproachful looks.
“Okay,” he said, calling them all to order. “I thought this evening
we should just go over the things we’ve done so far, because it’s the last
meeting before the holidays and there’s no point starting anything
new right before a three-week break —”
“We’re not doing anything new?” said Zacharias Smith, in a disgruntled whisper loud enough to carry through the room. “If I’d
known that, I wouldn’t have come. . . .”
“We’re all really sorry Harry didn’t tell you, then,” said Fred loudly.
Several people sniggered. Harry saw Cho laughing and felt the familiar swooping sensation in his stomach, as though he had missed a
step going downstairs.
“We can practice in pairs,” said Harry. “We’ll start with the Impediment Jinx, just for ten minutes, then we can get out the cushions
and try Stunning again.”
They all divided up obediently; Harry partnered Neville as usual.
The room was soon full of intermittent cries of “Impedimenta!” People
froze for a minute or so, during which their partners would stare
aimlessly around the room watching other pairs at work, then would
unfreeze and take their turn at the jinx.
Neville had improved beyond all recognition. After a while, when
Harry had unfrozen three times in a row, he had Neville join Ron and
Hermione again so that he could walk around the room and watch the
others. When he passed Cho she beamed at him; he resisted the temptation to walk past her several more times.
After ten minutes on the Impediment Jinx, they laid out cushions
all over the floor and started practicing Stunning again. Space was
really too confined to allow them all to work this spell at once; half the
group observed the others for a while, then swapped over. Harry felt
himself positively swelling with pride as he watched them all. True,
Neville did Stun Padma Patil rather than Dean, at whom he had been
aiming, but it was a much closer miss than usual, and everybody else
had made enormous progress.
At the end of an hour, Harry called a halt.
“You’re getting really good,” he said, beaming around at them.
“When we get back from the holidays we can start doing some of the
big stuff — maybe even Patronuses.”
There was a murmur of excitement. The room began to clear in the
usual twos and threes; most people wished Harry a Happy Christmas
as they went. Feeling cheerful, he collected up the cushions with Ron
and Hermione and stacked them neatly away. Ron and Hermione left
before he did; he hung back a little, because Cho was still there and he
was hoping to receive a Merry Christmas from her.
“No, you go on,” he heard her say to her friend Marietta, and his
heart gave a jolt that seemed to take it into the region of his Adam’s
apple.
He pretended to be straightening the cushion pile. He was quite
sure they were alone now and waited for her to speak. Instead, he
heard a hearty sniff.
He turned and saw Cho standing in the middle of the room, tears
pouring down her face.
“Wha — ?”
He didn’t know what to do. She was simply standing there, crying
silently.
“What’s up?” he said feebly.
She shook her head and wiped her eyes on her sleeve. “I’m —
sorry,” she said thickly. “I suppose . . . it’s just . . . learning all this
stuff. . . . It just makes me . . . wonder whether . . . if he’d known it all
. . . he’d still be alive. . . .”
Harry’s heart sank right back past its usual spot and settled somewhere around his navel. He ought to have known. She wanted to talk
about Cedric.
“He did know this stuff,” Harry said heavily. “He was really good
at it, or he could never have got to the middle of that maze. But if
Voldemort really wants to kill you, you don’t stand a chance.”
She hiccuped at the sound of Voldemort’s name, but stared at
Harry without flinching.
“You survived when you were just a baby,” she said quietly.
“Yeah, well,” said Harry wearily, moving toward the door, “I dunno
why, nor does anyone else, so it’s nothing to be proud of.”
“Oh don’t go!” said Cho, sounding tearful again. “I’m really sorry
to get all upset like this. . . . I didn’t mean to. . . .”
She hiccuped again. She was very pretty even when her eyes were
red and puffy. Harry felt thoroughly miserable. He’d have been so
pleased just with a Merry Christmas. . . .
“I know it must be horrible for you,” she said, mopping her eyes on
her sleeve again. “Me mentioning Cedric, when you saw him die. . . .
I suppose you just want to forget about it. . . .”
Harry did not say anything to this; it was quite true, but he felt
heartless saying it.
“You’re a r-really good teacher, you know,” said Cho, with a watery
smile. “I’ve never been able to Stun anything before.”
“Thanks,” said Harry awkwardly.
They looked at each other for a long moment. Harry felt a burning
desire to run from the room and, at the same time, a complete inability to move his feet.
“Mistletoe,” said Cho quietly, pointing at the ceiling over his head.
“Yeah,” said Harry. His mouth was very dry. “It’s probably full of
nargles, though.”
“What are nargles?”
“No idea,” said Harry. She had moved closer. His brain seemed to
have been Stunned. “You’d have to ask Loony. Luna, I mean.”
Cho made a funny noise halfway between a sob and a laugh. She
was even nearer him now. He could have counted the freckles on her
nose.
“I really like you, Harry.”
He could not think. A tingling sensation was spreading throughout
him, paralyzing his arms, legs, and brain.
She was much too close. He could see every tear clinging to her
eyelashes. . . .
He returned to the common room half an hour later to find
Hermione and Ron in the best seats by the fire; nearly everybody else
had gone to bed. Hermione was writing a very long letter; she had already filled half a roll of parchment, which was dangling from the
edge of the table. Ron was lying on the hearthrug, trying to finish his
Transfiguration homework.
“What kept you?” he asked, as Harry sank into the armchair next
to Hermione’s.
Harry did not answer. He was in a state of shock. Half of him
wanted to tell Ron and Hermione what had just happened, but the
other half wanted to take the secret with him to the grave.
“Are you all right, Harry?” Hermione asked, peering at him over
the tip of her quill.
Harry gave a halfhearted shrug. In truth, he didn’t know whether
he was all right or not. “What’s up?” said Ron, hoisting himself up on
his elbow to get a clearer view of Harry. “What’s happened?”
Harry didn’t quite know how to set about telling them, and still
wasn’t sure whether he wanted to. Just as he had decided not to say
anything, Hermione took matters out of his hands.
“Is it Cho?” she asked in a businesslike way. “Did she corner you after the meeting?”
Numbly surprised, Harry nodded. Ron sniggered, breaking off
when Hermione caught his eye.
“So — er — what did she want?” he asked in a mock casual voice.
“She —” Harry began, rather hoarsely; he cleared his throat and
tried again. “She — er —”
“Did you kiss?” asked Hermione briskly.
Ron sat up so fast that he sent his ink bottle flying all over the rug.
Disregarding this completely he stared avidly at Harry.
“Well?” he demanded.
Harry looked from Ron’s expression of mingled curiosity and hilarity to Hermione’s slight frown, and nodded.
“HA!”
Ron made a triumphant gesture with his fist and went into a raucous peal of laughter that made several timid-looking second years
over beside the window jump. A reluctant grin spread over Harry’s
face as he watched Ron rolling around on the hearthrug. Hermione
gave Ron a look of deep disgust and returned to her letter.
“Well?” Ron said finally, looking up at Harry. “How was it?”
Harry considered for a moment.
“Wet,” he said truthfully.
Ron made a noise that might have indicated jubilation or disgust,
it was hard to tell.
“Because she was crying,” Harry continued heavily.
“Oh,” said Ron, his smile fading slightly. “Are you that bad at
kissing?”
“Dunno,” said Harry, who hadn’t considered this, and immediately
felt rather worried. “Maybe I am.”
“Of course you’re not,” said Hermione absently, still scribbling
away at her letter.
“How do you know?” said Ron in a sharp voice.
“Because Cho spends half her time crying these days,” said Hermione vaguely. “She does it at mealtimes, in the loos, all over the
place.”
“You’d think a bit of kissing would cheer her up,” said Ron,
grinning.
“Ron,” said Hermione in a dignified voice, dipping the point of her
quill into her ink pot, “you are the most insensitive wart I have ever
had the misfortune to meet.”
“What’s that supposed to mean?” said Ron indignantly. “What sort
of person cries while someone’s kissing them?”
“Yeah,” said Harry, slightly desperately, “who does?”
Hermione looked at the pair of them with an almost pitying expression on her face.
“Don’t you understand how Cho’s feeling at the moment?” she
asked.
“No,” said Harry and Ron together.
Hermione sighed and laid down her quill.
“Well, obviously, she’s feeling very sad, because of Cedric dying.
Then I expect she’s feeling confused because she liked Cedric and now
she likes Harry, and she can’t work out who she likes best. Then she’ll
be feeling guilty, thinking it’s an insult to Cedric’s memory to be kissing Harry at all, and she’ll be worrying about what everyone else
might say about her if she starts going out with Harry. And she probably can’t work out what her feelings toward Harry are anyway, because he was the one who was with Cedric when Cedric died, so that’s
all very mixed up and painful. Oh, and she’s afraid she’s going to be
thrown off the Ravenclaw Quidditch team because she’s been flying so
badly.”
A slightly stunned silence greeted the end of this speech, then Ron
said, “One person can’t feel all that at once, they’d explode.”
“Just because you’ve got the emotional range of a teaspoon doesn’t
mean we all have,” said Hermione nastily, picking up her quill again.
“She was the one who started it,” said Harry. “I wouldn’t’ve — she
just sort of came at me — and next thing she’s crying all over me — I
didn’t know what to do —”
“Don’t blame you, mate,” said Ron, looking alarmed at the very
thought.
“You just had to be nice to her,” said Hermione, looking up anxiously. “You were, weren’t you?”
“Well,” said Harry, an unpleasant heat creeping up his face, “I sort
of — patted her on the back a bit.”
Hermione looked as though she was restraining herself from rolling
her eyes with extreme difficulty.
“Well, I suppose it could have been worse,” she said. “Are you going to see her again?”
“I’ll have to, won’t I?” said Harry. “We’ve got D.A. meetings,
haven’t we?”
“You know what I mean,” said Hermione impatiently.
Harry said nothing. Hermione’s words opened up a whole new
vista of frightening possibilities. He tried to imagine going somewhere
with Cho — Hogsmeade, perhaps — and being alone with her for
hours at a time. Of course, she would have been expecting him to ask
her out after what had just happened. . . . The thought made his
stomach clench painfully.
“Oh well,” said Hermione distantly, buried in her letter once more,
“you’ll have plenty of opportunities to ask her. . . .”
“What if he doesn’t want to ask her?” said Ron, who had been
watching Harry with an unusually shrewd expression on his face.
“Don’t be silly,” said Hermione vaguely, “Harry’s liked her for ages,
haven’t you, Harry?”
He did not answer. Yes, he had liked Cho for ages, but whenever he
had imagined a scene involving the two of them it had always featured
a Cho who was enjoying herself, as opposed to a Cho who was sobbing uncontrollably into his shoulder.
“Who’re you writing the novel to anyway?” Ron asked Hermione,
trying to read the bit of parchment now trailing on the floor.
Hermione hitched it up out of sight.
“Viktor.”
“Krum?”
“How many other Viktors do we know?”
Ron said nothing, but looked disgruntled. They sat in silence for
another twenty minutes, Ron finishing his Transfiguration essay with
many snorts of impatience and crossings-out, Hermione writing
steadily to the very end of the parchment, rolling it up carefully and
sealing it, and Harry staring into the fire, wishing more than anything
that Sirius’s head would appear there and give him some advice about
girls. But the fire merely crackled lower and lower, until the red-hot
embers crumbled into ash and, looking around, Harry saw that they
were, yet again, the last in the common room.
“Well, ’night,” said Hermione, yawning widely, and she set off up
the girls’ staircase.
“What does she see in Krum?” Ron demanded as he and Harry
climbed the boys’ stairs.
“Well,” said Harry, considering the matter, “I s’pose he’s older, isn’t
he . . . and he’s an international Quidditch player. . . .”
“Yeah, but apart from that,” said Ron, sounding aggravated. “I
mean he’s a grouchy git, isn’t he?”
“Bit grouchy, yeah,” said Harry, whose thoughts were still on Cho.
They pulled off their robes and put on pajamas in silence; Dean,
Seamus, and Neville were already asleep. Harry put his glasses on his
bedside table and got into bed but did not pull the hangings closed
around his four-poster; instead he stared at the patch of starry sky visible through the window next to Neville’s bed. If he had known, this
time last night, that in twenty-four hours’ time he would have kissed
Cho Chang . . .
“ ’Night,” grunted Ron, from somewhere to his right.
“ ’Night,” said Harry.
Maybe next time . . . if there was a next time . . . she’d be a bit
happier. He ought to have asked her out; she had probably been
expecting it and was now really angry with him . . . or was she lying in
bed, still crying about Cedric? He did not know what to think.
Hermione’s explanation had made it all seem more complicated rather
than easier to understand.
That’s what they should teach us here, he thought, turning over onto
his side, how girls’ brains work . . . it’d be more useful than Divination
anyway. . . .
Neville snuffled in his sleep. An owl hooted somewhere out in the
night.
Harry dreamed he was back in the D.A. room. Cho was accusing
him of luring her there under false pretenses; she said that he had
promised her a hundred and fifty Chocolate Frog cards if she showed
up. Harry protested. . . . Cho shouted, “Cedric gave me loads of Chocolate Frog cards, look !” And she pulled out fistfuls of cards from inside
her robes and threw them into the air, and then turned into
Hermione, who said, “You did promise her, you know, Harry. . . . I
think you’d better give her something else instead. . . . How about your
Firebolt?” And Harry was protesting that he could not give Cho his
Firebolt because Umbridge had it, and anyway the whole thing was
ridiculous, he’d only come to the D.A. room to put up some Christmas baubles shaped like Dobby’s head. . . .
The dream changed. . . .
His body felt smooth, powerful, and flexible. He was gliding between shining metal bars, across dark, cold stone. . . . He was flat
against the floor, sliding along on his belly. . . . It was dark, yet he
could see objects around him shimmering in strange, vibrant colors.
. . . He was turning his head. . . . At first glance, the corridor was
empty . . . but no . . . a man was sitting on the floor ahead, his chin
drooping onto his chest, his outline gleaming in the dark. . . .
Harry put out his tongue. . . . He tasted the man’s scent on the air.
. . . He was alive but drowsing . . . sitting in front of a door at the end
of the corridor . . .
Harry longed to bite the man . . . but he must master the impulse.
. . . He had more important work to do. . . .
But the man was stirring . . . a silvery cloak fell from his legs as he
jumped to his feet; and Harry saw his vibrant, blurred outline towering above him, saw a wand withdrawn from a belt. . . . He had no
choice. . . . He reared high from the floor and struck once, twice,
three times, plunging his fangs deeply into the man’s flesh, feeling his
ribs splinter beneath his jaws, feeling the warm gush of blood. . . .
The man was yelling in pain . . . then he fell silent. . . . He slumped
backward against the wall. . . . Blood was splattering onto the floor. . . .
His forehead hurt terribly. . . . It was aching fit to burst. . . .
“Harry! HARRY!”
He opened his eyes. Every inch of his body was covered in icy
sweat; his bedcovers were twisted all around him like a straitjacket; he
felt as though a white-hot poker was being applied to his forehead.
“Harry!”
Ron was standing over him looking extremely frightened. There
were more figures at the foot of Harry’s bed. He clutched his head in
his hands; the pain was blinding him. . . . He rolled right over and
vomited over the edge of the mattress.
“He’s really ill,” said a scared voice. “Should we call someone?”
“Harry! Harry!”
He had to tell Ron, it was very important that he tell him. . . . Taking great gulps of air, Harry pushed himself up in bed, willing himself
not to throw up again, the pain half-blinding him.
“Your dad,” he panted, his chest heaving. “Your dad’s . . . been
attacked. . . .”
“What?” said Ron uncomprehendingly.
“Your dad! He’s been bitten, it’s serious, there was blood
everywhere. . . .”
“I’m going for help,” said the same scared voice, and Harry heard
footsteps running out of the dormitory.
“Harry, mate,” said Ron uncertainly, “you . . . you were just
dreaming. . . .”
“No!” said Harry furiously; it was crucial that Ron understand. “It
wasn’t a dream . . . not an ordinary dream. . . . I was there, I saw it.
. . . I did it. . . .”
He could hear Seamus and Dean muttering but did not care. The
pain in his forehead was subsiding slightly, though he was still sweating and shivering feverishly. He retched again and Ron leapt backward
out of the way.
“Harry, you’re not well,” he said shakily. “Neville’s gone for
help. . . .”
“I’m fine!” Harry choked, wiping his mouth on his pajamas and
shaking uncontrollably. “There’s nothing wrong with me, it’s your dad
you’ve got to worry about — we need to find out where he is — he’s
bleeding like mad — I was — it was a huge snake. . . .”
He tried to get out of bed but Ron pushed him back into it; Dean
and Seamus were still whispering somewhere nearby. Whether one
minute passed or ten, Harry did not know; he simply sat there shaking, feeling the pain recede very slowly from his scar. . . . Then there
were hurried footsteps coming up the stairs, and he heard Neville’s
voice again.
“Over here, Professor . . .”
Professor McGonagall came hurrying into the dormitory in her tartan dressing gown, her glasses perched lopsidedly on the bridge of her
bony nose.
“What is it, Potter? Where does it hurt?”
He had never been so pleased to see her; it was a member of the Order of the Phoenix he needed now, not someone fussing over him and
prescribing useless potions.
“It’s Ron’s dad,” he said, sitting up again. “He’s been attacked by a
snake and it’s serious, I saw it happen.”
“What do you mean, you saw it happen?” said Professor McGonagall, her dark eyebrows contracting.
“I don’t know. . . . I was asleep and then I was there. . . .”
“You mean you dreamed this?”
“No!” said Harry angrily. Would none of them understand? “I was
having a dream at first about something completely different, something stupid . . . and then this interrupted it. It was real, I didn’t imagine it, Mr. Weasley was asleep on the floor and he was attacked by a
gigantic snake, there was a load of blood, he collapsed, someone’s got
to find out where he is. . . .”
Professor McGonagall was gazing at him through her lopsided
spectacles as though horrified at what she was seeing.
“I’m not lying, and I’m not mad!” Harry told her, his voice rising to
a shout. “I tell you, I saw it happen!”
“I believe you, Potter,” said Professor McGonagall curtly. “Put on
your dressing-gown — we’re going to see the headmaster.”

C H A P T E R T W E N T Y - T W O
ST. MUNGO’S HOSPITAL FOR MAGICAL MALADIES AND INJURIES

Harry was so relieved that she was taking him seriously that he
did not hesitate, but jumped out of bed at once, pulled on
his dressing gown, and pushed his glasses back onto his nose.
“Weasley, you ought to come too,” said Professor McGonagall.
They followed Professor McGonagall past the silent figures of
Neville, Dean, and Seamus, out of the dormitory, down the spiral
stairs into the common room, through the portrait hole, and off along
the Fat Lady’s moonlit corridor. Harry felt as though the panic inside
him might spill over at any moment; he wanted to run, to yell for
Dumbledore. Mr. Weasley was bleeding as they walked along so sedately, and what if those fangs (Harry tried hard not to think “my
fangs”) had been poisonous? They passed Mrs. Norris, who turned her
lamplike eyes upon them and hissed faintly, but Professor McGonagall said, “Shoo!” Mrs. Norris slunk away into the shadows, and in a
few minutes they had reached the stone gargoyle guarding the entrance to Dumbledore’s office.
“Fizzing Whizbee,” said Professor McGonagall.
The gargoyle sprang to life and leapt aside; the wall behind it split
in two to reveal a stone staircase that was moving continuously upward like a spiral escalator. The three of them stepped onto the moving stairs; the wall closed behind them with a thud, and they were
moving upward in tight circles until they reached the highly polished
oak door with the brass knocker shaped like a griffin.
Though it was now well past midnight, there were voices coming
from inside the room, a positive babble of them. It sounded as though
Dumbledore was entertaining at least a dozen people.
Professor McGonagall rapped three times with the griffin knocker,
and the voices ceased abruptly as though someone had switched them
all off. The door opened of its own accord and Professor McGonagall
led Harry and Ron inside.
The room was in half darkness; the strange silver instruments
standing on tables were silent and still rather than whirring and emitting puffs of smoke as they usually did. The portraits of old headmasters and headmistresses covering the walls were all snoozing in their
frames. Behind the door, a magnificent red-and-gold bird the size of a
swan dozed on its perch with its head under its wing.
“Oh, it’s you, Professor McGonagall . . . and . . . ah.”
Dumbledore was sitting in a high-backed chair behind his desk; he
leaned forward into the pool of candlelight illuminating the papers
laid out before him. He was wearing a magnificently embroidered
purple-and-gold dressing gown over a snowy-white nightshirt, but
seemed wide awake, his penetrating light-blue eyes fixed intently
upon Professor McGonagall.
“Professor Dumbledore, Potter has had a . . . well, a nightmare,”
said Professor McGonagall. “He says . . .”
“It wasn’t a nightmare,” said Harry quickly.
Professor McGonagall looked around at Harry, frowning slightly.
“Very well, then, Potter, you tell the headmaster about it.”
“I . . . well, I was asleep. . . .” said Harry and even in his terror and
his desperation to make Dumbledore understand he felt slightly irritated that the headmaster was not looking at him, but examining his
own interlocked fingers. “But it wasn’t an ordinary dream . . . it was
real. . . . I saw it happen. . . .” He took a deep breath, “Ron’s dad —
Mr. Weasley — has been attacked by a giant snake.”
The words seemed to reverberate in the air after he had said them,
slightly ridiculous, even comic. There was a pause in which Dumbledore leaned back and stared meditatively at the ceiling. Ron looked
from Harry to Dumbledore, white-faced and shocked.
“How did you see this?” Dumbledore asked quietly, still not looking at Harry.
“Well . . . I don’t know,” said Harry, rather angrily — what did it
matter? “Inside my head, I suppose —”
“You misunderstand me,” said Dumbledore, still in the same calm
tone. “I mean . . . can you remember — er — where you were positioned as you watched this attack happen? Were you perhaps standing
beside the victim, or else looking down on the scene from above?”
This was such a curious question that Harry gaped at Dumbledore;
it was almost as though he knew . . .
“I was the snake,” he said. “I saw it all from the snake’s point of
view. . . .”
Nobody else spoke for a moment, then Dumbledore, now looking
at Ron, who was still whey-faced, said in a new and sharper voice, “Is
Arthur seriously injured?”
“Yes,” said Harry emphatically — why were they all so slow on the
uptake, did they not realize how much a person bled when fangs that
long pierced their side? And why could Dumbledore not do him the
courtesy of looking at him?
But Dumbledore stood up so quickly that Harry jumped, and addressed one of the old portraits hanging very near the ceiling.
“Everard?” he said sharply. “And you too, Dilys!”
A sallow-faced wizard with short, black bangs and an elderly witch
with long silver ringlets in the frame beside him, both of whom
seemed to have been in the deepest of sleeps, opened their eyes
immediately.
“You were listening?” said Dumbledore.
The wizard nodded, the witch said, “Naturally.”
“The man has red hair and glasses,” said Dumbledore. “Everard,
you will need to raise the alarm, make sure he is found by the right
people —”
Both nodded and moved sideways out of their frames, but instead
of emerging in neighboring pictures (as usually happened at Hogwarts), neither reappeared; one frame now contained nothing but a
backdrop of dark curtain, the other a handsome leather armchair.
Harry noticed that many of the other headmasters and mistresses on
the walls, though snoring and drooling most convincingly, kept
sneaking peeks at him under their eyelids, and he suddenly understood who had been talking when they had knocked.
“Everard and Dilys were two of Hogwarts’s most celebrated Heads,”
Dumbledore said, now sweeping around Harry, Ron, and Professor
McGonagall and approaching the magnificent sleeping bird on his
perch beside the door. “Their renown is such that both have portraits
hanging in other important Wizarding institutions. As they are free to
move between their own portraits they can tell us what may be happening elsewhere. . . .”
“But Mr. Weasley could be anywhere!” said Harry.
“Please sit down, all three of you,” said Dumbledore, as though
Harry had not spoken. “Everard and Dilys may not be back for several
minutes. . . . Professor McGonagall, if you could draw up extra
chairs . . .”
Professor McGonagall pulled her wand from the pocket of her
dressing gown and waved it; three chairs appeared out of thin air,
straight-backed and wooden, quite unlike the comfortable chintz
armchairs that Dumbledore had conjured back at Harry’s hearing.
Harry sat down, watching Dumbledore over his shoulder. Dumbledore was now stroking Fawkes’s plumed golden head with one finger.
The phoenix awoke immediately. He stretched his beautiful head high
and observed Dumbledore through bright, dark eyes.
“We will need,” said Dumbledore very quietly to the bird, “a
warning.”
There was a flash of fire and the phoenix had gone.
Dumbledore now swooped down upon one of the fragile silver instruments whose function Harry had never known, carried it over to
his desk, sat down facing them again, and tapped it gently with the tip
of his wand.
The instrument tinkled into life at once with rhythmic clinking
noises. Tiny puffs of pale green smoke issued from the minuscule silver tube at the top. Dumbledore watched the smoke closely, his brow
furrowed, and after a few seconds, the tiny puffs became a steady
stream of smoke that thickened and coiled in the air. . . . A serpent’s
head grew out of the end of it, opening its mouth wide. Harry wondered whether the instrument was confirming his story: He looked
eagerly at Dumbledore for a sign that he was right, but Dumbledore
did not look up.
“Naturally, naturally,” murmured Dumbledore apparently to himself, still observing the stream of smoke without the slightest sign of
surprise. “But in essence divided?”
Harry could make neither head nor tail of this question. The
smoke serpent, however, split itself instantly into two snakes, both
coiling and undulating in the dark air. With a look of grim satisfaction
Dumbledore gave the instrument another gentle tap with his wand:
The clinking noise slowed and died, and the smoke serpents grew
faint, became a formless haze, and vanished.
Dumbledore replaced the instrument upon its spindly little table;
Harry saw many of the old headmasters in the portraits follow him
with their eyes, then, realizing that Harry was watching them, hastily
pretend to be sleeping again. Harry wanted to ask what the strange silver instrument was for, but before he could do so, there was a shout
from the top of the wall to their right; the wizard called Everard had
reappeared in his portrait, panting slightly.
“Dumbledore!”
“What news?” said Dumbledore at once.
“I yelled until someone came running,” said the wizard, who was
mopping his brow on the curtain behind him, “said I’d heard something moving downstairs — they weren’t sure whether to believe me
but went down to check — you know there are no portraits down
there to watch from. Anyway, they carried him up a few minutes later.
He doesn’t look good, he’s covered in blood, I ran along to Elfrida
Cragg’s portrait to get a good view as they left —”
“Good,” said Dumbledore as Ron made a convulsive movement, “I
take it Dilys will have seen him arrive, then —”
And moments later, the silver-ringletted witch had reappeared in
her picture too; she sank, coughing, into her armchair and said, “Yes,
they’ve taken him to St. Mungo’s, Dumbledore. . . . They carried him
past under my portrait. . . . He looks bad. . . .”
“Thank you,” said Dumbledore. He looked around at Professor
McGonagall.
“Minerva, I need you to go and wake the other Weasley children.”
“Of course. . . .”
Professor McGonagall got up and moved swiftly to the door; Harry
cast a sideways glance at Ron, who was now looking terrified.
“And Dumbledore — what about Molly?” said Professor McGonagall, pausing at the door.
“That will be a job for Fawkes when he has finished keeping a
lookout for anybody approaching,” said Dumbledore. “But she may
already know . . . that excellent clock of hers . . .”
Harry knew Dumbledore was referring to the clock that told, not
the time, but the whereabouts and conditions of the various Weasley
family members, and with a pang he thought that Mr. Weasley’s hand
must, even now, be pointing at “mortal peril.” But it was very late. . . .
Mrs. Weasley was probably asleep, not watching the clock. . . . And
he felt cold as he remembered Mrs. Weasley’s boggart turning into
Mr. Weasley’s lifeless body, his glasses askew, blood running down his
face. . . . But Mr. Weasley wasn’t going to die. . . . He couldn’t. . . .
Dumbledore was now rummaging in a cupboard behind Harry and
Ron. He emerged from it carrying a blackened old kettle, which he
placed carefully upon his desk. He raised his wand and murmured
“Portus”; for a moment the kettle trembled, glowing with an odd blue
light, then it quivered to a rest, as solidly black as ever.
Dumbledore marched over to another portrait, this time of a
clever-looking wizard with a pointed beard, who had been painted
wearing the Slytherin colors of green and silver and was apparently
sleeping so deeply that he could not hear Dumbledore’s voice when he
attempted to rouse him.
“Phineas. Phineas.”
And now the subjects of the portraits lining the room were no
longer pretending to be asleep; they were shifting around in their
frames, the better to watch what was happening. When the cleverlooking wizard continued to feign sleep, some of them shouted his
name too.
“Phineas! Phineas! PHINEAS!”
He could not pretend any longer; he gave a theatrical jerk and
opened his eyes wide.
“Did someone call?”
“I need you to visit your other portrait again, Phineas,” said Dumbledore. “I’ve got another message.”
“Visit my other portrait?” said Phineas in a reedy voice, giving a
long, fake yawn (his eyes traveling around the room and focusing
upon Harry). “Oh no, Dumbledore, I am too tired tonight. . . .”
Something about Phineas’s voice was familiar to Harry. Where had
he heard it before? But before he could think, the portraits on the surrounding walls broke into a storm of protest.
“Insubordination, sir!” roared a corpulent, red-nosed wizard, brandishing his fists. “Dereliction of duty!”
“We are honor-bound to give service to the present Headmaster of
Hogwarts!” cried a frail-looking old wizard whom Harry recognized as
Dumbledore’s predecessor, Armando Dippet. “Shame on you, Phineas!”
“Shall I persuade him, Dumbledore?” called a gimlet-eyed witch,
raising an unusually thick wand that looked not unlike a birch rod.
“Oh, very well,” said the wizard called Phineas, eyeing this wand
slightly apprehensively, “though he may well have destroyed my picture by now, he’s done most of the family —”
“Sirius knows not to destroy your portrait,” said Dumbledore, and
Harry realized immediately where he had heard Phineas’s voice before:
issuing from the apparently empty frame in his bedroom in Grimmauld Place. “You are to give him the message that Arthur Weasley
has been gravely injured and that his wife, children, and Harry Potter
will be arriving at his house shortly. Do you understand?”
“Arthur Weasley, injured, wife and children and Harry Potter
coming to stay,” recited Phineas in a bored voice. “Yes, yes . . . very
well. . . .”
He sloped away into the frame of the portrait and disappeared from
view at the very moment that the study door opened again. Fred,
George, and Ginny were ushered inside by Professor McGonagall, all
three of them looking disheveled and shocked, still in their night
things.
“Harry — what’s going on?” asked Ginny, who looked frightened.
“Professor McGonagall says you saw Dad hurt —”
“Your father has been injured in the course of his work for the Order of the Phoenix,” said Dumbledore before Harry could speak. “He
has been taken to St. Mungo’s Hospital for Magical Maladies and Injuries. I am sending you back to Sirius’s house, which is much more
convenient for the hospital than the Burrow. You will meet your
mother there.”
“How’re we going?” asked Fred, looking shaken. “Floo powder?”
“No,” said Dumbledore, “Floo powder is not safe at the moment,
the Network is being watched. You will be taking a Portkey.” He indicated the old kettle lying innocently on his desk. “We are just waiting
for Phineas Nigellus to report back. . . . I wish to be sure that the coast
is clear before sending you —”
There was a flash of flame in the very middle of the office, leaving
behind a single golden feather that floated gently to the floor.
“It is Fawkes’s warning,” said Dumbledore, catching the feather as
it fell. “She must know you’re out of your beds. . . . Minerva, go and
head her off — tell her any story —”
Professor McGonagall was gone in a swish of tartan.
“He says he’ll be delighted,” said a bored voice behind Dumbledore; the wizard called Phineas had reappeared in front of his
Slytherin banner. “My great-great-grandson has always had odd taste
in houseguests. . . .”
“Come here, then,” Dumbledore said to Harry and the Weasleys.
“And quickly, before anyone else joins us . . .”
Harry and the others gathered around Dumbledore’s desk.
“You have all used a Portkey before?” asked Dumbledore, and they
nodded, each reaching out to touch some part of the blackened kettle.
“Good. On the count of three then . . . one . . . two . . .”
It happened in a fraction of a second: In the infinitesimal pause before Dumbledore said “three,” Harry looked up at him — they were
very close together — and Dumbledore’s clear blue gaze moved from
the Portkey to Harry’s face.
At once, Harry’s scar burned white-hot, as though the old wound
had burst open again — and unbidden, unwanted, but terrifyingly
strong, there rose within Harry a hatred so powerful he felt, for that
instant, that he would like nothing better than to strike — to bite —
to sink his fangs into the man before him —
“. . . three.”
He felt a powerful jerk behind his navel, the ground vanished from
beneath his feet, his hand was glued to the kettle; he was banging into
the others as all sped forward in a swirl of colors and a rush of wind,
the kettle pulling them onward and then —
His feet hit the ground so hard that his knees buckled, the kettle
clattered to the ground and somewhere close at hand a voice said,
“Back again, the blood traitor brats, is it true their father’s dying . . . ?”
“OUT!” roared a second voice.
Harry scrambled to his feet and looked around; they had arrived in
the gloomy basement kitchen of number twelve, Grimmauld Place.
The only sources of light were the fire and one guttering candle,
which illuminated the remains of a solitary supper. Kreacher was disappearing through the door to the hall, looking back at them malevolently as he hitched up his loincloth; Sirius was hurrying toward them
all, looking anxious. He was unshaven and still in his day clothes;
there was also a slightly Mundungus-like whiff of stale drink about
him.
“What’s going on?” he said, stretching out a hand to help Ginny
up. “Phineas Nigellus said Arthur’s been badly injured —”
“Ask Harry,” said Fred.
“Yeah, I want to hear this for myself,” said George.
The twins and Ginny were staring at him. Kreacher’s footsteps had
stopped on the stairs outside.
“It was —” Harry began; this was even worse than telling McGonagall and Dumbledore. “I had a — a kind of — vision. . . .”
And he told them all that he had seen, though he altered the story
so that it sounded as though he had watched from the sidelines as the
snake attacked, rather than from behind the snake’s own eyes. . . .
Ron, who was still very white, gave him a fleeting look, but did not
speak. When Harry had finished, Fred, George, and Ginny continued
to stare at him for a moment. Harry did not know whether he was
imagining it or not, but he fancied there was something accusatory in
their looks. Well, if they were going to blame him for just seeing the
attack, he was glad he had not told them that he had been inside the
snake at the time. . . .
“Is Mum here?” said Fred, turning to Sirius.
“She probably doesn’t even know what’s happened yet,” said Sirius.
“The important thing was to get you away before Umbridge could interfere. I expect Dumbledore’s letting Molly know now.”
“We’ve got to go to St. Mungo’s,” said Ginny urgently. She looked
around at her brothers; they were of course still in their pajamas. “Sirius, can you lend us cloaks or anything — ?”
“Hang on, you can’t go tearing off to St. Mungo’s!” said Sirius.
“ ’Course we can go to St. Mungo’s if we want,” said Fred, with a
mulish expression, “he’s our dad!”
“And how are you going to explain how you knew Arthur was attacked before the hospital even let his wife know?”
“What does that matter?” said George hotly.
“It matters because we don’t want to draw attention to the fact that
Harry is having visions of things that are happening hundreds of miles
away!” said Sirius angrily. “Have you any idea what the Ministry
would make of that information?”
Fred and George looked as though they could not care less what the
Ministry made of anything. Ron was still white-faced and silent.
Ginny said, “Somebody else could have told us. . . . We could have
heard it somewhere other than Harry. . . .”
“Like who?” said Sirius impatiently. “Listen, your dad’s been hurt
while on duty for the Order and the circumstances are fishy enough
without his children knowing about it seconds after it happened, you
could seriously damage the Order’s —”
“We don’t care about the dumb Order!” shouted Fred.
“It’s our dad dying we’re talking about!” yelled George.
“Your father knew what he was getting into, and he won’t thank
you for messing things up for the Order!” said Sirius angrily in his
turn. “This is how it is — this is why you’re not in the Order — you
don’t understand — there are things worth dying for!”
“Easy for you to say, stuck here!” bellowed Fred. “I don’t see you
risking your neck!”
The little color remaining in Sirius’s face drained from it. He
looked for a moment as though he would quite like to hit Fred, but
when he spoke, it was in a voice of determined calm. “I know it’s hard,
but we’ve all got to act as though we don’t know anything yet. We’ve
got to stay put, at least until we hear from your mother, all right?”
Fred and George still looked mutinous. Ginny, however, took a few
steps over to the nearest chair and sank into it. Harry looked at Ron,
who made a funny movement somewhere between a nod and shrug,
and they sat down too. The twins glared at Sirius for another minute,
then took seats on either side of Ginny.
“That’s right,” said Sirius encouragingly, “come on, let’s all . . . let’s
all have a drink while we’re waiting. Accio Butterbeer!”
He raised his wand as he spoke and half a dozen bottles came flying
toward them out of the pantry, skidded along the table, scattering the
debris of Sirius’s meal, and stopped neatly in front of the six of them.
They all drank, and for a while the only sounds were those of the crackling of the kitchen fire and the soft thud of their bottles on the table.
Harry was only drinking to have something to do with his hands.
His stomach was full of horrible hot, bubbling guilt. They would not
be here if it were not for him; they would all still be asleep in bed. And
it was no good telling himself that by raising the alarm he had ensured
that Mr. Weasley was found, because there was also the inescapable
business of it being he who had attacked Mr. Weasley in the first
place. . . .
Don’t be stupid, you haven’t got fangs, he told himself, trying to keep
calm, though the hand on his butterbeer bottle was shaking. You were
lying in bed, you weren’t attacking anyone. . . .
But then, what just happened in Dumbledore’s office? he asked himself. I felt like I wanted to attack Dumbledore too. . . .
He put the bottle down on the table a little harder than he meant
to, so that it slopped over onto the table. No one took any notice.
Then a burst of fire in midair illuminated the dirty plates in front of
them and as they gave cries of shock, a scroll of parchment fell with a
thud onto the table, accompanied by a single golden phoenix tail
feather.
“Fawkes!” said Sirius at once, snatching up the parchment. “That’s
not Dumbledore’s writing — it must be a message from your
mother — here —”
He thrust the letter into George’s hand, who ripped it open and
read aloud, “Dad is still alive. I am setting out for St. Mungo’s now. Stay
where you are. I will send news as soon as I can. Mum.”
George looked around the table.
“Still alive . . .” he said slowly. “But that makes it sound . . .”
He did not need to finish the sentence. It sounded to Harry too as
though Mr. Weasley was hovering somewhere between life and death.
Still exceptionally pale, Ron stared at the back of his mother’s letter as
though it might speak words of comfort to him. Fred pulled the
parchment out of George’s hands and read it for himself, then looked
up at Harry, who felt his hand shaking on his butterbeer bottle again
and clenched it more tightly to stop the trembling.
If Harry had ever sat through a longer night than this one he could
not remember it. Sirius suggested once that they all go to bed, but
without any real conviction, and the Weasleys’ looks of disgust were
answer enough. They mostly sat in silence around the table, watching
the candle wick sinking lower and lower into liquid wax, now and
then raising bottles to their lips, speaking only to check the time, to
wonder aloud what was happening, and to reassure one another that
if there was bad news, they would know straightaway, for Mrs.
Weasley must long since have arrived at St. Mungo’s.
Fred fell into a doze, his head sagging sideways onto his shoulder.
Ginny was curled like a cat on her chair, but her eyes were open;
Harry could see them reflecting the firelight. Ron was sitting with his
head in his hands, whether awake or asleep it was impossible to tell.
And he and Sirius looked at each other every so often, intruders upon
the family grief, waiting . . . waiting . . .
And then, at ten past five in the morning by Ron’s watch, the
kitchen door swung open and Mrs. Weasley entered the kitchen. She
was extremely pale, but when they all turned to look at her, Fred, Ron,
and Harry half-rising from their chairs, she gave a wan smile.
“He’s going to be all right,” she said, her voice weak with tiredness.
“He’s sleeping. We can all go and see him later. Bill’s sitting with him
now, he’s going to take the morning off work.”
Fred fell back into his chair with his hands over his face. George
and Ginny got up, walked swiftly over to their mother, and hugged
her. Ron gave a very shaky laugh and downed the rest of his butterbeer
in one.
“Breakfast!” said Sirius loudly and joyfully, jumping to his feet.
“Where’s that accursed house-elf? Kreacher! KREACHER!”
But Kreacher did not answer the summons.
“Oh, forget it, then,” muttered Sirius, counting the people in front
of him. “So it’s breakfast for — let’s see — seven . . . Bacon and eggs,
I think, and some tea, and toast —”
Harry hurried over to the stove to help. He did not want to intrude
upon the Weasleys’ happiness, and he dreaded the moment when
Mrs. Weasley would ask him to recount his vision. However, he had
barely taken plates from the dresser when Mrs. Weasley lifted them
out of his hands and pulled him into a hug.
“I don’t know what would have happened if it hadn’t been for you,
Harry,” she said in a muffled voice. “They might not have found
Arthur for hours, and then it would have been too late, but thanks to
you he’s alive and Dumbledore’s been able to think up a good cover
story for Arthur being where he was, you’ve no idea what trouble he
would have been in otherwise, look at poor Sturgis. . . .”
Harry could hardly stand her gratitude, but fortunately she soon
released him to turn to Sirius and thank him for looking after her children through the night. Sirius said that he was very pleased to have
been able to help, and hoped they would all stay with him as long as
Mr. Weasley was in hospital.
“Oh, Sirius, I’m so grateful. . . . They think he’ll be there a little
while and it would be wonderful to be nearer . . . Of course, that
might mean we’re here for Christmas. . . .”
“The more the merrier!” said Sirius with such obvious sincerity that
Mrs. Weasley beamed at him, threw on an apron, and began to help
with breakfast.
“Sirius,” Harry muttered, unable to stand it a moment longer.
“Can I have a quick word? Er — now?”
He walked into the dark pantry and Sirius followed. Without preamble Harry told his godfather every detail of the vision he had had,
including the fact that he himself had been the snake who had attacked Mr. Weasley.
When he paused for breath, Sirius said, “Did you tell Dumbledore
this?”
“Yes,” said Harry impatiently, “but he didn’t tell me what it meant.
Well, he doesn’t tell me anything anymore. . . .”
“I’m sure he would have told you if it was anything to worry
about,” said Sirius steadily.
“But that’s not all,” said Harry in a voice only a little above a whisper. “Sirius, I . . . I think I’m going mad. . . . Back in Dumbledore’s
office, just before we took the Portkey . . . for a couple of seconds
there I thought I was a snake, I felt like one — my scar really hurt
when I was looking at Dumbledore — Sirius, I wanted to attack
him —”
He could only see a sliver of Sirius’s face; the rest was in darkness.
“It must have been the aftermath of the vision, that’s all,” said Sirius. “You were still thinking of the dream or whatever it was and —”
“It wasn’t that,” said Harry, shaking his head. “It was like something rose up inside me, like there’s a snake inside me —”
“You need to sleep,” said Sirius firmly. “You’re going to have breakfast and then go upstairs to bed, and then you can go and see Arthur
after lunch with the others. You’re in shock, Harry; you’re blaming
yourself for something you only witnessed, and it’s lucky you did witness it or Arthur might have died. Just stop worrying. . . .”
He clapped Harry on the shoulder and left the pantry, leaving
Harry standing alone in the dark.
Everyone but Harry spent the rest of the morning sleeping. He went
up to the bedroom he had shared with Ron over the summer, but while
Ron crawled into bed and was asleep within minutes, Harry sat fully
clothed, hunched against the cold metal bars of the bedstead, keeping
himself deliberately uncomfortable, determined not to fall into a doze,
terrified that he might become the serpent again in his sleep and awake
to find that he had attacked Ron, or else slithered through the house
after one of the others. . . .
When Ron woke up, Harry pretended to have enjoyed a refreshing
nap too. Their trunks arrived from Hogwarts while they were eating
lunch, so that they could dress as Muggles for the trip to St. Mungo’s.
Everybody except Harry was riotously happy and talkative as they
changed out of their robes into jeans and sweatshirts, and they greeted
Tonks and Mad-Eye, who had turned up to escort them across London, gleefully laughing at the bowler hat Mad-Eye was wearing at an
angle to conceal his magical eye and assuring him, truthfully, that
Tonks, whose hair was short and bright pink again, would attract far
less attention on the underground.
Tonks was very interested in Harry’s vision of the attack on Mr.
Weasley, something he was not remotely interested in discussing.
“There isn’t any Seer blood in your family, is there?” she inquired
curiously, as they sat side by side on a train rattling toward the heart
of the city.
“No,” said Harry, thinking of Professor Trelawney and feeling
insulted.
“No,” said Tonks musingly, “no, I suppose it’s not really prophecy
you’re doing, is it? I mean, you’re not seeing the future, you’re seeing
the present. . . . It’s odd, isn’t it? Useful, though . . .”
Harry did not answer; fortunately they got out at the next stop, a
station in the very heart of London, and in the bustle of leaving the
train he was able to allow Fred and George to get between himself and
Tonks, who was leading the way. They all followed her up the escalator, Moody clunking along at the back of the group, his bowler tilted
low and one gnarled hand stuck in between the buttons of his coat,
clutching his wand. Harry thought he sensed the concealed eye staring hard at him; trying to deflect more questions about his dream he
asked Mad-Eye where St. Mungo’s was hidden.
“Not far from here,” grunted Moody as they stepped out into the
wintry air on a broad store-lined street packed with Christmas shoppers. He pushed Harry a little ahead of him and stumped along just
behind; Harry knew the eye was rolling in all directions under the
tilted hat. “Wasn’t easy to find a good location for a hospital. Nowhere
in Diagon Alley was big enough and we couldn’t have it underground
like the Ministry — unhealthy. In the end they managed to get hold of
a building up here. Theory was sick wizards could come and go and
just blend in with the crowd. . . .”
He seized Harry’s shoulder to prevent them being separated by a
gaggle of shoppers plainly intent on nothing but making it into a
nearby shop full of electrical gadgets.
“Here we go,” said Moody a moment later.
They had arrived outside a large, old-fashioned, red brick department store called Purge and Dowse Ltd. The place had a shabby, miserable air; the window displays consisted of a few chipped dummies
with their wigs askew, standing at random and modeling fashions at
least ten years out of date. Large signs on all the dusty doors read
closed for refurbishment. Harry distinctly heard a large woman
laden with plastic shopping bags say to her friend as they passed, “It’s
never open, that place. . . .”
“Right,” said Tonks, beckoning them forward to a window displaying nothing but a particularly ugly female dummy whose false eyelashes were hanging off and who was modeling a green nylon pinafore
dress. “Everybody ready?”
They nodded, clustering around her; Moody gave Harry another
shove between the shoulder blades to urge him forward and Tonks
leaned close to the glass, looking up at the very ugly dummy and said,
her breath steaming up the glass, “Wotcher . . . We’re here to see
Arthur Weasley.”
For a split second, Harry thought how absurd it was for Tonks to expect the dummy to hear her talking that quietly through a sheet of
glass, when there were buses rumbling along behind her and all the
racket of a street full of shoppers. Then he reminded himself that dummies could not hear anyway. Next second his mouth opened in shock
as the dummy gave a tiny nod, beckoned its jointed finger, and Tonks
had seized Ginny and Mrs. Weasley by the elbows, stepped right
through the glass and vanished.
Fred, George, and Ron stepped after them; Harry glanced around
at the jostling crowd; not one of them seemed to have a glance to spare
for window displays as ugly as Purge and Dowse Ltd.’s, nor did any of
them seem to have noticed that six people had just melted into thin
air in front of them.
“C’mon,” growled Moody, giving Harry yet another poke in the
back and together they stepped forward through what felt like a sheet
of cool water, emerging quite warm and dry on the other side.
There was no sign of the ugly dummy or the space where she had
stood. They had arrived in what seemed to be a crowded reception
area where rows of witches and wizards sat upon rickety wooden
chairs, some looking perfectly normal and perusing out-of-date copies
of Witch Weekly, others sporting gruesome disfigurements such as elephant trunks or extra hands sticking out of their chests. The room was
scarcely less quiet than the street outside, for many of the patients were
making very peculiar noises. A sweaty-faced witch in the center of the
front row, who was fanning herself vigorously with a copy of the Daily
Prophet, kept letting off a high-pitched whistle as steam came pouring
out of her mouth, and a grubby-looking warlock in the corner clanged
like a bell every time he moved, and with each clang his head vibrated
horribly, so that he had to seize himself by the ears and hold it steady.
Witches and wizards in lime-green robes were walking up and
down the rows, asking questions and making notes on clipboards like
Umbridge’s. Harry noticed the emblem embroidered on their chests:
a wand and bone, crossed.
“Are they doctors?” he asked Ron quietly.
“Doctors?” said Ron, looking startled. “Those Muggle nutters that
cut people up? Nah, they’re Healers.”
“Over here!” called Mrs. Weasley over the renewed clanging of the
warlock in the corner, and they followed her to the queue in front of a
plump blonde witch seated at a desk marked inquiries. The wall behind her was covered in notices and posters saying things like a clean
cauldron keeps potions from becoming poisons and antidotes
are anti-don’ts unless approved by a qualified healer.
There was also a large portrait of a witch with long silver ringlets
that was labelled
DILYS DERWENT
st. mungo’s healer 1722–1741
headmistress of hogwarts school of
witchcraft and wizardry, i74i–i768
Dilys was eyeing the Weasley party as though counting them; when
Harry caught her eye she gave a tiny wink, walked sideways out of her
portrait, and vanished.
Meanwhile, at the front of the queue, a young wizard was performing an odd on-the-spot jig and trying, in between yelps of pain, to
explain his predicament to the witch behind the desk.
“It’s these — ouch — shoes my brother gave me — ow — they’re
eating my — OUCH — feet — look at them, there must be some
kind of — AARGH — jinx on them and I can’t — AAAAARGH —
get them off —”
He hopped from one foot to the other as though dancing on hot
coals.
“The shoes don’t prevent you reading, do they?” said the blonde
witch irritably, pointing at a large sign to the left of her desk. “You
want Spell Damage, fourth floor. Just like it says on the floor guide.
Next!”
The wizard hobbled and pranced sideways out of the way, the
Weasley party moved forward a few steps and Harry read the floor
guide:
ARTIFACT ACCIDENTS. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Ground Floor
(Cauldron explosion, wand backfiring, broom crashes, etc.)
CREATURE-INDUCED INJURIES. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . First Floor
(Bites, stings, burns, embedded spines, etc.)
MAGICAL BUGS. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Second Floor
(Contagious maladies, e.g., dragon pox, vanishing sickness,
scrofungulus)
POTION AND PLANT POISONING. . . . . . . . . . . . .Third Floor
(Rashes, regurgitation, uncontrollable giggling, etc.)
SPELL DAMAGE. . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Fourth Floor
(Unliftable jinxes, hexes, and incorrectly applied charms, etc.)
VISITORS’ TEAROOM AND HOSPITAL SHOP. . . . .Fifth Floor
If you are unsure where to go, incapable, of normal speech, or
unable to remember why you are here, our Welcome Witch will
be pleased to help.
A very old, stooped wizard with a hearing trumpet had shuffled to
the front of the queue now.
“I’m here to see Broderick Bode!” he wheezed.
“Ward forty-nine, but I’m afraid you’re wasting your time,” said the
witch dismissively “He’s completely addled, you know, still thinks he’s
a teapot. . . . Next!”
A harassed-looking wizard was holding his small daughter tightly
by the ankle while she flapped around his head using the immensely
large, feathery wings that had sprouted right out the back of her
romper suit.
“Fourth floor,” said the witch in a bored voice, without asking, and
the man disappeared through the double doors beside the desk, holding his daughter like an oddly shaped balloon. “Next!”
Mrs. Weasley moved forward to the desk.
“Hello,” she said. “My husband, Arthur Weasley, was supposed to
be moved to a different ward this morning, could you tell us — ?”
“Arthur Weasley?” said the witch, running her finger down a long
list in front of her. “Yes, first floor, second door on the right, Dai
Llewellyn ward.”
“Thank you,” said Mrs. Weasley. “Come on, you lot.”
They followed through the double doors and along the narrow corridor beyond, which was lined with more portraits of famous Healers
and lit by crystal bubbles full of candles that floated up on the ceiling,
looking like giant soapsuds. More witches and wizards in lime-green
robes walked in and out of the doors they passed; a foul-smelling yellow gas wafted into the passageway as they passed one door, and every
now and then they heard distant wailing. They climbed a flight of
stairs and entered the “Creature-Induced Injuries” corridor, where the
second door on the right bore the words “dangerous” dai llewellyn
ward: serious bites. Underneath this was a card in a brass holder on
which had been handwritten Healer-in-Charge: Hippocrates Smethwyck, Trainee Healer: Augustus Pye.
“We’ll wait outside, Molly,” Tonks said. “Arthur won’t want too
many visitors at once. . . . It ought to be just the family first.”
Mad-Eye growled his approval of this idea and set himself with his
back against the corridor wall, his magical eye spinning in all directions. Harry drew back too, but Mrs. Weasley reached out a hand and
pushed him through the door, saying, “Don’t be silly, Harry, Arthur
wants to thank you. . . .”
The ward was small and rather dingy as the only window was narrow
and set high in the wall facing the door. Most of the light came from
more shining crystal bubbles clustered in the middle of the ceiling. The
walls were of panelled oak and there was a portrait of a rather viciouslooking wizard on the wall, captioned urquhart rackharrow, 1612–
1697, inventor of the entrail-expelling curse.
There were only three patients. Mr. Weasley was occupying the bed
at the far end of the ward beside the tiny window. Harry was pleased and
relieved to see that he was propped up on several pillows and reading the
Daily Prophet by the solitary ray of sunlight falling onto his bed. He
looked around as they walked toward him and, seeing whom it was,
beamed.
“Hello!” he called, throwing the Prophet aside. “Bill just left, Molly,
had to get back to work, but he says he’ll drop in on you later. . . .”
“How are you, Arthur?” asked Mrs. Weasley, bending down to kiss
his cheek and looking anxiously into his face. “You’re still looking a bit
peaky. . . .”
“I feel absolutely fine,” said Mr. Weasley brightly, holding out his
good arm to give Ginny a hug. “If they could only take the bandages
off, I’d be fit to go home.”
“Why can’t they take them off, Dad?” asked Fred.
“Well, I start bleeding like mad every time they try,” said Mr.
Weasley cheerfully, reaching across for his wand, which lay on his bedside cabinet, and waving it so that six extra chairs appeared at his bedside to seat them all. “It seems there was some rather unusual kind of
poison in that snake’s fangs that keeps wounds open. . . . They’re sure
they’ll find an antidote, though, they say they’ve had much worse
cases than mine, and in the meantime I just have to keep taking a
Blood-Replenishing Potion every hour. But that fellow over there,” he
said, dropping his voice and nodding toward the bed opposite in
which a man lay looking green and sickly and staring at the ceiling.
“Bitten by a werewolf, poor chap. No cure at all.”
“A werewolf?” whispered Mrs. Weasley, looking alarmed. “Is he
safe in a public ward? Shouldn’t he be in a private room?”
“It’s two weeks till full moon,” Mr. Weasley reminded her quietly.
“They’ve been talking to him this morning, the Healers, you know,
trying to persuade him he’ll be able to lead an almost normal life. I
said to him — didn’t mention names, of course — but I said I knew a
werewolf personally, very nice man, who finds the condition quite
easy to manage. . . .”
“What did he say?” asked George.
“Said he’d give me another bite if I didn’t shut up,” said Mr. Weasley
sadly. “And that woman over there,” he indicated the only other occupied bed, which was right beside the door, “won’t tell the Healers what
bit her, which makes us all think it must have been something she was
handling illegally. Whatever it was took a real chunk out of her leg,
very nasty smell when they take off the dressings.”
“So, you going to tell us what happened, Dad?” asked Fred, pulling
his chair closer to the bed.
“Well, you already know, don’t you?” said Mr. Weasley, with a significant smile at Harry. “It’s very simple — I’d had a very long day,
dozed off, got sneaked up on, and bitten.”
“Is it in the Prophet, you being attacked?” asked Fred, indicating the
newspaper Mr. Weasley had cast aside.
“No, of course not,” said Mr. Weasley, with a slightly bitter smile,
“the Ministry wouldn’t want everyone to know a dirty great serpent
got —”
“Arthur!” said Mrs. Weasley warningly.
“— got — er — me,” Mr. Weasley said hastily, though Harry was
quite sure that was not what he had meant to say.
“So where were you when it happened, Dad?” asked George.
“That’s my business,” said Mr. Weasley, though with a small smile.
He snatched up the Daily Prophet, shook it open again and said, “I
was just reading about Willy Widdershins’s arrest when you arrived.
You know Willy turned out to be behind those regurgitating toilets
last summer? One of his jinxes backfired, the toilet exploded, and they
found him lying unconscious in the wreckage covered from head to
foot in —”
“When you say you were ‘on duty,’ ” Fred interrupted in a low
voice, “what were you doing?”
“You heard your father,” whispered Mrs. Weasley, “we are not discussing this here! Go on about Willy Widdershins, Arthur —”
“Well, don’t ask me how, but he actually got off on the toilet
charge,” said Mr. Weasley grimly. “I can only suppose gold changed
hands —”
“You were guarding it, weren’t you?” said George quietly. “The
weapon? The thing You-Know-Who’s after?”
“George, be quiet!” snapped Mrs. Weasley.
“Anyway,” said Mr. Weasley in a raised voice, “this time Willy’s
been caught selling biting doorknobs to Muggles, and I don’t think
he’ll be able to worm his way out of it because according to this article, two Muggles have lost fingers and are now in St. Mungo’s for
emergency bone regrowth and memory modification. Just think of it,
Muggles in St. Mungo’s! I wonder which ward they’re in?”
And he looked eagerly around as though hoping to see a signpost.
“Didn’t you say You-Know-Who’s got a snake, Harry?” asked Fred,
looking at his father for a reaction. “A massive one? You saw it the
night he returned, didn’t you?”
“That’s enough,” said Mrs. Weasley crossly. “Mad-Eye and Tonks
are outside, Arthur, they want to come and see you. And you lot can
wait outside,” she added to her children and Harry. “You can come
and say good-bye afterward. Go on. . . .”
They trooped back into the corridor. Mad-Eye and Tonks went in
and closed the door of the ward behind them. Fred raised his eyebrows.
“Fine,” he said coolly, rummaging in his pockets, “be like that.
Don’t tell us anything.”
“Looking for these?” said George, holding out what looked like a
tangle of flesh-colored string.
“You read my mind,” said Fred, grinning. “Let’s see if St. Mungo’s
puts Imperturbable Charms on its ward doors, shall we?”
He and George disentangled the string and separated five Extendable Ears from each other. Fred and George handed them around.
Harry hesitated to take one.
“Go on, Harry, take it! You saved Dad’s life, if anyone’s got the right
to eavesdrop on him it’s you. . . .”
Grinning in spite of himself, Harry took the end of the string and
inserted it into his ear as the twins had done.
“Okay, go!” Fred whispered.
The flesh-colored strings wriggled like long skinny worms, then
snaked under the door. For a few seconds Harry could hear nothing,
then he heard Tonks whispering as clearly as though she were standing right beside him.
“. . . they searched the whole area but they couldn’t find the snake
anywhere, it just seems to have vanished after it attacked you, Arthur.
. . . But You-Know-Who can’t have expected a snake to get in, can
he?”
“I reckon he sent it as a lookout,” growled Moody, “ ’cause he’s not
had any luck so far, has he? No, I reckon he’s trying to get a clearer picture of what he’s facing and if Arthur hadn’t been there the beast
would’ve had much more time to look around. So Potter says he saw
it all happen?”
“Yes,” said Mrs. Weasley. She sounded rather uneasy. “You know,
Dumbledore seems almost to have been waiting for Harry to see
something like this. . . .”
“Yeah, well,” said Moody, “there’s something funny about the
Potter kid, we all know that.”
“Dumbledore seemed worried about Harry when I spoke to him
this morning,” whispered Mrs. Weasley.
“ ’Course he’s worried,” growled Moody. “The boy’s seeing things
from inside You-Know-Who’s snake. . . . Obviously, Potter doesn’t realize what that means, but if You-Know-Who’s possessing him —”
Harry pulled the Extendable Ear out of his own, his heart hammering very fast and heat rushing up his face. He looked around at the
others. They were all staring at him, the strings still trailing from their
ears, looking suddenly fearful.

C H A P T E R T W E N T Y - T H R E E
CHRISTMAS ON THE CLOSED WARD

Was this why Dumbledore would no longer meet Harry’s
eyes? Did he expect to see Voldemort staring out of them,
afraid, perhaps, that their vivid green might turn suddenly to scarlet,
with catlike slits for pupils? Harry remembered how the snakelike face
of Voldemort had once forced itself out of the back of Professor Quirrell’s head, and he ran his hand over the back of his own, wondering
what it would feel like if Voldemort burst out of his skull. . . .
He felt dirty, contaminated, as though he were carrying some
deadly germ, unworthy to sit on the underground train back from the
hospital with innocent, clean people whose minds and bodies were
free of the taint of Voldemort. . . . He had not merely seen the snake,
he had been the snake, he knew it now. . . .
And then a truly terrible thought occurred to him, a memory bobbing to the surface of his mind, one that made his insides writhe and
squirm like serpents. . . .
“What’s he after apart from followers?”
“Stuff he can only get by stealth . . . like a weapon. Something he didn’t
have last time.”
I’m the weapon, Harry thought, and it was as though poison were
pumping through his veins, chilling him, bringing him out in a sweat
as he swayed with the train through the dark tunnel. I’m the one Voldemort’s trying to use, that’s why they’ve got guards around me everywhere I
go, it’s not for my protection, it’s for other people’s, only it’s not working,
they can’t have someone on me all the time at Hogwarts. . . . I did attack
Mr. Weasley last night, it was me, Voldemort made me do it and he could
be inside me, listening to my thoughts right now. . . .
“Are you all right, Harry, dear?” whispered Mrs. Weasley, leaning
across Ginny to speak to him as the train rattled along through its
dark tunnel. “You don’t look very well. Are you feeling sick?”
They were all watching him. He shook his head violently and
stared up at an advertisement for home insurance.
“Harry, dear, are you sure you’re all right?” said Mrs. Weasley in a
worried voice, as they walked around the unkempt patch of grass in
the middle of Grimmauld Place. “You look ever so pale. . . . Are you
sure you slept this morning? You go upstairs to bed right now, and
you can have a couple of hours’ sleep before dinner, all right?”
He nodded; here was a ready-made excuse not to talk to any of the
others, which was precisely what he wanted, so when she opened the
front door he proceeded straight past the troll’s leg umbrella stand and
up the stairs and hurried into his and Ron’s bedroom.
Here he began to pace up and down, past the two beds and Phineas
Nigellus’s empty portrait, his brain teeming and seething with questions and ever more dreadful ideas. . . .
How had he become a snake? Perhaps he was an Animagus. . . .
No, he couldn’t be, he would know. . . . perhaps Voldemort was an
Animagus. . . . Yes, thought Harry, that would fit, he would turn into
a snake of course . . . and when he’s possessing me, then we both transform. . . . That still doesn’t explain how come I got to London and back
to my bed in the space of about five minutes, though. . . . But then
Voldemort’s about the most powerful wizard in the world, apart from
Dumbledore, it’s probably no problem at all to him to transport people
like that. . . .
And then, with a terrible stab of panic he thought, but this is insane — if Voldemort’s possessing me, I’m giving him a clear view into the
headquarters of the Order of the Phoenix right now! He’ll know who’s in
the Order and where Sirius is . . . and I’ve heard loads of stuff I shouldn’t
have, everything Sirius told me the first night I was here. . . .
There was only one thing for it: He would have to leave Grimmauld Place straightaway. He would spend Christmas at Hogwarts
without the others, which would keep them safe over the holidays at
least. . . . But no, that wouldn’t do, there were still plenty of people at
Hogwarts to maim and injure, what if it was Seamus, Dean, or Neville
next time? He stopped his pacing and stood staring at Phineas Nigellus’s empty frame. A leaden sensation was settling in the pit of his
stomach. He had no alternative: He was going to have to return to
Privet Drive, cut himself off from other wizards entirely. . . .
Well, if he had to do it, he thought, there was no point hanging
around. Trying with all his might not to think how the Dursleys were
going to react when they found him on their doorstep six months earlier than they had expected, he strode over to his trunk, slammed the
lid shut and locked it, then glanced around automatically for Hedwig
before remembering that she was still at Hogwarts — well, her cage
would be one less thing to carry — he seized one end of his trunk and
had dragged it halfway toward the door when a sneaky voice said,
“Running away, are we?”
He looked around. Phineas Nigellus had appeared upon the canvas
of his portrait and was leaning against the frame, watching Harry with
an amused expression on his face.
“Not running away, no,” said Harry shortly, dragging his trunk a
few more feet across the room.
“I thought,” said Phineas Nigellus, stroking his pointed beard,
“that to belong in Gryffindor House you were supposed to be brave?
It looks to me as though you would have been better off in my own
house. We Slytherins are brave, yes, but not stupid. For instance,
given the choice, we will always choose to save our own necks.”
“It’s not my own neck I’m saving,” said Harry tersely, tugging the
trunk over a patch of particularly uneven, moth-eaten carpet right in
front of the door.
“Oh I see,” said Phineas Nigellus, still stroking his beard. “This is
no cowardly flight — you are being noble.”
Harry ignored him. His hand was on the doorknob when Phineas
Nigellus said lazily, “I have a message for you from Albus Dumbledore.”
Harry spun around.
“What is it?”
“Stay where you are.”
“I haven’t moved!” said Harry, his hand still upon the doorknob.
“So what’s the message?”
“I have just given it to you, dolt,” said Phineas Nigellus smoothly.
“Dumbledore says, ‘Stay where you are.’ ”
“Why?” said Harry eagerly, dropping the end of his trunk. “Why
does he want me to stay? What else did he say?”
“Nothing whatsoever,” said Phineas Nigellus, raising a thin black
eyebrow as though he found Harry impertinent.
Harry’s temper rose to the surface like a snake rearing from long
grass. He was exhausted, he was confused beyond measure, he had experienced terror, relief, and then terror again in the last twelve hours,
and still Dumbledore did not want to talk to him!
“So that’s it, is it?” he said loudly. “Stay there? That’s all anyone
could tell me after I got attacked by those dementors too! Just stay put
while the grown-ups sort it out, Harry! We won’t bother telling you
anything, though, because your tiny little brain might not be able to
cope with it!”
“You know,” said Phineas Nigellus, even more loudly than Harry,
“this is precisely why I loathed being a teacher! Young people are so
infernally convinced that they are absolutely right about everything.
Has it not occurred to you, my poor puffed-up popinjay, that there
might be an excellent reason why the headmaster of Hogwarts is not
confiding every tiny detail of his plans to you? Have you never paused,
while feeling hard-done-by, to note that following Dumbledore’s orders has never yet led you into harm? No. No, like all young people,
you are quite sure that you alone feel and think, you alone recognize
danger, you alone are the only one clever enough to realize what the
Dark Lord may be planning. . . .”
“He is planning something to do with me, then?” said Harry
swiftly.
“Did I say that?” said Phineas Nigellus, idly examining his silk
gloves. “Now, if you will excuse me, I have better things to do than to
listen to adolescent agonizing. . . . Good day to you. . . .”
And he strolled into his frame and out of sight.
“Fine, go then!” Harry bellowed at the empty frame. “And tell
Dumbledore thanks for nothing!”
The empty canvas remained silent. Fuming, Harry dragged his
trunk back to the foot of his bed, then threw himself facedown upon
the moth-eaten covers, his eyes shut, his body heavy and aching. . . .
He felt he had journeyed miles and miles. . . . It seemed impossible
that less than twenty-four hours ago Cho Chang had been approaching him under the mistletoe. . . . He was so tired. . . . He was scared to
sleep . . . yet he did not know how long he could fight it. . . . Dumbledore had told him to stay. . . . That must mean he was allowed to
sleep. . . . But he was scared. . . . What if it happened again . . . ?
He was sinking into shadows. . . .
It was as though a film in his head had been waiting to start. He
was walking down a deserted corridor toward a plain black door, past
rough stone walls, torches, and an open doorway onto a flight of stone
steps leading downstairs on the left. . . .
He reached the black door but could not open it. . . . He stood gaz-
ing at it, desperate for entry. . . . Something he wanted with all his heart
lay beyond. . . . A prize beyond his dreams. . . . If only his scar would
stop prickling . . . then he would be able to think more clearly. . . .
“Harry,” said Ron’s voice, from far, far away, “Mum says dinner’s
ready, but she’ll save you something if you want to stay in bed. . . .”
Harry opened his eyes, but Ron had already left the room.
He doesn’t want to be on his own with me, Harry thought. Not after
what he heard Moody say . . .
He supposed none of them would want him there anymore now
that they knew what was inside him. . . .
He would not go down to dinner; he would not inflict his company
upon them. He turned over onto his other side and after a while
dropped back off to sleep, waking much later in the early hours of the
morning, with his insides aching with hunger, and Ron snoring in the
next bed. Squinting around the room he saw the dark outline of
Phineas Nigellus standing again in his portrait and it occurred to
Harry that Dumbledore had probably set Phineas Nigellus to watch
over him, in case he attacked somebody else.
The feeling of being unclean intensified. He half wished he had not
obeyed Dumbledore and stayed. . . . If this was how life was going to
be in Grimmauld Place from now on, maybe he would be better off in
Privet Drive after all.
Everybody else spent the following morning putting up Christmas
decorations. Harry could not remember Sirius ever being in such a
good mood; he was actually singing carols, apparently delighted that
he was to have company over Christmas. Harry could hear his voice
echoing up through the floor in the cold and empty drawing room
where he was sitting alone, watching the sky outside the windows
growing whiter, threatening snow, all the time feeling a savage pleasure that he was giving the others the opportunity to keep talking
about him, as they were bound to be doing. When he heard Mrs.
Weasley calling his name softly up the stairs around lunchtime he retreated farther upstairs and ignored her.
It was around six o’clock in the evening that the doorbell rang and
Mrs. Black started screaming again. Assuming that Mundungus or
some other Order member had come to call, Harry merely settled
himself more comfortably against the wall of Buckbeak the hippogriff’s room where he was hiding, trying to ignore how hungry he
felt as he fed Buckbeak dead rats. It came as a slight shock when somebody hammered hard on the door a few minutes later.
“I know you’re in there,” said Hermione’s voice. “Will you please
come out? I want to talk to you.”
“What are you doing here?” Harry asked her, pulling open the door,
as Buckbeak resumed his scratching at the straw-strewn floor for any
fragments of rat he might have dropped. “I thought you were skiing
with your mum and dad.”
“Well, to tell the truth, skiing’s not really my thing,” said Hermione. “So I’ve come for Christmas.” There was snow in her hair and her
face was pink with cold. “But don’t tell Ron that, I told him it’s really
good because he kept laughing so much. Anyway, Mum and Dad are
a bit disappointed, but I’ve told them that everyone who’s serious
about the exams is staying at Hogwarts to study. They want me to do
well, they’ll understand. Anyway,” she said briskly, “let’s go to your
bedroom, Ron’s mum’s lit a fire in there and she’s sent up sandwiches.”
Harry followed her back to the second floor. When he entered the
bedroom he was rather surprised to see both Ron and Ginny waiting
for them, sitting on Ron’s bed.
“I came on the Knight Bus,” said Hermione airily, pulling off her
jacket before Harry had time to speak. “Dumbledore told me what
had happened first thing this morning, but I had to wait for term to
end officially before setting off. Umbridge is already livid that you lot
disappeared right under her nose, even though Dumbledore told her
Mr. Weasley was in St. Mungo’s, and he’d given you all permission to
visit. So . . .”
She sat down next to Ginny, and the two girls and Ron looked up
at Harry.
“How’re you feeling?” asked Hermione.
“Fine,” said Harry stiffly.
“Oh, don’t lie, Harry,” she said impatiently. “Ron and Ginny say
you’ve been hiding from everyone since you got back from St.
Mungo’s.”
“They do, do they?” said Harry, glaring at Ron and Ginny. Ron
looked down at his feet but Ginny seemed quite unabashed.
“Well, you have!” she said. “And you won’t look at any of us!”
“It’s you lot who won’t look at me!” said Harry angrily.
“Maybe you’re taking it in turns to look and keep missing each
other,” suggested Hermione, the corners of her mouth twitching.
“Very funny,” snapped Harry, turning away.
“Oh, stop feeling all misunderstood,” said Hermione sharply.
“Look, the others have told me what you overheard last night on the
Extendable Ears —”
“Yeah?” growled Harry, his hands deep in his pockets as he watched
the snow now falling thickly outside. “All been talking about me, have
you? Well, I’m getting used to it. . . .”
“We wanted to talk to you, Harry,” said Ginny, “but as you’ve been
hiding ever since we got back —”
“I didn’t want anyone to talk to me,” said Harry, who was feeling
more and more nettled.
“Well, that was a bit stupid of you,” said Ginny angrily, “seeing as
you don’t know anyone but me who’s been possessed by You-KnowWho, and I can tell you how it feels.”
Harry remained quite still as the impact of these words hit him.
Then he turned on the spot to face her.
“I forgot,” he said.
“Lucky you,” said Ginny coolly.
“I’m sorry,” Harry said, and he meant it. “So . . . so do you think
I’m being possessed, then?”
“Well, can you remember everything you’ve been doing?” Ginny
asked. “Are there big blank periods where you don’t know what you’ve
been up to?”
Harry racked his brains.
“No,” he said.
“Then You-Know-Who hasn’t ever possessed you,” said Ginny simply. “When he did it to me, I couldn’t remember what I’d been doing
for hours at a time. I’d find myself somewhere and not know how I
got there.”
Harry hardly dared believe her, yet his heart was lightening almost
in spite of himself.
“That dream I had about your dad and the snake, though —”
“Harry, you’ve had these dreams before,” Hermione said. “You had
flashes of what Voldemort was up to last year.”
“This was different,” said Harry, shaking his head. “I was inside
that snake. It was like I was the snake. . . . What if Voldemort somehow transported me to London — ?”
“One day,” said Hermione, sounding thoroughly exasperated,
“you’ll read Hogwarts, A History, and perhaps that will remind you
that you can’t Apparate or Disapparate inside Hogwarts. Even Voldemort couldn’t just make you fly out of your dormitory, Harry.”
“You didn’t leave your bed, mate,” said Ron. “I saw you thrashing
around in your sleep about a minute before we could wake you up. . . .”
Harry started pacing up and down the room again, thinking. What
they were all saying was not only comforting, it made sense. . . .
Without really thinking he took a sandwich from the plate on the bed
and crammed it hungrily into his mouth. . . .
I’m not the weapon after all, thought Harry. His heart swelled with
happiness and relief, and he felt like joining in as they heard Sirius
tramping past their door toward Buckbeak’s room, singing “God Rest
Ye Merry, Hippogriffs” at the top of his voice.
How could he have dreamed of returning to Privet Drive for Christmas? Sirius’s delight at having the house full again, and especially at
having Harry back, was infectious. He was no longer their sullen host
of the summer; now he seemed determined that everyone should enjoy themselves as much, if not more, than they would have done at
Hogwarts, and he worked tirelessly in the run-up to Christmas Day,
cleaning and decorating with their help, so that by the time they all
went to bed on Christmas Eve the house was barely recognizable. The
tarnished chandeliers were no longer hung with cobwebs but with
garlands of holly and gold and silver streamers; magical snow glittered
in heaps over the threadbare carpets; a great Christmas tree, obtained
by Mundungus and decorated with live fairies, blocked Sirius’s family
tree from view; and even the stuffed elf heads on the hall wall wore Father Christmas hats and beards.
Harry awoke on Christmas morning to find a stack of presents at
the foot of his bed and Ron already halfway through opening his own,
rather larger, pile.
“Good haul this year,” he informed Harry through a cloud of paper. “Thanks for the Broom Compass, it’s excellent, beats Hermione’s — she’s got me a homework planner —”
Harry sorted through his presents and found one with Hermione’s
handwriting on it. She had given him too a book that resembled a diary, except that it said things like “Do it today or later you’ll pay!” every
time he opened a page.
Sirius and Lupin had given Harry a set of excellent books entitled
Practical Defensive Magic and Its Use Against the Dark Arts, which had
superb, moving color illustrations of all the counterjinxes and hexes it
described. Harry flicked through the first volume eagerly; he could see
it was going to be highly useful in his plans for the D.A. Hagrid had
sent a furry brown wallet that had fangs, which were presumably supposed to be an antitheft device, but unfortunately prevented Harry
putting any money in without getting his fingers ripped off. Tonks’s
present was a small, working model of a Firebolt, which Harry
watched fly around the room, wishing he still had his full-size version;
Ron had given him an enormous box of Every-Flavor Beans; Mr. and
Mrs. Weasley the usual hand-knitted jumper and some mince pies;
and Dobby, a truly dreadful painting that Harry suspected had been
done by the elf himself. He had just turned it upside down to see
whether it looked better that way when, with a loud crack, Fred and
George Apparated at the foot of his bed.
“Merry Christmas,” said George. “Don’t go downstairs for a bit.”
“Why not?” said Ron.
“Mum’s crying again,” said Fred heavily. “Percy sent back his
Christmas jumper.”
“Without a note,” added George. “Hasn’t asked how Dad is or visited him or anything. . . .”
“We tried to comfort her,” said Fred, moving around the bed to
look at Harry’s portrait. “Told her Percy’s nothing more than a humongous pile of rat droppings —”
“— didn’t work,” said George, helping himself to a Chocolate
Frog. “So Lupin took over. Best let him cheer her up before we go
down for breakfast, I reckon.”
“What’s that supposed to be anyway?” asked Fred, squinting at
Dobby’s painting. “Looks like a gibbon with two black eyes.”
“It’s Harry!” said George, pointing at the back of the picture. “Says
so on the back!”
“Good likeness,” said Fred, grinning. Harry threw his new homework diary at him; it hit the wall opposite and fell to the floor where it
said happily, “If you’ve dotted the i’s and crossed the t’s then you may do
whatever you please!”
They got up and dressed; they could hear various inhabitants of the
house calling “Merry Christmas” to each other. On their way downstairs they met Hermione. “Thanks for the book, Harry!” she said
happily. “I’ve been wanting that New Theory of Numerology for ages!
And that perfume is really unusual, Ron.”
“No problem,” said Ron. “Who’s that for anyway?” he added, nodding at the neatly wrapped present she was carrying.
“Kreacher,” said Hermione brightly.
“It had better not be clothes!” said Ron warningly. “You know what
Sirius said, Kreacher knows too much, we can’t set him free!”
“It isn’t clothes,” said Hermione, “although if I had my way I’d certainly give him something to wear other than that filthy old rag. No,
it’s a patchwork quilt, I thought it would brighten up his bedroom.”
“What bedroom?” said Harry, dropping his voice to a whisper as
they were passing the portrait of Sirius’s mother.
“Well, Sirius says it’s not so much a bedroom, more a kind of —
den,” said Hermione. “Apparently he sleeps under the boiler in that
cupboard off the kitchen.”
Mrs. Weasley was the only person in the basement when they arrived there. She was standing at the stove and sounded as though she
had a bad head cold when she wished them Merry Christmas, and
they all averted their eyes.
“So, this is Kreacher’s bedroom?” said Ron, strolling over to a dingy
door in the corner opposite the pantry which Harry had never seen
open.
“Yes,” said Hermione, now sounding a little nervous. “Er . . . I
think we’d better knock . . .”
Ron rapped the door with his knuckles but there was no reply.
“He must be sneaking around upstairs,” he said, and without further ado pulled open the door. “Urgh.”
Harry peered inside. Most of the cupboard was taken up with a
very large and old-fashioned boiler, but in the foot’s space underneath
the pipes Kreacher had made himself something that looked like a
nest. A jumble of assorted rags and smelly old blankets were piled on
the floor and the small dent in the middle of it showed where
Kreacher curled up to sleep every night. Here and there among the
material were stale bread crusts and moldy old bits of cheese. In a far
corner glinted small objects and coins that Harry guessed Kreacher
had saved, magpielike, from Sirius’s purge of the house, and he had
also managed to retrieve the silver-framed family photographs that
Sirius had thrown away over the summer. Their glass might be shattered, but still the little black-and-white people inside them peered
haughtily up at him, including — he felt a little jolt in his stomach —
the dark, heavy-lidded woman whose trial he had witnessed in Dumbledore’s Pensieve: Bellatrix Lestrange. By the looks of it, hers was
Kreacher’s favorite photograph; he had placed it to the fore of all the
others and had mended the glass clumsily with Spellotape.
“I think I’ll just leave his present here,” said Hermione, laying the
package neatly in the middle of the depression in the rags and blankets
and closing the door quietly. “He’ll find it later, that’ll be fine. . . .”
“Come to think of it,” said Sirius, emerging from the pantry carrying a large turkey as they closed the cupboard door, “has anyone
actually seen Kreacher lately?”
“I haven’t seen him since the night we came back here,” said Harry.
“You were ordering him out of the kitchen.”
“Yeah . . .” said Sirius, frowning. “You know, I think that’s the last
time I saw him, too. . . . He must be hiding upstairs somewhere. . . .”
“He couldn’t have left, could he?” said Harry. “I mean, when you
said ‘out,’ maybe he thought you meant, get out of the house?”
“No, no, house-elves can’t leave unless they’re given clothes, they’re
tied to their family’s house,” said Sirius.
“They can leave the house if they really want to,” Harry contradicted him. “Dobby did, he left the Malfoys’ to give me warnings two
years ago. He had to punish himself afterward, but he still managed it.”
Sirius looked slightly disconcerted for a moment, then said, “I’ll
look for him later, I expect I’ll find him upstairs crying his eyes out
over my mother’s old bloomers or something. . . . Of course, he might
have crawled into the airing cupboard and died. . . . But I mustn’t get
my hopes up. . . .”
Fred, George, and Ron laughed; Hermione, however, looked
reproachful.
Once they had had their Christmas lunch, the Weasleys and Harry
and Hermione were planning to pay Mr. Weasley another visit, escorted by Mad-Eye and Lupin. Mundungus turned up in time for
Christmas pudding and trifle, having managed to “borrow” a car for
the occasion, as the Underground did not run on Christmas Day. The
car, which Harry doubted very much had been taken with the knowledge or consent of its owner, had had a similar Enlarging Spell put
upon it as the Weasleys’ old Ford Anglia; although normally proportioned outside, ten people with Mundungus driving were able to fit
into it quite comfortably. Mrs. Weasley hesitated at the point of getting inside; Harry knew that her disapproval of Mundungus was battling with her dislike of traveling without magic; finally the cold
outside and her children’s pleading triumphed, and she settled herself
into the backseat between Fred and Bill with good grace.
The journey to St. Mungo’s was quite quick, as there was very little
traffic on the roads. A small trickle of witches and wizards were creeping furtively up the otherwise deserted street to visit the hospital.
Harry and the others got out of the car, and Mundungus drove off
around the corner to wait for them; they strolled casually toward the
window where the dummy in green nylon stood, then, one by one,
stepped through the glass.
The reception area looked pleasantly festive: The crystal orbs that
illuminated St. Mungo’s had been turned to red and gold so that they
became gigantic, glowing Christmas baubles; holly hung around every
doorway, and shining white Christmas trees covered in magical snow
and icicles glittered in every corner, each topped with a gleaming gold
star. It was less crowded than the last time they had been there, although halfway across the room Harry found himself shunted aside
by a witch with a walnut jammed up her left nostril.
“Family argument, eh?” smirked the blonde witch behind the desk.
“You’re the third I’ve seen today . . . Spell Damage, fourth floor . . .”
They found Mr. Weasley propped up in bed with the remains of his
turkey dinner on a tray in his lap and a rather sheepish expression on
his face.
“Everything all right, Arthur?” asked Mrs. Weasley, after they had
all greeted Mr. Weasley and handed over their presents.
“Fine, fine,” said Mr. Weasley, a little too heartily. “You — er —
haven’t seen Healer Smethwyck, have you?”
“No,” said Mrs. Weasley suspiciously, “why?”
“Nothing, nothing,” said Mr. Weasley airily, starting to unwrap his
pile of gifts. “Well, everyone had a good day? What did you all get for
Christmas? Oh, Harry — this is absolutely wonderful —”
For he had just opened Harry’s gift of fuse-wire and screwdrivers.
Mrs. Weasley did not seem entirely satisfied with Mr. Weasley’s answer. As her husband leaned over to shake Harry’s hand, she peered at
the bandaging under his nightshirt.
“Arthur,” she said, with a snap in her voice like a mousetrap,
“you’ve had your bandages changed. Why have you had your bandages changed a day early, Arthur? They told me they wouldn’t need
doing until tomorrow.”
“What?” said Mr. Weasley, looking rather frightened and pulling the
bed covers higher up his chest. “No, no — it’s nothing — it’s — I —”
He seemed to deflate under Mrs. Weasley’s piercing gaze.
“Well — now don’t get upset, Molly, but Augustus Pye had an
idea. . . . He’s the Trainee Healer, you know, lovely young chap and
very interested in . . . um . . . complementary medicine. . . . I mean,
some of these old Muggle remedies . . . well, they’re called stitches,
Molly, and they work very well on — on Muggle wounds —”
Mrs. Weasley let out an ominous noise somewhere between a
shriek and a snarl. Lupin strolled away from the bed and over to the
werewolf, who had no visitors and was looking rather wistfully at the
crowd around Mr. Weasley; Bill muttered something about getting
himself a cup of tea and Fred and George leapt up to accompany him,
grinning.
“Do you mean to tell me,” said Mrs. Weasley, her voice growing
louder with every word and apparently unaware that her fellow visitors were scurrying for cover, “that you have been messing about with
Muggle remedies?”
“Not messing about, Molly, dear,” said Mr. Weasley imploringly.
“It was just — just something Pye and I thought we’d try — only,
most unfortunately — well, with these particular kinds of wounds —
it doesn’t seem to work as well as we’d hoped —”
“Meaning?”
“Well . . . well, I don’t know whether you know what — what
stitches are?”
“It sounds as though you’ve been trying to sew your skin back together,” said Mrs. Weasley with a snort of mirthless laughter, “but
even you, Arthur, wouldn’t be that stupid —”
“I fancy a cup of tea too,” said Harry, jumping to his feet.
Hermione, Ron, and Ginny almost sprinted to the door with him.
As it swung closed behind them, they heard Mrs. Weasley shriek,
“WHAT DO YOU MEAN, THAT’S THE GENERAL IDEA?”
“Typical Dad,” said Ginny, shaking her head as they set off up the
corridor. “Stitches . . . I ask you . . .”
“Well, you know, they do work well on non-magical wounds,” said
Hermione fairly. “I suppose something in that snake’s venom dissolves
them or something. . . . I wonder where the tearoom is?”
“Fifth floor,” said Harry, remembering the sign over the Welcome
Witch’s desk.
They walked along the corridor through a set of double doors and
found a rickety staircase lined with more portraits of brutal-looking
Healers. As they climbed it, the various Healers called out to them, diagnosing odd complaints and suggesting horrible remedies. Ron was
seriously affronted when a medieval wizard called out that he clearly
had a bad case of spattergroit.
“And what’s that supposed to be?” he asked angrily, as the Healer
pursued him through six more portraits, shoving the occupants out of
the way.
“ ’Tis a most grievous affliction of the skin, young master, that will
leave you pockmarked and more gruesome even than you are now —”
“Watch who you’re calling gruesome!” said Ron, his ears turning red.
“The only remedy is to take the liver of a toad, bind it tight about
your throat, stand naked by the full moon in a barrel of eels’ eyes —”
“I have not got spattergroit!”
“But the unsightly blemishes upon your visage, young master —”
“They’re freckles!” said Ron furiously. “Now get back in your own
picture and leave me alone!”
He rounded on the others, who were all keeping determinedly
straight faces.
“What floor’s this?”
“I think it’s the fifth,” said Hermione.
“Nah, it’s the fourth,” said Harry, “one more —”
But as he stepped onto the landing he came to an abrupt halt, staring at the small window set into the double doors that marked the
start of a corridor signposted spell damage. A man was peering out
at them all with his nose pressed against the glass. He had wavy blond
hair, bright blue eyes, and a broad vacant smile that revealed dazzlingly white teeth.
“Blimey!” said Ron, also staring at the man.
“Oh my goodness,” said Hermione suddenly, sounding breathless.
“Professor Lockhart!”
Their ex-Defense Against the Dark Arts teacher pushed open the
doors and moved toward them, wearing a long lilac dressing gown.
“Well, hello there!” he said. “I expect you’d like my autograph,
would you?”
“Hasn’t changed much, has he?” Harry muttered to Ginny, who
grinned.
“Er — how are you, Professor?” said Ron, sounding slightly guilty.
It had been Ron’s malfunctioning wand that had damaged Professor
Lockhart’s memory so badly that he had landed here in the first place,
though, as Lockhart had been attempting to permanently wipe Harry
and Ron’s memories at the time, Harry’s sympathy was limited.
“I’m very well indeed, thank you!” said Lockhart exuberantly,
pulling a rather battered peacock-feather quill from his pocket. “Now,
how many autographs would you like? I can do joined-up writing
now, you know!”
“Er — we don’t want any at the moment, thanks,” said Ron, raising his eyebrows at Harry, who asked, “Professor, should you be wandering around the corridors? Shouldn’t you be in a ward?”
The smile faded slowly from Lockhart’s face. For a few moments he
gazed intently at Harry, then he said, “Haven’t we met?”
“Er . . . yeah, we have,” said Harry. “You used to teach us at Hogwarts, remember?”
“Teach?” repeated Lockhart, looking faintly unsettled. “Me? Did I?”
And then the smile reappeared upon his face so suddenly it was
rather alarming. “Taught you everything you know, I expect, did I?
Well, how about those autographs, then? Shall we say a round dozen,
you can give them to all your little friends then and nobody will be left
out!”
But just then a head poked out of a door at the far end of the corridor and a voice said, “Gilderoy, you naughty boy, where have you
wandered off to?”
A motherly looking Healer wearing a tinsel wreath in her hair came
bustling up the corridor, smiling warmly at Harry and the others.
“Oh Gilderoy, you’ve got visitors! How lovely, and on Christmas
Day too! Do you know, he never gets visitors, poor lamb, and I can’t
think why, he’s such a sweetie, aren’t you?”
“We’re doing autographs!” Gilderoy told the Healer with another
glittering smile. “They want loads of them, won’t take no for an answer! I just hope we’ve got enough photographs!”
“Listen to him,” said the Healer, taking Lockhart’s arm and beaming fondly at him as though he were a precocious two-year-old. “He
was rather well known a few years ago; we very much hope that this
liking for giving autographs is a sign that his memory might be coming back a little bit. Will you step this way? He’s in a closed ward, you
know, he must have slipped out while I was bringing in the Christmas
presents, the door’s usually kept locked . . . not that he’s dangerous!
But,” she lowered her voice to a whisper, “bit of a danger to himself,
bless him. . . . Doesn’t know who he is, you see, wanders off and can’t
remember how to get back. . . . It is nice of you to have come to see
him —”
“Er,” said Ron, gesturing uselessly at the floor above, “actually,
we were just — er —”
But the Healer was smiling expectantly at them, and Ron’s feeble
mutter of “going to have a cup of tea” trailed away into nothingness.
They looked at one another rather hopelessly and then followed Lockhart and his Healer along the corridor.
“Let’s not stay long,” Ron said quietly.
The Healer pointed her wand at the door of the Janus Thickey
ward and muttered “Alohomora.” The door swung open and she led
the way inside, keeping a firm grasp on Gilderoy’s arm until she had
settled him into an armchair beside his bed.
“This is our long-term resident ward,” she informed Harry, Ron,
Hermione, and Ginny in a low voice. “For permanent spell damage,
you know. Of course, with intensive remedial potions and charms and
a bit of luck, we can produce some improvement. . . . Gilderoy does
seem to be getting back some sense of himself, and we’ve seen a real
improvement in Mr. Bode, he seems to be regaining the power of
speech very well, though he isn’t speaking any language we recognize
yet. . . . Well, I must finish giving out the Christmas presents, I’ll
leave you all to chat. . . .”
Harry looked around; this ward bore unmistakable signs of being a
permanent home to its residents. They had many more personal effects around their beds than in Mr. Weasley’s ward; the wall around
Gilderoy’s headboard, for instance, was papered with pictures of himself, all beaming toothily and waving at the new arrivals. He had autographed many of them to himself in disjointed, childish writing.
The moment he had been deposited in his chair by the Healer,
Gilderoy pulled a fresh stack of photographs toward him, seized a
quill, and started signing them all feverishly.
“You can put them in envelopes,” he said to Ginny, throwing the
signed pictures into her lap one by one as he finished them. “I am not
forgotten, you know, no, I still receive a very great deal of fan mail.
. . . Gladys Gudgeon writes weekly. . . . I just wish I knew why. . . .”
He paused, looking faintly puzzled, then beamed again and returned
to his signing with renewed vigor. “I suspect it is simply my good
looks. . . .”
A sallow-skinned, mournful-looking wizard lay in the bed opposite, staring at the ceiling; he was mumbling to himself and seemed
quite unaware of anything around him. Two beds along was a woman
whose entire head was covered in fur; Harry remembered something
similar happening to Hermione during their second year, although
fortunately the damage, in her case, had not been permanent. At the
far end of the ward flowery curtains had been drawn around two beds
to give the occupants and their visitors some privacy.
“Here you are, Agnes,” said the Healer brightly to the furry-faced
woman, handing her a small pile of Christmas presents. “See, not forgotten, are you? And your son’s sent an owl to say he’s visiting tonight,
so that’s nice, isn’t it?”
Agnes gave several loud barks.
“And look, Broderick, you’ve been sent a potted plant and a lovely
calendar with a different fancy hippogriff for each month, they’ll
brighten things up, won’t they?” said the Healer, bustling along to the
mumbling man, setting a rather ugly plant with long, swaying tentacles on the bedside cabinet and fixing the calendar to the wall with her
wand. “And — oh, Mrs. Longbottom, are you leaving already?”
Harry’s head spun round. The curtains had been drawn back from
the two beds at the end of the ward and two visitors were walking
back down the aisle between the beds: a formidable-looking old witch
wearing a long green dress, a moth-eaten fox fur, and a pointed hat
decorated with what was unmistakably a stuffed vulture and, trailing
behind her looking thoroughly depressed — Neville.
With a sudden rush of understanding, Harry realized who the
people in the end beds must be. He cast around wildly for some
means of distracting the others so that Neville could leave the ward
unnoticed and unquestioned, but Ron had looked up at the sound of
the name “Longbottom” too, and before Harry could stop him had
called, “Neville!”
Neville jumped and cowered as though a bullet had narrowly
missed him.
“It’s us, Neville!” said Ron brightly, getting to his feet. “Have you
seen? Lockhart’s here! Who’ve you been visiting?”
“Friends of yours, Neville, dear?” said Neville’s grandmother graciously, bearing down upon them all.
Neville looked as though he would rather be anywhere in the world
but here. A dull purple flush was creeping up his plump face and he
was not making eye contact with any of them.
“Ah, yes,” said his grandmother, looking closely at Harry and sticking out a shriveled, clawlike hand for him to shake. “Yes, yes, I know
who you are, of course. Neville speaks most highly of you.”
“Er — thanks,” said Harry, shaking hands. Neville did not look at
him, but stared at his own feet, the color deepening in his face all the
while.
“And you two are clearly Weasleys,” Mrs. Longbottom continued,
proffering her hand regally to Ron and Ginny in turn. “Yes, I know
your parents — not well, of course — but fine people, fine people . . .
and you must be Hermione Granger?”
Hermione looked rather startled that Mrs. Longbottom knew her
name, but shook hands all the same.
“Yes, Neville’s told me all about you. Helped him out of a few
sticky spots, haven’t you? He’s a good boy,” she said, casting a sternly
appraising look down her rather bony nose at Neville, “but he hasn’t
got his father’s talent, I’m afraid to say. . . .” And she jerked her head
in the direction of the two beds at the end of the ward, so that the
stuffed vulture on her hat trembled alarmingly.
“What?” said Ron, looking amazed (Harry wanted to stamp on
Ron’s foot, but that sort of thing was much harder to bring off unnoticed when you were wearing jeans rather than robes). “Is that your
dad down the end, Neville?”
“What’s this?” said Mrs. Longbottom sharply. “Haven’t you told
your friends about your parents, Neville?”
Neville took a deep breath, looked up at the ceiling, and shook
his head. Harry could not remember ever feeling sorrier for anyone,
but he could not think of any way of helping Neville out of the
situation.
“Well, it’s nothing to be ashamed of!” said Mrs. Longbottom angrily. “You should be proud, Neville, proud! They didn’t give their
health and their sanity so their only son would be ashamed of them,
you know!”
“I’m not ashamed,” said Neville very faintly, still looking anywhere
but at Harry and the others. Ron was now standing on tiptoe to look
over at the inhabitants of the two beds.
“Well, you’ve got a funny way of showing it!” said Mrs. Longbottom. “My son and his wife,” she said, turning haughtily to Harry,
Ron, Hermione, and Ginny, “were tortured into insanity by YouKnow-Who’s followers.”
Hermione and Ginny both clapped their hands over their mouths.
Ron stopped craning his neck to catch a glimpse of Neville’s parents
and looked mortified.
“They were Aurors, you know, and very well respected within the
Wizarding community,” Mrs. Longbottom went on. “Highly gifted,
the pair of them. I — yes, Alice dear, what is it?”
Neville’s mother had come edging down the ward in her nightdress.
She no longer had the plump, happy-looking face Harry had seen in
Moody’s old photograph of the original Order of the Phoenix. Her
face was thin and worn now, her eyes seemed overlarge, and her hair,
which had turned white, was wispy and dead-looking. She did not
seem to want to speak, or perhaps she was not able to, but she made
timid motions toward Neville, holding something in her outstretched
hand.
“Again?” said Mrs. Longbottom, sounding slightly weary. “Very
well, Alice dear, very well — Neville, take it, whatever it is. . . .”
But Neville had already stretched out his hand, into which his
mother dropped an empty Droobles Blowing Gum wrapper.
“Very nice, dear,” said Neville’s grandmother in a falsely cheery
voice, patting his mother on the shoulder. But Neville said quietly,
“Thanks Mum.”
His mother tottered away, back up the ward, humming to herself.
Neville looked around at the others, his expression defiant, as though
daring them to laugh, but Harry did not think he’d ever found anything less funny in his life.
“Well, we’d better get back,” sighed Mrs. Longbottom, drawing on
long green gloves. “Very nice to have met you all. Neville, put that
wrapper in the bin, she must have given you enough of them to paper
your bedroom by now. . . .”
But as they left, Harry was sure he saw Neville slip the wrapper into
his pocket.
The door closed behind them.
“I never knew,” said Hermione, who looked tearful.
“Nor did I,” said Ron rather hoarsely.
“Nor me,” whispered Ginny.
They all looked at Harry.
“I did,” he said glumly. “Dumbledore told me but I promised I
wouldn’t mention it . . . that’s what Bellatrix Lestrange got sent to
Azkaban for, using the Cruciatus Curse on Neville’s parents until they
lost their minds.”
“Bellatrix Lestrange did that?” whispered Hermione, horrified.
“That woman Kreacher’s got a photo of in his den?”
There was a long silence, broken by Lockhart’s angry voice. “Look,
I didn’t learn joined-up writing for nothing, you know!”

C H A P T E R T W E N T y - F O U R
OCCLUMENCY

Kreacher, it transpired, had been lurking in the attic. Sirius said
he had found him up there, covered in dust, no doubt looking
for more relics of the Black family to hide in his cupboard. Though
Sirius seemed satisfied with this story, it made Harry uneasy. Kreacher
seemed to be in a better mood on his reappearance, his bitter muttering had subsided somewhat, and he submitted to orders more docilely
than usual, though once or twice Harry caught the house-elf staring
avidly at him, always looking quickly away when he saw that Harry
had noticed.
Harry did not mention his vague suspicions to Sirius, whose cheerfulness was evaporating fast now that Christmas was over. As the date
of their departure back to Hogwarts drew nearer, he became more and
more prone to what Mrs. Weasley called “fits of the sullens,” in which
he would become taciturn and grumpy, often withdrawing to Buckbeak’s room for hours at a time. His gloom seeped through the house,
oozing under doorways like some noxious gas, so that all of them became infected by it.
Harry did not want to leave Sirius all alone again with only Kreacher
for company. In fact, for the first time in his life, he was not looking
forward to returning to Hogwarts. Going back to school would mean
placing himself once again under the tyranny of Dolores Umbridge,
who had no doubt managed to force through another dozen decrees in
their absence. Then there was no Quidditch to look forward to now
that he had been banned; there was every likelihood that their burden
of homework would increase as the exams drew even nearer; Dumbledore remained as remote as ever; in fact, if it had not been for the D.A.,
Harry felt he might have gone to Sirius and begged him to let him leave
Hogwarts and remain in Grimmauld Place.
Then, on the very last day of the holidays, something happened
that made Harry positively dread his return to school.
“Harry dear,” said Mrs. Weasley, poking her head into his and
Ron’s bedroom, where the pair of them were playing wizard chess
watched by Hermione, Ginny, and Crookshanks, “could you come
down to the kitchen? Professor Snape would like a word with you.”
Harry did not immediately register what she had said; one of his
castles was engaged in a violent tussle with a pawn of Ron’s, and he
was egging it on enthusiastically.
“Squash him — squash him, he’s only a pawn, you idiot — sorry,
Mrs. Weasley, what did you say?”
“Professor Snape, dear. In the kitchen. He’d like a word.”
Harry’s mouth fell open in horror. He looked around at Ron,
Hermione, and Ginny, all of whom were gaping back at him. Crookshanks, whom Hermione had been restraining with difficulty for the
past quarter of an hour, leapt gleefully upon the board and set the
pieces running for cover, squealing at the top of their voices.
“Snape?” said Harry blankly.
“Professor Snape, dear,” said Mrs. Weasley reprovingly. “Now come
on, quickly, he says he can’t stay long.”
“What’s he want with you?” said Ron, looking unnerved as Mrs.
Weasley withdrew from the room.
“You haven’t done anything, have you?”
“No!” said Harry indignantly, racking his brains to think what he
could have done that would make Snape pursue him to Grimmauld
Place. Had his last piece of homework perhaps earned a T?
He pushed open the kitchen door a minute or two later to find Sirius and Snape both seated at the long kitchen table, glaring in opposite directions. The silence between them was heavy with mutual
dislike. A letter lay open on the table in front of Sirius.
“Er,” said Harry to announce his presence.
Snape looked around at him, his face framed between curtains of
greasy black hair.
“Sit down, Potter.”
“You know,” said Sirius loudly, leaning back on his rear chair legs
and speaking to the ceiling, “I think I’d prefer it if you didn’t give orders here, Snape. It’s my house, you see.”
An ugly flush suffused Snape’s pallid face. Harry sat down in a chair
beside Sirius, facing Snape across the table.
“I was supposed to see you alone, Potter,” said Snape, the familiar
sneer curling his mouth, “but Black —”
“I’m his godfather,” said Sirius, louder than ever.
“I am here on Dumbledore’s orders,” said Snape, whose voice, by
contrast, was becoming more and more quietly waspish, “but by all
means stay, Black, I know you like to feel . . . involved.”
“What’s that supposed to mean?” said Sirius, letting his chair fall
back onto all four legs with a loud bang.
“Merely that I am sure you must feel — ah — frustrated by the fact
that you can do nothing useful,” Snape laid a delicate stress on the
word, “for the Order.”
It was Sirius’s turn to flush. Snape’s lip curled in triumph as he
turned to Harry.
“The headmaster has sent me to tell you, Potter, that it is his wish
for you to study Occlumency this term.”
“Study what?” said Harry blankly.
Snape’s sneer became more pronounced.
“Occlumency, Potter. The magical defense of the mind against external penetration. An obscure branch of magic, but a highly useful
one.
Harry’s heart began to pump very fast indeed. Defense against external penetration? But he was not being possessed, they had all
agreed on that. . . .
“Why do I have to study Occlu — thing?” he blurted out.
“Because the headmaster thinks it a good idea,” said Snape
smoothly. “You will receive private lessons once a week, but you will
not tell anybody what you are doing, least of all Dolores Umbridge.
You understand?”
“Yes,” said Harry. “Who’s going to be teaching me?”
Snape raised an eyebrow.
“I am,” he said.
Harry had the horrible sensation that his insides were melting. Extra lessons with Snape — what on earth had he done to deserve this?
He looked quickly around at Sirius for support.
“Why can’t Dumbledore teach Harry?” asked Sirius aggressively.
“Why you?”
“I suppose because it is a headmaster’s privilege to delegate less enjoyable tasks,” said Snape silkily. “I assure you I did not beg for the
job.” He got to his feet. “I will expect you at six o’clock on Monday
evening, Potter. My office. If anybody asks, you are taking Remedial
Potions. Nobody who has seen you in my classes could deny you need
them.”
He turned to leave, his black traveling cloak billowing behind him.
“Wait a moment,” said Sirius, sitting up straighter in his chair.
Snape turned back to face them, sneering.
“I am in rather a hurry, Black . . . unlike you, I do not have unlimited leisure time. . . .”
“I’ll get to the point, then,” said Sirius, standing up. He was rather
taller than Snape who, Harry noticed, had balled his fist in the pocket
of his cloak over what Harry was sure was the handle of his wand. “If
I hear you’re using these Occlumency lessons to give Harry a hard
time, you’ll have me to answer to.”
“How touching,” Snape sneered. “But surely you have noticed that
Potter is very like his father?”
“Yes, I have,” said Sirius proudly.
“Well then, you’ll know he’s so arrogant that criticism simply
bounces off him,” Snape said sleekly.
Sirius pushed his chair roughly aside and strode around the table
toward Snape, pulling out his wand as he went; Snape whipped out
his own. They were squaring up to each other, Sirius looking livid,
Snape calculating, his eyes darting from Sirius’s wand tip to his face.
“Sirius!” said Harry loudly, but Sirius appeared not to hear him.
“I’ve warned you, Snivellus,” said Sirius, his face barely a foot from
Snape’s, “I don’t care if Dumbledore thinks you’ve reformed, I know
better —”
“Oh, but why don’t you tell him so?” whispered Snape. “Or are you
afraid he might not take the advice of a man who has been hiding inside his mother’s house for six months very seriously?”
“Tell me, how is Lucius Malfoy these days? I expect he’s delighted
his lapdog’s working at Hogwarts, isn’t he?”
“Speaking of dogs,” said Snape softly, “did you know that Lucius
Malfoy recognized you last time you risked a little jaunt outside?
Clever idea, Black, getting yourself seen on a safe station platform . . .
gave you a cast-iron excuse not to leave your hidey-hole in future,
didn’t it?”
Sirius raised his wand.
“NO!” Harry yelled, vaulting over the table and trying to get in between them, “Sirius, don’t —”
“Are you calling me a coward?” roared Sirius, trying to push Harry
out of the way, but Harry would not budge.
“Why, yes, I suppose I am,” said Snape.
“Harry — get — out — of — it!” snarled Sirius, pushing him out
of the way with his free hand.
The kitchen door opened and the entire Weasley family, plus
Hermione, came inside, all looking very happy, with Mr. Weasley
walking proudly in their midst dressed in a pair of striped pajamas
covered by a mackintosh.
“Cured!” he announced brightly to the kitchen at large. “Completely cured!”
He and all the other Weasleys froze on the threshold, gazing at the
scene in front of them, which was also suspended in mid-action, both
Sirius and Snape looking toward the door with their wands pointing
into each other’s faces and Harry immobile between them, a hand
stretched out to each of them, trying to force them apart.
“Merlin’s beard,” said Mr. Weasley, the smile sliding off his face,
“what’s going on here?”
Both Sirius and Snape lowered their wands. Harry looked from one
to the other. Each wore an expression of utmost contempt, yet the
unexpected entrance of so many witnesses seemed to have brought
them to their senses. Snape pocketed his wand and swept back across
the kitchen, passing the Weasleys without comment. At the door he
looked back.
“Six o’clock Monday evening, Potter.”
He was gone. Sirius glared after him, his wand at his side.
“But what’s been going on?” asked Mr. Weasley again.
“Nothing, Arthur,” said Sirius, who was breathing heavily as though
he had just run a long distance. “Just a friendly little chat between two
old school friends. . . .” With what looked like an enormous effort, he
smiled. “So . . . you’re cured? That’s great news, really great. . . .”
“Yes, isn’t it?” said Mrs. Weasley, leading her husband forward into
a chair. “Healer Smethwyck worked his magic in the end, found an
antidote to whatever that snake’s got in its fangs, and Arthur’s learned
his lesson about dabbling in Muggle medicine, haven’t you, dear?” she
added, rather menacingly.
“Yes, Molly dear,” said Mr. Weasley meekly.
That night’s meal should have been a cheerful one with Mr.
Weasley back amongst them; Harry could tell Sirius was trying to
make it so, yet when his godfather was not forcing himself to laugh
loudly at Fred and George’s jokes or offering everyone more food, his
face fell back into a moody, brooding expression. Harry was separated
from him by Mundungus and Mad-Eye, who had dropped in to offer
Mr. Weasley their congratulations; he wanted to talk to Sirius, to tell
him that he should not listen to a word Snape said, that Snape was
goading him deliberately and that the rest of them did not think Sirius was a coward for doing as Dumbledore told him and remaining in
Grimmauld Place, but he had no opportunity to do so, and wondered
occasionally, eyeing the ugly look on Sirius’s face, whether he would
have dared to even if he had the chance. Instead he told Ron and
Hermione under his voice about having to take Occlumency lessons
with Snape.
“Dumbledore wants to stop you having those dreams about Voldemort,” said Hermione at once. “Well, you won’t be sorry not to have
them anymore, will you?”
“Extra lessons with Snape?” said Ron, sounding aghast. “I’d rather
have the nightmares!”
They were to return to Hogwarts on the Knight Bus the following
day, escorted once again by Tonks and Lupin, both of whom were eating breakfast in the kitchen when Harry, Ron, and Hermione arrived
there next morning. The adults seemed to have been midway through
a whispered conversation when the door opened; all of them looked
around hastily and fell silent.
After a hurried breakfast they pulled on jackets and scarves against
the chilly gray January morning. Harry had an unpleasant constricted
sensation in his chest; he did not want to say good-bye to Sirius. He
had a bad feeling about this parting; he did not know when they
would next see each other and felt that it was incumbent upon him to
say something to Sirius to stop him doing anything stupid — Harry
was worried that Snape’s accusation of cowardice had stung Sirius so
badly he might even now be planning some foolhardy trip beyond
Grimmauld Place. Before he could think of what to say, however, Sirius had beckoned him to his side.
“I want you to take this,” he said quietly, thrusting a badly wrapped
package roughly the size of a paperback book into Harry’s hands.
“What is it?” Harry asked.
“A way of letting me know if Snape’s giving you a hard time. No,
don’t open it in here!” said Sirius, with a wary look at Mrs. Weasley,
who was trying to persuade the twins to wear hand-knitted mittens. “I
doubt Molly would approve — but I want you to use it if you need
me, all right?”
“Okay,” said Harry, stowing the package away in the inside pocket
of his jacket, but he knew he would never use whatever it was. It
would not be he, Harry, who lured Sirius from his place of safety, no
matter how foully Snape treated him in their forthcoming Occlumency classes.
“Let’s go, then,” said Sirius, clapping Harry on the shoulder and
smiling grimly, and before Harry could say anything else, they were
heading upstairs, stopping before the heavily chained and bolted front
door, surrounded by Weasleys.
“Good-bye, Harry, take care,” said Mrs. Weasley, hugging him.
“See you Harry, and keep an eye out for snakes for me!” said Mr.
Weasley genially, shaking his hand.
“Right — yeah,” said Harry distractedly. It was his last chance to
tell Sirius to be careful; he turned, looked into his godfather’s face and
opened his mouth to speak, but before he could do so Sirius was giving him a brief, one-armed hug. He said gruffly, “Look after yourself,
Harry,” and next moment Harry found himself being shunted out
into the icy winter air, with Tonks (today heavily disguised as a tall,
tweedy woman with iron-gray hair) chivvying him down the steps.
The door of number twelve slammed shut behind them. They followed Lupin down the front steps. As he reached the pavement, Harry
looked around. Number twelve was shrinking rapidly as those on either side of it stretched sideways, squeezing it out of sight; one blink
later, it had gone.
“Come on, the quicker we get on the bus the better,” said Tonks,
and Harry thought there was nervousness in the glance she threw
around the square. Lupin flung out his right arm.
BANG.
A violently purple, triple-decker bus had appeared out of thin air in
front of them, narrowly avoiding the nearest lamppost, which jumped
backward out of its way.
A thin, pimply, jug-eared youth in a purple uniform leapt down
onto the pavement and said, “Welcome to the —”
“Yes, yes, we know, thank you,” said Tonks swiftly. “On, on, get
on —
And she shoved Harry forward toward the steps, past the conductor, who goggled at Harry as he passed.
“ ’Ere — it’s ’Arry — !”
“If you shout his name I will curse you into oblivion,” muttered
Tonks menacingly, now shunting Ginny and Hermione forward.
“I’ve always wanted to go on this thing,” said Ron happily, joining
Harry on board and looking around.
It had been evening the last time Harry had traveled by Knight Bus
and its three decks had been full of brass bedsteads. Now, in the early
morning, it was crammed with an assortment of mismatched chairs
grouped haphazardly around windows. Some of these appeared to
have fallen over when the bus stopped abruptly in Grimmauld Place;
a few witches and wizards were still getting to their feet, grumbling,
and somebody’s shopping bag had slid the length of the bus; an unpleasant mixture of frog spawn, cockroaches, and custard creams was
scattered all over the floor.
“Looks like we’ll have to split up,” said Tonics briskly, looking
around for empty chairs. “Fred, George, and Ginny, if you just take
those seats at the back . . . Remus can stay with you. . . .”
She, Harry, Ron, and Hermione proceeded up to the very top deck,
where there were two chairs at the very front of the bus and two at the
back. Stan Shunpike, the conductor, followed Harry and Ron eagerly
to the back. Heads turned as Harry passed and when he sat down, he
saw all the faces flick back to the front again.
As Harry and Ron handed Stan eleven Sickles each, the bus set off
again, swaying ominously. It rumbled around Grimmauld Square,
weaving on and off the pavement, then, with another tremendous
BANG, they were all flung backward; Ron’s chair toppled right over
and Pigwidgeon, who had been on his lap, burst out of his cage and
flew twittering wildly up to the front of the bus where he fluttered
down upon Hermione’s shoulder instead. Harry, who had narrowly
avoided falling by seizing a candle bracket, looked out of the window:
they were now speeding down what appeared to be a motorway.
“Just outside Birmingham,” said Stan happily, answering Harry’s
unasked question as Ron struggled up from the floor. “You keepin’
well, then, ’Arry? I seen your name in the paper loads over the summer,
but it weren’t never nuffink very nice. . . . I said to Ern, I said, ‘ ’e didn’t
seem like a nutter when we met ’im, just goes to show, dunnit?’ ”
He handed over their tickets and continued to gaze, enthralled, at
Harry; apparently Stan did not care how nutty somebody was if they
were famous enough to be in the paper. The Knight Bus swayed
alarmingly, overtaking a line of cars on the inside. Looking toward the
front of the bus Harry saw Hermione cover her eyes with her hands,
Pigwidgeon still swaying happily on her shoulder.
BANG.
Chairs slid backward again as the Knight Bus jumped from the
Birmingham motorway to a quiet country lane full of hairpin bends.
Hedgerows on either side of the road were leaping out of their way as
they mounted the verges. From here they moved to a main street in
the middle of a busy town, then to a viaduct surrounded by tall hills,
then to a windswept road between high-rise flats, each time with a
loud BANG.
“I’ve changed my mind,” muttered Ron, picking himself up from
the floor for the sixth time, “I never want to ride on here again.”
“Listen, it’s ’Ogwarts stop after this,” said Stan brightly, swaying toward them. “That bossy woman up front ’oo got on with you, she’s
given us a little tip to move you up the queue. We’re just gonna let
Madam Marsh off first, though —” There was more retching from
downstairs, followed by a horrible spattering sound. “She’s not feeling
’er best.
A few minutes later the Knight Bus screeched to a halt outside a
small pub, which squeezed itself out of the way to avoid a collision.
They could hear Stan ushering the unfortunate Madam Marsh out of
the bus and the relieved murmurings of her fellow passengers on the
second deck. The bus moved on again, gathering speed, until —
BANG.
They were rolling through a snowy Hogsmeade. Harry caught a
glimpse of the Hog’s Head down its side street, the severed boar’s head
sign creaking in the wintry wind. Flecks of snow hit the large window
at the front of the bus. At last they rolled to a halt outside the gates to
Hogwarts.
Lupin and Tonks helped them off the bus with their luggage and
then got off to say good-bye. Harry glanced up at the three decks of
the Knight Bus and saw all the passengers staring down at them, noses
flat against the windows.
“You’ll be safe once you’re in the grounds,” said Tonks, casting a
careful eye around at the deserted road. “Have a good term, okay?”
“Look after yourselves,” said Lupin, shaking hands all round and
reaching Harry last. “And listen . . .” He lowered his voice while the
rest of them exchanged last-minute good-byes with Tonks, “Harry, I
know you don’t like Snape, but he is a superb Occlumens and we
all — Sirius included — want you to learn to protect yourself, so
work hard, all right?”
“Yeah, all right,” said Harry heavily, looking up into Lupin’s prematurely lined face. “See you, then . . .”
The six of them struggled up the slippery drive toward the castle
dragging their trunks. Hermione was already talking about knitting a
few elf hats before bedtime. Harry glanced back when they reached
the oak front doors; the Knight Bus had already gone, and he halfwished, given what was coming the following day, that he was still on
board.
Harry spent most of the next day dreading the evening. His morning
Potions lesson did nothing to dispel his trepidation, as Snape was as
unpleasant as ever, and Harry’s mood was further lowered by the fact
that members of the D.A. were continually approaching him in the
corridors between classes, asking hopefully whether there would be a
meeting that night.
“I’ll let you know when the next one is,” Harry said over and over
again, “but I can’t do it tonight, I’ve got to go to — er — Remedial
Potions. . . .”
“You take Remedial Potions?” asked Zacharias Smith superciliously,
having cornered Harry in the entrance hall after lunch. “Good Lord,
you must be terrible, Snape doesn’t usually give extra lessons, does
he?”
As Smith strode away in an annoyingly buoyant fashion, Ron
glared after him.
“Shall I jinx him? I can still get him from here,” he said, raising his
wand and taking aim between Smith’s shoulder blades.
“Forget it,” said Harry dismally. “It’s what everyone’s going to
think, isn’t it? That I’m really stup —”
“Hi, Harry,” said a voice behind him. He turned around and found
Cho standing there.
“Oh,” said Harry as his stomach leapt uncomfortably. “Hi.”
“We’ll be in the library, Harry,” said Hermione firmly, and she
seized Ron above the elbow and dragged him off toward the marble
staircase.
“Had a good Christmas?” asked Cho.
“Yeah, not bad,” said Harry.
“Mine was pretty quiet,” said Cho. For some reason, she was looking rather embarrassed. “Erm . . . there’s another Hogsmeade trip
next month, did you see the notice?”
“What? Oh no, I haven’t checked the notice board since I got
back. . . .”
“Yes, it’s on Valentine’s Day. . . .”
“Right,” said Harry, wondering why she was telling him this.
“Well, I suppose you want to — ?”
“Only if you do,” she said eagerly.
Harry stared. He had been about to say “I suppose you want to
know when the next D.A. meeting is?” but her response did not seem
to fit.
“I — er —” he said.
“Oh, it’s okay if you don’t,” she said, looking mortified. “Don’t
worry. I-I’ll see you around.”
She walked away. Harry stood staring after her, his brain working
frantically. Then something clunked into place.
“Cho! Hey — CHO!”
He ran after her, catching her halfway up the marble staircase.
“Er — d’you want to come into Hogsmeade with me on Valentine’s Day?”
“Oooh, yes!” she said, blushing crimson and beaming at him.
“Right . . . well . . . that’s settled then,” said Harry, and feeling that
the day was not going to be a complete loss after all, he headed off to
the library to pick up Ron and Hermione before their afternoon
lessons, walking in a rather bouncy way himself.
By six o’clock that evening, however, even the glow of having successfully asked out Cho Chang was insufficient to lighten the ominous feelings that intensified with every step Harry took toward
Snape’s office.
He paused outside the door when he reached it, wishing he were almost anywhere else, then, taking a deep breath, knocked, and entered.
It was a shadowy room lined with shelves bearing hundreds of glass
jars in which floated slimy bits of animals and plants, suspended in
variously colored potions. In a corner stood the cupboard full of ingredients that Snape had once accused Harry — not without
reason — of robbing. Harry’s attention was drawn toward the desk,
however, where a shallow stone basin engraved with runes and symbols lay in a pool of candlelight. Harry recognized it at once — Dumbledore’s Pensieve. Wondering what on earth it was doing here, he
jumped when Snape’s cold voice came out of the corner.
“Shut the door behind you, Potter.”
Harry did as he was told with the horrible feeling that he was imprisoning himself as he did so. When he turned back to face the room
Snape had moved into the light and was pointing silently at the chair
opposite his desk. Harry sat down and so did Snape, his cold black
eyes fixed unblinkingly upon Harry, dislike etched in every line of his
face.
“Well, Potter, you know why you are here,” he said. “The headmaster has asked me to teach you Occlumency. I can only hope that
you prove more adept at it than Potions.”
“Right,” said Harry tersely.
“This may not be an ordinary class, Potter,” said Snape, his eyes
narrowed malevolently, “but I am still your teacher and you will therefore call me ‘sir’ or ‘Professor’ at all times.”
“Yes . . . sir,” said Harry.
“Now, Occlumency. As I told you back in your dear godfather’s
kitchen, this branch of magic seals the mind against magical intrusion
and influence.”
“And why does Professor Dumbledore think I need it, sir?” said
Harry, looking directly into Snape’s dark, cold eyes and wondering
whether he would answer.
Snape looked back at him for a moment and then said contemptuously, “Surely even you could have worked that out by now, Potter?
The Dark Lord is highly skilled at Legilimency —”
“What’s that? Sir?”
“It is the ability to extract feelings and memories from another person’s mind —”
“He can read minds?” said Harry quickly, his worst fears confirmed.
“You have no subtlety, Potter,” said Snape, his dark eyes glittering.
“You do not understand fine distinctions. It is one of the shortcomings that makes you such a lamentable potion-maker.”
Snape paused for a moment, apparently to savor the pleasure of
insulting Harry, before continuing, “Only Muggles talk of ‘mind
reading.’ The mind is not a book, to be opened at will and examined
at leisure. Thoughts are not etched on the inside of skulls, to be
perused by any invader. The mind is a complex and many-layered
thing, Potter . . . or at least, most minds are. . . .” He smirked. “It is
true, however, that those who have mastered Legilimency are able, un-
der certain conditions, to delve into the minds of their victims and to
interpret their findings correctly. The Dark Lord, for instance, almost
always knows when somebody is lying to him. Only those skilled at
Occlumency are able to shut down those feelings and memories that
contradict the lie, and so utter falsehoods in his presence without
detection.”
Whatever Snape said, Legilimency sounded like mind reading to
Harry and he did not like the sound of it at all.
“So he could know what we’re thinking right now? Sir?”
“The Dark Lord is at a considerable distance and the walls and
grounds of Hogwarts are guarded by many ancient spells and charms
to ensure the bodily and mental safety of those who dwell within
them,” said Snape. “Time and space matter in magic, Potter. Eye contact is often essential to Legilimency.”
“Well then, why do I have to learn Occlumency?”
Snape eyed Harry, tracing his mouth with one long, thin finger as
he did so.
“The usual rules do not seem to apply with you, Potter. The curse
that failed to kill you seems to have forged some kind of connection
between you and the Dark Lord. The evidence suggests that at times,
when your mind is most relaxed and vulnerable — when you are
asleep, for instance — you are sharing the Dark Lord’s thoughts and
emotions. The headmaster thinks it inadvisable for this to continue.
He wishes me to teach you how to close your mind to the Dark
Lord.”
Harry’s heart was pumping fast again. None of this added up.
“But why does Professor Dumbledore want to stop it?” he asked
abruptly. “I don’t like it much, but it’s been useful, hasn’t it? I mean
. . . I saw that snake attack Mr. Weasley and if I hadn’t, Professor
Dumbledore wouldn’t have been able to save him, would he? Sir?”
Snape stared at Harry for a few moments, still tracing his mouth
with his finger. When he spoke again, it was slowly and deliberately, as
though he weighed every word.
“It appears that the Dark Lord has been unaware of the connection
between you and himself until very recently. Up till now it seems that
you have been experiencing his emotions and sharing his thoughts
without his being any the wiser. However, the vision you had shortly
before Christmas —”
“The one with the snake and Mr. Weasley?”
“Do not interrupt me, Potter,” said Snape in a dangerous voice. “As
I was saying . . . the vision you had shortly before Christmas represented such a powerful incursion upon the Dark Lord’s thoughts —”
“I saw inside the snake’s head, not his!”
“I thought I just told you not to interrupt me, Potter?”
But Harry did not care if Snape was angry; at last he seemed to be
getting to the bottom of this business. He had moved forward in his
chair so that, without realizing it, he was perched on the very edge,
tense as though poised for flight.
“How come I saw through the snake’s eyes if it’s Voldemort’s
thoughts I’m sharing?”
“Do not say the Dark Lord’s name!” spat Snape.
There was a nasty silence. They glared at each other across the
Pensieve.
“Professor Dumbledore says his name,” said Harry quietly.
“Dumbledore is an extremely powerful wizard,” Snape muttered.
“While he may feel secure enough to use the name . . . the rest of
us . . .” He rubbed his left forearm, apparently unconsciously, on the
spot where Harry knew the Dark Mark was burned into his skin.
“I just wanted to know,” Harry began again, forcing his voice back
to politeness, “why —”
“You seem to have visited the snake’s mind because that was where
the Dark Lord was at that particular moment,” snarled Snape. “He
was possessing the snake at the time and so you dreamed you were inside it too. . . .”
“And Vol — he — realized I was there?”
“It seems so,” said Snape coolly.
“How do you know?” said Harry urgently. “Is this just Professor
Dumbledore guessing, or — ?”
“I told you,” said Snape, rigid in his chair, his eyes slits, “to call me
‘sir.’ ”
“Yes, sir,” said Harry impatiently, “but how do you know — ?”
“It is enough that we know,” said Snape repressively. “The important point is that the Dark Lord is now aware that you are gaining
access to his thoughts and feelings. He has also deduced that the
process is likely to work in reverse; that is to say, he has realized that
he might be able to access your thoughts and feelings in return —”
“And he might try and make me do things?” asked Harry. “Sir?” he
added hurriedly.
“He might,” said Snape, sounding cold and unconcerned. “Which
brings us back to Occlumency.”
Snape pulled out his wand from an inside pocket of his robes and
Harry tensed in his chair, but Snape merely raised the wand to his
temple and placed its tip into the greasy roots of his hair. When he
withdrew it, some silvery substance came away, stretching from temple to wand like a thick gossamer strand, which broke as he pulled the
wand away from it and fell gracefully into the Pensieve, where it
swirled silvery white, neither gas nor liquid. Twice more Snape
raised the wand to his temple and deposited the silvery substance
into the stone basin, then, without offering any explanation of his
behavior, he picked up the Pensieve carefully, removed it to a shelf
out of their way and returned to face Harry with his wand held at
the ready.
“Stand up and take out your wand, Potter.”
Harry got to his feet feeling nervous. They faced each other with
the desk between them.
“You may use your wand to attempt to disarm me, or defend yourself in any other way you can think of,” said Snape.
“And what are you going to do?” Harry asked, eyeing Snape’s wand
apprehensively.
“I am about to attempt to break into your mind,” said Snape softly.
“We are going to see how well you resist. I have been told that you
have already shown aptitude at resisting the Imperius Curse. . . . You
will find that similar powers are needed for this. . . . Brace yourself,
now. . . . Legilimens!”
Snape had struck before Harry was ready, before Harry had even
begun to summon any force of resistance: the office swam in front of
his eyes and vanished, image after image was racing through his mind
like a flickering film so vivid it blinded him to his surroundings. . . .
He was five, watching Dudley riding a new red bicycle, and his
heart was bursting with jealousy. . . . He was nine, and Ripper the
bulldog was chasing him up a tree and the Dursleys were laughing below on the lawn. . . . He was sitting under the Sorting Hat, and it was
telling him he would do well in Slytherin. . . . Hermione was lying in
the hospital wing, her face covered with thick black hair. . . . A hundred dementors were closing in on him beside the dark lake. . . . Cho
Chang was drawing nearer to him under the mistletoe. . . .
No, said a voice in Harry’s head, as the memory of Cho drew nearer,
you’re not watching that, you’re not watching it, it’s private —
He felt a sharp pain in his knee. Snape’s office had come back into
view and he realized that he had fallen to the floor; one of his knees
had collided painfully with the leg of Snape’s desk. He looked up at
Snape, who had lowered his wand and was rubbing his wrist. There
was an angry weal there, like a scorch mark.
“Did you mean to produce a Stinging Hex?” asked Snape coolly.
“No,” said Harry bitterly, getting up from the floor.
“I thought not,” said Snape contemptuously. “You let me get in too
far. You lost control.”
“Did you see everything I saw?” Harry asked, unsure whether he
wanted to hear the answer.
“Flashes of it,” said Snape, his lip curling. “To whom did the dog
belong?”
“My Aunt Marge,” Harry muttered, hating Snape.
“Well, for a first attempt that was not as poor as it might have
been,” said Snape, raising his wand once more. “You managed to stop
me eventually, though you wasted time and energy shouting. You
must remain focused. Repel me with your brain and you will not need
to resort to your wand.”
“I’m trying,” said Harry angrily, “but you’re not telling me how!”
“Manners, Potter,” said Snape dangerously. “Now, I want you to
close your eyes.”
Harry threw him a filthy look before doing as he was told. He did
not like the idea of standing there with his eyes shut while Snape faced
him, carrying a wand.
“Clear your mind, Potter,” said Snape’s cold voice. “Let go of all
emotion. . . .”
But Harry’s anger at Snape continued to pound through his veins
like venom. Let go of his anger? He could as easily detach his legs. . . .
“You’re not doing it, Potter. . . . You will need more discipline than
this. . . . Focus, now. . . .”
Harry tried to empty his mind, tried not to think, or remember, or
feel. . . .
“Let’s go again . . . on the count of three . . . one — two —
three — Legilimens!”
A great black dragon was rearing in front of him. . . . His father
and mother were waving at him out of an enchanted mirror. . . .
Cedric Diggory was lying on the ground with blank eyes staring at
him. . . .
“NOOOOOOO!”
He was on his knees again, his face buried in his hands, his brain
aching as though someone had been trying to pull it from his skull.
“Get up!” said Snape sharply. “Get up! You are not trying, you are
making no effort, you are allowing me access to memories you fear,
handing me weapons!”
Harry stood up again, his heart thumping wildly as though he had
really just seen Cedric dead in the graveyard. Snape looked paler than
usual, and angrier, though not nearly as angry as Harry was.
“I — am — making — an — effort,” he said through clenched
teeth.
“I told you to empty yourself of emotion!”
“Yeah? Well, I’m finding that hard at the moment,” Harry snarled.
“Then you will find yourself easy prey for the Dark Lord!” said
Snape savagely. “Fools who wear their hearts proudly on their sleeves,
who cannot control their emotions, who wallow in sad memories and
allow themselves to be provoked this easily — weak people, in other
words — they stand no chance against his powers! He will penetrate
your mind with absurd ease, Potter!”
“I am not weak,” said Harry in a low voice, fury now pumping
through him so that he thought he might attack Snape in a moment.
“Then prove it! Master yourself!” spat Snape. “Control your anger,
discipline your mind! We shall try again! Get ready, now! Legilimens!”
He was watching Uncle Vernon hammering the letter box shut. . . .
A hundred dementors were drifting across the lake in the grounds toward him. . . . He was running along a windowless passage with Mr.
Weasley. . . . They were drawing nearer to the plain black door at the
end of the corridor. . . . Harry expected to go through it . . . but Mr.
Weasley led him off to the left, down a flight of stone steps. . . .
“I KNOW! I KNOW!”
He was on all fours again on Snape’s office floor, his scar was prick-
ling unpleasantly, but the voice that had just issued from his mouth
was triumphant. He pushed himself up again to find Snape staring at
him, his wand raised. It looked as though, this time, Snape had lifted
the spell before Harry had even tried to fight back.
“What happened then, Potter?” he asked, eyeing Harry intently.
“I saw — I remembered,” Harry panted. “I’ve just realized . . .”
“Realized what?” asked Snape sharply.
Harry did not answer at once; he was still savoring the moment of
blinding realization as he rubbed his forehead. . . .
He had been dreaming about a windowless corridor ending in a
locked door for months, without once realizing that it was a real place.
Now, seeing the memory again, he knew that all along he had been
dreaming about the corridor down which he had run with Mr.
Weasley on the twelfth of August as they hurried to the courtrooms in
the Ministry. It was the corridor leading to the Department of Mysteries, and Mr. Weasley had been there the night that he had been attacked by Voldemort’s snake. . . .
He looked up at Snape.
“What’s in the Department of Mysteries?”
“What did you say?” Snape asked quietly and Harry saw, with deep
satisfaction, that Snape was unnerved.
“I said, what’s in the Department of Mysteries, sir?” Harry said.
“And why,” said Snape slowly, “would you ask such a thing?”
“Because,” said Harry, watching Snape closely for a reaction, “that
corridor I’ve just seen — I’ve been dreaming about it for months —
I’ve just recognized it — it leads to the Department of Mysteries . . .
and I think Voldemort wants something from —”
“I have told you not to say the Dark Lord’s name!”
They glared at each other. Harry’s scar seared again, but he did not
care. Snape looked agitated. When he spoke again he sounded as
though he was trying to appear cool and unconcerned.
“There are many things in the Department of Mysteries, Potter,
few of which you would understand and none of which concern you,
do I make myself plain?”
“Yes,” Harry said, still rubbing his prickling scar, which was becoming more painful.
“I want you back here same time on Wednesday, and we will continue work then.”
“Fine,” said Harry. He was desperate to get out of Snape’s office
and find Ron and Hermione.
“You are to rid your mind of all emotion every night before
sleep — empty it, make it blank and calm, you understand?”
“Yes,” said Harry, who was barely listening.
“And be warned, Potter . . . I shall know if you have not practiced . . .”
“Right,” Harry mumbled. He picked up his schoolbag, swung it
over his shoulder, and hurried toward the office door. As he opened it
he glanced back at Snape, who had his back to Harry and was scooping his own thoughts out of the Pensieve with the tip of his wand and
replacing them carefully inside his own head. Harry left without another word, closing the door carefully behind him, his scar still throbbing painfully.
Harry found Ron and Hermione in the library, where they were
working on Umbridge’s most recent ream of homework. Other students, nearly all of them fifth years, sat at lamp-lit tables nearby, noses
close to books, quills scratching feverishly, while the sky outside the
mullioned windows grew steadily blacker. The only other sound was
the slight squeaking of one of Madam Pince’s shoes as the librarian
prowled the aisles menacingly, breathing down the necks of those
touching her precious books.
Harry felt shivery; his scar was still aching, he felt almost feverish.
When he sat down opposite Ron and Hermione he caught sight of
himself in the window opposite. He was very white, and his scar
seemed to be showing up more clearly than usual.
“How did it go?” Hermione whispered, and then, looking concerned, “Are you all right, Harry?”
“Yeah . . . fine . . . I dunno,” said Harry impatiently, wincing as
pain shot through his scar again. “Listen . . . I’ve just realized something. . . .”
And he told them what he had just seen and deduced.
“So . . . so, are you saying . . .” whispered Ron, as Madam Pince
swept past, squeaking slightly, “that the weapon — the thing YouKnow-Who’s after — is in the Ministry of Magic?”
“In the Department of Mysteries, it’s got to be,” Harry whispered.
“I saw that door when your dad took me down to the courtrooms for
my hearing and it’s definitely the same one he was guarding when the
snake bit him.”
Hermione let out a long, slow sigh. “Of course,” she breathed.
“Of course what?” said Ron rather impatiently.
“Ron, think about it. . . . Sturgis Podmore was trying to get
through a door at the Ministry of Magic. . . . It must have been that
one, it’s too much of a coincidence!”
“How come Sturgis was trying to break in when he’s on our side?”
said Ron.
“Well, I don’t know,” Hermione admitted. “That is a bit odd. . . .”
“So what’s in the Department of Mysteries?” Harry asked Ron.
“Has your dad ever mentioned anything about it?”
“I know they call the people who work in there ‘Unspeakables,’ ”
said Ron, frowning. “Because no one really seems to know what they
do in there. . . . Weird place to have a weapon . . .”
“It’s not weird at all, it makes perfect sense,” said Hermione. “It will
be something top secret that the Ministry has been developing, I expect. . . . Harry, are you sure you’re all right?”
For Harry had just run both his hands hard over his forehead as
though trying to iron it.
“Yeah . . . fine . . .” he said, lowering his hands, which were trembling. “I just feel a bit . . . I don’t like Occlumency much. . . .”
“I expect anyone would feel shaky if they’d had their mind attacked
over and over again,” said Hermione sympathetically. “Look, let’s get
back to the common room, we’ll be a bit more comfortable there. . . .”
But the common room was packed and full of shrieks of laughter
and excitement; Fred and George were demonstrating their latest bit
of joke shop merchandise.
“Headless Hats!” shouted George, as Fred waved a pointed hat decorated with a fluffy pink feather at the watching students. “Two
Galleons each — watch Fred, now!”
Fred swept the hat onto his head, beaming. For a second he merely
looked rather stupid, then both hat and head vanished.
Several girls screamed, but everyone else was roaring with laughter.
“And off again!” shouted George, and Fred’s hand groped for a moment in what seemed to be thin air over his shoulder; then his head
reappeared as he swept the pink-feathered hat from it again.
“How do those hats work, then?” said Hermione, distracted from
her homework and watching Fred and George. “I mean, obviously it’s
some kind of Invisibility Spell, but it’s rather clever to have extended
the field of invisibility beyond the boundaries of the charmed object.
. . . I’d imagine the charm wouldn’t have a very long life though. . . .”
Harry did not answer; he was still feeling ill.
“I’m going to have to do this tomorrow,” he muttered, pushing the
books he had just taken out of his bag back inside it.
“Well, write it in your homework planner then!” said Hermione
encouragingly. “So you don’t forget!”
Harry and Ron exchanged looks as he reached into his bag, withdrew the planner and opened it tentatively.
“Don’t leave it till later, you big second-rater!” chided the book as
Harry scribbled down Umbridge’s homework. Hermione beamed at it.
“I think I’ll go to bed,” said Harry, stuffing the homework planner
back into his bag and making a mental note to drop it in the fire the
first opportunity he got.
He walked across the common room, dodging George, who tried
to put a Headless Hat on him, and reached the peace and cool of the
stone staircase to the boys’ dormitories. He was feeling sick again, just
as he had the night he had had the vision of the snake, but thought
that if he could just lie down for a while he would be all right.
He opened the door of his dormitory and was one step inside it
when he experienced pain so severe he thought that someone must
have sliced into the top of his head. He did not know where he was,
whether he was standing or lying down, he did not even know his own
name. . . .
Maniacal laughter was ringing in his ears. . . . He was happier than
he had been in a very long time. . . . Jubilant, ecstatic, triumphant . . .
A wonderful, wonderful thing had happened. . . .
“Harry? HARRY!”
Someone had hit him around the face. The insane laughter was
punctuated with a cry of pain. The happiness was draining out of
him, but the laughter continued. . . .
He opened his eyes and as he did so, he became aware that the wild
laughter was coming out of his own mouth. The moment he realized
this, it died away; Harry lay panting on the floor, staring up at the
ceiling, the scar on his forehead throbbing horribly. Ron was bending
over him, looking very worried.
“What happened?” he said.
“I . . . dunno . . .” Harry gasped, sitting up again. “He’s really
happy . . . really happy . . .”
“You-Know-Who is?”
“Something good’s happened,” mumbled Harry. He was shaking as
badly as he had done after seeing the snake attack Mr. Weasley and felt
very sick. “Something he’s been hoping for.”
The words came, just as they had back in the Gryffindor changing
room, as though a stranger was speaking them through Harry’s
mouth, yet he knew they were true. He took deep breaths, willing
himself not to vomit all over Ron. He was very glad that Dean and
Seamus were not here to watch this time.
“Hermione told me to come and check on you,” said Ron in a low
voice, helping Harry to his feet. “She says your defenses will be low at
the moment, after Snape’s been fiddling around with your mind. . . .
Still, I suppose it’ll help in the long run, won’t it?”
He looked doubtfully at Harry as he helped him toward bed. Harry
nodded without any conviction and slumped back on his pillows,
aching all over from having fallen to the floor so often that evening,
his scar still prickling painfully. He could not help feeling that his first
foray into Occlumency had weakened his mind’s resistance rather
than strengthening it, and he wondered, with a feeling of great trepidation, what had happened to make Lord Voldemort the happiest he
had been in fourteen years.

C H A P T E R T W E N T Y - F I V E
THE BEETLE AT BA Y

Harry’s question was answered the very next morning. When
Hermione’s Daily Prophet arrived she smoothed it out, gazed
for a moment at the front page, and then gave a yelp that caused everyone in the vicinity to stare at her.
“What?” said Harry and Ron together.
For an answer she spread the newspaper on the table in front of
them and pointed at ten black-and-white photographs that filled the
whole of the front page, nine showing wizards’ faces and the tenth, a
witch’s. Some of the people in the photographs were silently jeering;
others were tapping their fingers on the frame of their pictures, looking insolent. Each picture was captioned with a name and the crime
for which the person had been sent to Azkaban.
Antonin Dolohov, read the legend beneath a wizard with a long,
pale, twisted face who was sneering up at Harry, convicted of the brutal murders of Gideon and Fabian Prewett.
Augustus Rookwood, said the caption beneath a pockmarked man
with greasy hair who was leaning against the edge of his picture,
looking bored, convicted of leaking Ministry of Magic Secrets to HeWho-Must-Not-Be-Named.
But Harry’s eyes were drawn to the picture of the witch. Her face
had leapt out at him the moment he had seen the page. She had long,
dark hair that looked unkempt and straggly in the picture, though he
had seen it sleek, thick, and shining. She glared up at him through
heavily lidded eyes, an arrogant, disdainful smile playing around her
thin mouth. Like Sirius, she retained vestiges of great good looks, but
something — perhaps Azkaban — had taken most of her beauty.
Bellatrix Lestrange, convicted of the torture and permanent incapacitation of Frank and Alice Longbottom.
Hermione nudged Harry and pointed at the headline over the pictures, which Harry, concentrating on Bellatrix, had not yet read.
MASS BREAKOUT FROM AZKABAN
MINISTRY FEARS BLACK IS “RALLYING POINT”
FOR OLD DEATH EATERS
“Black?” said Harry loudly. “Not — ?”
“Shhh!” whispered Hermione desperately. “Not so loud — just
read it!”
The Ministry of Magic announced late last night that
there has been a mass breakout from Azkaban.
Speaking to reporters in his private office, Cornelius Fudge, Minister of Magic, confirmed that ten
high-security prisoners escaped in the early hours of
yesterday evening, and that he has already informed
the Muggle Prime Minister of the dangerous nature
of these individuals.
“We find ourselves, most unfortunately, in the
same position we were two and a half years ago when
the murderer Sirius Black escaped,” said Fudge last
night. “Nor do we think the two breakouts are unrelated. An escape of this magnitude suggests outside
help, and we must remember that Black, as the first
person ever to break out of Azkaban, would be ideally
placed to help others follow in his footsteps. We think
it likely that these individuals, who include Black’s
cousin, Bellatrix Lestrange, have rallied around Black
as their leader. We are, however, doing all we can to
round up the criminals and beg the magical community to remain alert and cautious. On no account
should any of these individuals be approached.”
“There you are, Harry,” said Ron, looking awestruck. “That’s why
he was happy last night. . . .”
“I don’t believe this,” snarled Harry, “Fudge is blaming the breakout on Sirius?”
“What other options does he have?” said Hermione bitterly. “He
can hardly say, ‘Sorry everyone, Dumbledore warned me this might
happen, the Azkaban guards have joined Lord Voldemort’ — stop
whimpering, Ron — ‘and now Voldemort’s worst supporters have broken out too.’ I mean, he’s spent a good six months telling everyone
you and Dumbledore are liars, hasn’t he?”
Hermione ripped open the newspaper and began to read the report
inside while Harry looked around the Great Hall. He could not understand why his fellow students were not looking scared or at least
discussing the terrible piece of news on the front page, but very few of
them took the newspaper every day like Hermione. There they all
were, talking about homework and Quidditch and who knew what
other rubbish, and outside these walls ten more Death Eaters had
swollen Voldemort’s ranks. . . .
He glanced up at the staff table. It was a different story here:
Dumbledore and Professor McGonagall were deep in conversation,
both looking extremely grave. Professor Sprout had the Prophet
propped against a bottle of ketchup and was reading the front page
with such concentration that she was not noticing the gentle drip of
egg yolk falling into her lap from her stationary spoon. Meanwhile, at
the far end of the table, Professor Umbridge was tucking into a bowl
of porridge. For once her pouchy toad’s eyes were not sweeping the
Great Hall looking for misbehaving students. She scowled as she
gulped down her food and every now and then she shot a malevolent
glance up the table to where Dumbledore and McGonagall were talking so intently.
“Oh my —” said Hermione wonderingly, still staring at the
newspaper.
“What now?” said Harry quickly; he was feeling jumpy.
“It’s . . . horrible,” said Hermione, looking shaken. She folded back
page ten of the newspaper and handed it back to Harry and Ron.
TRAGIC DEMISE OF
MINISTRY OF MAGIC WORKER
St. Mungo’s Hospital promised a full inquiry last
night after Ministry of Magic worker Broderick
Bode, 49, was discovered dead in his bed, strangled by
a potted-plant. Healers called to the scene were unable
to revive Mr. Bode, who had been injured in a
workplace accident some weeks prior to his death.
Healer Miriam Strout, who was in charge of Mr.
Bode’s ward at the time of the incident, has been suspended on full pay and was unavailable for comment
yesterday, but a spokeswizard for the hospital said in
a statement, “St. Mungo’s deeply regrets the death of
Mr. Bode, whose health was improving steadily prior
to this tragic accident.
“We have strict guidelines on the decorations permitted on our wards but it appears that Healer Strout,
busy over the Christmas period, overlooked the
dangers of the plant on Mr. Bode’s bedside table. As
his speech and mobility improved, Healer Strout encouraged Mr. Bode to look after the plant himself,
unaware that it was not an innocent Flitterbloom, but
a cutting of Devil’s Snare, which, when touched by
the convalescent Mr. Bode, throttled him instantly.
“St. Mungo’s is as yet unable to account for the
presence of the plant on the ward and asks any witch
or wizard with information to come forward.”
“Bode . . .” said Ron. “Bode. It rings a bell. . . .”
“We saw him,” Hermione whispered. “In St. Mungo’s, remember?
He was in the bed opposite Lockhart’s, just lying there, staring at the
ceiling. And we saw the Devil’s Snare arrive. She — the Healer —
said it was a Christmas present. . . .”
Harry looked back at the story. A feeling of horror was rising like
bile in his throat.
“How come we didn’t recognize Devil’s Snare . . . ? We’ve seen it
before . . . we could’ve stopped this from happening . . .”
“Who expects Devil’s Snare to turn up in a hospital disguised as a
potted plant?” said Ron sharply. “It’s not our fault, whoever sent it to
the bloke is to blame! They must be a real prat, why didn’t they check
what they were buying?”
“Oh come on, Ron!” said Hermione shakily, “I don’t think anyone
could put Devil’s Snare in a pot and not realize it tries to kill whoever
touches it? This — this was murder. . . . A clever murder, as well. . . .
If the plant was sent anonymously, how’s anyone ever going to find
out who did it?”
Harry was not thinking about Devil’s Snare. He was remembering
taking the lift down to the ninth level of the Ministry on the day of
his hearing, and the sallow-faced man who had got in on the Atrium
level.
“I met Bode,” he said slowly. “I saw him at the Ministry with your
dad . . .”
Ron’s mouth fell open.
“I’ve heard Dad talk about him at home! He was an Unspeakable — he worked in the Department of Mysteries!”
They looked at one another for a moment, then Hermione pulled
the newspaper back toward her, closed it, glared for a moment at the
pictures of the ten escaped Death Eaters on the front, then leapt to her
feet.
“Where are you going?” said Ron, startled.
“To send a letter,” said Hermione, swinging her bag onto her
shoulder. “It . . . well, I don’t know whether . . . but it’s worth trying
. . . and I’m the only one who can . . .”
“I hate it when she does that,” grumbled Ron as he and Harry got
up from the table and made their own, slower way out of the Great
Hall. “Would it kill her to tell us what she’s up to for once? It’d take
her about ten more seconds — hey, Hagrid!”
Hagrid was standing beside the doors into the entrance hall, waiting for a crowd of Ravenclaws to pass. He was still as heavily bruised
as he had been on the day he had come back from his mission to the
giants and there was a new cut right across the bridge of his nose.
“All righ’, you two?” he said, trying to muster a smile but managing
only a kind of pained grimace.
“Are you okay, Hagrid?” asked Harry, following him as he lumbered after the Ravenclaws.
“Fine, fine,” said Hagrid with a feeble assumption of airiness; he
waved a hand and narrowly missed concussing a frightened-looking
Professor Vector, who was passing. “Jus’ busy, yeh know, usual stuff —
lessons ter prepare — couple o’ salamanders got scale rot — an’ I’m
on probation,” he mumbled.
“You’re on probation?” said Ron very loudly, so that many students
passing looked around curiously. “Sorry — I mean — you’re on probation?” he whispered.
“Yeah,” said Hagrid. “ ’S’no more’n I expected, ter tell yeh the
truth. Yeh migh’ not’ve picked up on it, bu’ that inspection didn’ go
too well, yeh know . . . anyway,” he sighed deeply. “Bes’ go an rub a
bit more chili powder on them salamanders or their tails’ll be hangin’
off ’em next. See yeh, Harry . . . Ron . . .”
He trudged away, out the front doors and down the stone steps into
the damp grounds. Harry watched him go, wondering how much
more bad news he could stand.
The fact that Hagrid was now on probation became common knowledge within the school over the next few days, but to Harry’s indignation, hardly anybody appeared to be upset about it; indeed, some
people, Draco Malfoy prominent among them, seemed positively
gleeful. As for the freakish death of an obscure Department of Mysteries employee in St. Mungo’s, Harry, Ron, and Hermione seemed to
be the only people who knew or cared. There was only one topic of
conversation in the corridors now: the ten escaped Death Eaters,
whose story had finally filtered through the school from those few
people who read the newspapers. Rumors were flying that some of the
convicts had been spotted in Hogsmeade, that they were supposed to
be hiding out in the Shrieking Shack and that they were going to
break into Hogwarts, just as Sirius Black had done.
Those who came from Wizarding families had grown up hearing
the names of these Death Eaters spoken with almost as much fear
as Voldemort’s; the crimes they had committed during the days
of Voldemort’s reign of terror were legendary. There were relatives of
their victims among the Hogwarts students, who now found themselves the unwilling objects of a gruesome sort of reflected fame as
they walked the corridors: Susan Bones, who had an uncle, aunt, and
cousins who had all died at the hands of one of the ten, said miserably
during Herbology that she now had a good idea what it felt like to be
Harry.
“And I don’t know how you stand it, it’s horrible,” she said bluntly,
dumping far too much dragon manure on her tray of Screechsnap
seedlings, causing them to wriggle and squeak in discomfort.
It was true that Harry was the subject of much renewed muttering
and pointing in the corridors these days, yet he thought he detected a
slight difference in the tone of the whisperers’ voices. They sounded
curious rather than hostile now, and once or twice he was sure he overheard snatches of conversation that suggested that the speakers were
not satisfied with the Prophet’s version of how and why ten Death
Eaters had managed to break out of Azkaban fortress. In their confusion and fear, these doubters now seemed to be turning to the only
other explanation available to them, the one that Harry and Dumbledore had been expounding since the previous year.
It was not only the students’ mood that had changed. It was now
quite common to come across two or three teachers conversing in low,
urgent whispers in the corridors, breaking off their conversations the
moment they saw students approaching.
“They obviously can’t talk freely in the staffroom anymore,” said
Hermione in a low voice, as she, Harry, and Ron passed Professors
McGonagall, Flitwick, and Sprout huddled together outside the
Charms classroom one day. “Not with Umbridge there.”
“Reckon they know anything new?” said Ron, gazing back over his
shoulder at the three teachers.
“If they do, we’re not going to hear about it, are we?” said Harry angrily. “Not after Decree . . . What number are we on now?”
For new signs had appeared on the house notice boards the morning after news of the Azkaban breakout:
— by order of —
The High Inquisitor of Hogwarts
Teachers are hereby banned from giving students any information that is not strictly related to the subjects they are
paid to teach.
The above is in accordance with
Educational Decree Number Twenty-six.
Signed:
high inquisitor
This latest decree had been the subject of a great number of jokes
among the students. Lee Jordan had pointed out to Umbridge that by
the terms of the new rule she was not allowed to tell Fred and George
off for playing Exploding Snap in the back of the class.
“Exploding Snap’s got nothing to do with Defense Against the
Dark Arts, Professor! That’s not information relating to your subject!”
When Harry next saw Lee, the back of his hand was bleeding rather
badly. Harry recommended essence of murtlap.
Harry had thought that the breakout from Azkaban might have
humbled Umbridge a little, that she might have been abashed at the
catastrophe that had occurred right under her beloved Fudge’s nose. It
seemed, however, to have only intensified her furious desire to bring
every aspect of life at Hogwarts under her personal control. She
seemed determined at the very least to achieve a sacking before long,
and the only question was whether it would be Professor Trelawney or
Hagrid who went first.
Every single Divination and Care of Magical Creatures lesson was
now conducted in the presence of Umbridge and her clipboard. She
lurked by the fire in the heavily perfumed tower room, interrupting
Professor Trelawney’s increasingly hysterical talks with difficult questions about Ornithomancy and Heptomology, insisting that she predict students’ answers before they gave them and demanding that she
demonstrate her skill at the crystal ball, the tea leaves, and the rune
stones in turn. Harry thought that Professor Trelawney might soon
crack under the strain; several times he passed her in the corridors (in
itself a very unusual occurrence as she generally remained in her tower
room), muttering wildly to herself, wringing her hands, and shooting
terrified glances over her shoulder, all the time giving off a powerful
smell of cooking sherry. If he had not been so worried about Hagrid,
he would have felt sorry for her — but if one of them was to be ousted
out of a job, there could be only one choice for Harry as to who
should remain.
Unfortunately, Harry could not see that Hagrid was putting up a
better show than Trelawney. Though he seemed to be following Hermione’s advice and had shown them nothing more frightening than
a crup, a creature indistinguishable from a Jack Russell terrier except
for its forked tail, since before Christmas, he also seemed to have lost
his nerve. He was oddly distracted and jumpy in lessons, losing the
thread of what he was saying while talking to the class, answering
questions wrongly and glancing anxiously at Umbridge all the time.
He was also more distant with Harry, Ron, and Hermione than he had
ever been before, expressly forbidding them to visit him after dark.
“If she catches yeh, it’ll be all of our necks on the line,” he told
them flatly, and with no desire to do anything that jeopardized his job
further, they abstained from walking down to his hut in the evenings.
It seemed to Harry that Umbridge was steadily depriving him of
everything that made his life at Hogwarts worth living: visits to Hagrid’s house, letters from Sirius, his Firebolt, and Quidditch. He took
his revenge the only way he had: redoubling his efforts for the D.A.
Harry was pleased to see that all of them, even Zacharias Smith,
had been spurred to work harder than ever by the news that ten more
Death Eaters were now on the loose, but in nobody was this improvement more pronounced than in Neville. The news of his parents’ attacker’s escape had wrought a strange and even slightly alarming
change in him. He had not once mentioned his meeting with Harry,
Ron, and Hermione on the closed ward in St. Mungo’s, and taking
their lead from him, they had kept quiet about it too. Nor had he said
anything on the subject of Bellatrix and her fellow torturers’ escape; in
fact, he barely spoke during D.A. meetings anymore, but worked relentlessly on every new jinx and countercurse Harry taught them, his
plump face screwed up in concentration, apparently indifferent to injuries or accidents, working harder than anyone else in the room. He
was improving so fast it was quite unnerving and when Harry taught
them the Shield Charm, a means of deflecting minor jinxes so that
they rebounded upon the attacker, only Hermione mastered the
charm faster than Neville.
In fact Harry would have given a great deal to be making as much
progress at Occlumency as Neville was making during D.A. meetings.
Harry’s sessions with Snape, which had started badly enough, were
not improving; on the contrary, Harry felt he was getting worse with
every lesson.
Before he had started studying Occlumency, his scar had prickled
occasionally, usually during the night, or else following one of those
strange flashes of Voldemort’s thoughts or moods that he experienced
every now and then. Nowadays, however, his scar hardly ever stopped
prickling, and he often felt lurches of annoyance or cheerfulness that
were unrelated to what was happening to him at the time, which were
always accompanied by a particularly painful twinge from his scar. He
had the horrible impression that he was slowly turning into a kind of
aerial that was tuned in to tiny fluctuations in Voldemort’s mood, and
he was sure he could date this increased sensitivity firmly from his first
Occlumency lesson with Snape. What was more, he was now dreaming about walking down the corridor toward the entrance to the
Department of Mysteries almost every night, dreams that always culminated in him standing longingly in front of the plain black door.
“Maybe it’s a bit like an illness,” said Hermione, looking concerned
when Harry confided in her and Ron. “A fever or something. It has to
get worse before it gets better.”
“It’s lessons with Snape that are making it worse,” said Harry flatly.
“I’m getting sick of my scar hurting, and I’m getting bored walking
down that corridor every night.” He rubbed his forehead angrily. “I
just wish the door would open, I’m sick of standing staring at it —”
“That’s not funny,” said Hermione sharply. “Dumbledore doesn’t
want you to have dreams about that corridor at all, or he wouldn’t
have asked Snape to teach you Occlumency. You’re just going to have
to work a bit harder in your lessons.”
“I am working!” said Harry, nettled. “You try it sometime, Snape
trying to get inside your head, it’s not a bundle of laughs, you know!”
“Maybe . . .” said Ron slowly.
“Maybe what?” said Hermione rather snappishly.
“Maybe it’s not Harry’s fault he can’t close his mind,” said Ron darkly.
“What do you mean?” said Hermione.
“Well, maybe Snape isn’t really trying to help Harry. . . .”
Harry and Hermione stared at him. Ron looked darkly and meaningfully from one to the other.
“Maybe,” he said again in a lower voice, “he’s actually trying to
open Harry’s mind a bit wider . . . make it easier for You-Know —”
“Shut up, Ron,” said Hermione angrily. “How many times have
you suspected Snape, and when have you ever been right? Dumbledore trusts him, he works for the Order, that ought to be enough.”
“He used to be a Death Eater,” said Ron stubbornly. “And we’ve
never seen proof that he really swapped sides. . . .”
“Dumbledore trusts him,” Hermione repeated. “And if we can’t
trust Dumbledore, we can’t trust anyone.”
With so much to worry about and so much to do — startling
amounts of homework that frequently kept the fifth years working
until past midnight, secret D.A. meetings, and regular classes with
Snape — January seemed to be passing alarmingly fast. Before Harry
knew it, February had arrived, bringing with it wetter and warmer
weather and the prospect of the second Hogsmeade visit of the year.
Harry had had very little time to spare on conversations with Cho
since they had agreed to visit the village together, but suddenly found
himself facing a Valentine’s Day spent entirely in her company.
On the morning of the fourteenth he dressed particularly carefully.
He and Ron arrived at breakfast just in time for the arrival of the post
owls. Hedwig was not there — not that he had expected her — but
Hermione was tugging a letter from the beak of an unfamiliar brown
owl as they sat down.
“And about time! If it hadn’t come today . . .” she said eagerly, tearing open the envelope and pulling out a small piece of parchment.
Her eyes sped from left to right as she read through the message and a
grimly pleased expression spread across her face.
“Listen, Harry,” she said, looking up at him. “This is really important. . . . Do you think you could meet me in the Three Broomsticks
around midday?”
“Well . . . I dunno,” said Harry dubiously. “Cho might be expecting me to spend the whole day with her. We never said what we were
going to do.”
“Well, bring her along if you must,” said Hermione urgently. “But
will you come?”
“Well . . . all right, but why?”
“I haven’t got time to tell you now, I’ve got to answer this
quickly —”
And she hurried out of the Great Hall, the letter clutched in one
hand and a piece of uneaten toast in the other.
“Are you coming?” Harry asked Ron, but he shook his head, looking glum.
“I can’t come into Hogsmeade at all, Angelina wants a full day’s
training. Like it’s going to help — we’re the worst team I’ve ever seen.
You should see Sloper and Kirke, they’re pathetic, even worse than I
am.” He heaved a great sigh. “I dunno why Angelina won’t just let me
resign. . . .”
“It’s because you’re good when you’re on form, that’s why,” said
Harry irritably.
He found it very hard to be sympathetic to Ron’s plight when he
himself would have given almost anything to be playing in the forthcoming match against Hufflepuff. Ron seemed to notice Harry’s tone,
because he did not mention Quidditch again during breakfast, and
there was a slight frostiness in the way they said good-bye to each
other shortly afterward. Ron departed for the Quidditch pitch and
Harry, after attempting to flatten his hair while staring at his reflection
in the back of a teaspoon, proceeded alone to the entrance hall to
meet Cho, feeling very apprehensive and wondering what on earth
they were going to talk about.
She was waiting for him a little to the side of the oak front doors,
looking very pretty with her hair tied back in a long ponytail. Harry’s
feet seemed to be too big for his body as he walked toward her, and he
was suddenly horribly aware of his arms and how stupid they looked
swinging at his sides.
“Hi,” said Cho slightly breathlessly.
“Hi,” said Harry.
They stared at each other for a moment, then Harry said, “Well —
er — shall we go, then?”
“Oh — yes . . .”
They joined the queue of people being signed out by Filch, occasionally catching each other’s eye and grinning shiftily, but not talking
to each other. Harry was relieved when they reached the fresh air, finding it easier to walk along in silence than just stand there looking awkward. It was a fresh, breezy sort of day and as they passed the Quidditch
stadium, Harry glimpsed Ron and Ginny skimming over the stands
and felt a horrible pang that he was not up there with them. . . .
“You really miss it, don’t you?” said Cho.
He looked around and saw her watching him.
“Yeah,” sighed Harry. “I do.”
“Remember the first time we played against each other, in the third
year?” she asked him.
“Yeah,” said Harry, grinning. “You kept blocking me.”
“And Wood told you not to be a gentleman and knock me off my
broom if you had to,” said Cho, smiling reminiscently. “I heard he got
taken on by Pride of Portree, is that right?”
“Nah, it was Puddlemere United, I saw him at the World Cup last
year.”
“Oh, I saw you there too, remember? We were on the same campsite. It was really good, wasn’t it?”
The subject of the Quidditch World Cup carried them all the way
down the drive and out through the gates. Harry could hardly believe
how easy it was to talk to her, no more difficult, in fact, than talking
to Ron and Hermione, and he was just starting to feel confident and
cheerful when a large gang of Slytherin girls passed them, including
Pansy Parkinson.
“Potter and Chang!” screeched Pansy to a chorus of snide giggles.
“Urgh, Chang, I don’t think much of your taste. . . . At least Diggory
was good-looking!”
They sped up, talking and shrieking in a pointed fashion with
many exaggerated glances back at Harry and Cho, leaving an embarrassed silence in their wake. Harry could think of nothing else to say
about Quidditch, and Cho, slightly flushed, was watching her feet.
“So . . . where d’you want to go?” Harry asked as they entered
Hogsmeade. The High Street was full of students ambling up and
down, peering into the shop windows and messing about together on
the pavements.
“Oh . . . I don’t mind,” said Cho, shrugging. “Um . . . shall we just
have a look in the shops or something?”
They wandered toward Dervish and Banges. A large poster had
been stuck up in the window and a few Hogsmeaders were looking at
it. They moved aside when Harry and Cho approached and Harry
found himself staring once more at the ten pictures of the escaped
Death Eaters. The poster (“By Order of the Ministry of Magic”) offered a thousand-Galleon reward to any witch or wizard with information relating to the recapture of any of the convicts pictured.
“It’s funny, isn’t it,” said Cho in a low voice, also gazing up at the
pictures of the Death Eaters. “Remember when that Sirius Black escaped, and there were dementors all over Hogsmeade looking for
him? And now ten Death Eaters are on the loose and there aren’t dementors anywhere. . . .”
“Yeah,” said Harry, tearing his eyes away from Bellatrix Lestrange’s
face to glance up and down the High Street. “Yeah, it is weird. . . .”
He was not sorry that there were no dementors nearby, but now he
came to think of it, their absence was highly significant. They had not
only let the Death Eaters escape, they were not bothering to look for
them. . . . It looked as though they really were outside Ministry control now.
The ten escaped Death Eaters were staring out of every shop window
he and Cho passed. It started to rain as they passed Scrivenshaft’s; cold,
heavy drops of water kept hitting Harry’s face and the back of his neck.
“Um . . . d’you want to get a coffee?” said Cho tentatively, as the
rain began to fall more heavily.
“Yeah, all right,” said Harry, looking around. “Where — ?”
“Oh, there’s a really nice place just up here, haven’t you ever been
to Madam Puddifoot’s?” she said brightly, and she led him up a side
road and into a small tea shop that Harry had never noticed before. It
was a cramped, steamy little place where everything seemed to have
been decorated with frills or bows. Harry was reminded unpleasantly
of Umbridge’s office.
“Cute, isn’t it?” said Cho happily.
“Er . . . yeah,” said Harry untruthfully.
“Look, she’s decorated it for Valentine’s Day!” said Cho, indicating
a number of golden cherubs that were hovering over each of the small,
circular tables, occasionally throwing pink confetti over the occupants.
“Aaah . . .”
They sat down at the last remaining table, which was situated in
the steamy window. Roger Davies, the Ravenclaw Quidditch Captain,
was sitting about a foot and a half away with a pretty blonde girl. They
were holding hands. The sight made Harry feel uncomfortable, particularly when, looking around the tea shop, he saw that it was full of
nothing but couples, all of them holding hands. Perhaps Cho would
expect him to hold her hand.
“What can I get you, m’dears?” said Madam Puddifoot, a very stout
woman with a shiny black bun, squeezing between their table and
Roger Davies’s with great difficulty.
“Two coffees, please,” said Cho.
In the time it took for their coffees to arrive, Roger Davies and his
girlfriend started kissing over their sugar bowl. Harry wished they
wouldn’t; he felt that Davies was setting a standard with which Cho
would soon expect him to compete. He felt his face growing hot and
tried staring out of the window, but it was so steamed up he could not
see the street outside. To postpone the moment when he had to look
at Cho he stared up at the ceiling as though examining the paintwork
and received a handful of confetti in the face from their hovering
cherub.
After a few more painful minutes Cho mentioned Umbridge;
Harry seized on the subject with relief and they passed a few happy
moments abusing her, but the subject had already been so thoroughly
canvassed during D.A. meetings it did not last very long. Silence fell
again. Harry was very conscious of the slurping noises coming from
the table next door and cast wildly around for something else to say.
“Er . . . listen, d’you want to come with me to the Three Broomsticks at lunchtime? I’m meeting Hermione Granger there.”
Cho raised her eyebrows.
“You’re meeting Hermione Granger? Today?”
“Yeah. Well, she asked me to, so I thought I would. D’you want to
come with me? She said it wouldn’t matter if you did.”
“Oh . . . well . . . that was nice of her.”
But Cho did not sound as though she thought it was nice at all; on
the contrary, her tone was cold and all of a sudden she looked rather
forbidding.
A few more minutes passed in total silence, Harry drinking his coffee so fast that he would soon need a fresh cup. Next door, Roger
Davies and his girlfriend seemed glued together by the lips.
Cho’s hand was lying on the table beside her coffee, and Harry was
feeling a mounting pressure to take hold of it. Just do it, he told himself, as a fount of mingled panic and excitement surged up inside his
chest. Just reach out and grab it. . . . Amazing how much more difficult
it was to extend his arm twelve inches and touch her hand than to
snatch a speeding Snitch from midair . . .
But just as he moved his hand forward, Cho took hers off the table.
She was now watching Roger Davies kissing his girlfriend with a
mildly interested expression.
“He asked me out, you know,” she said in a quiet voice. “A couple
of weeks ago. Roger. I turned him down, though.”
Harry, who had grabbed the sugar bowl to excuse his sudden lunging movement across the table, could not think why she was telling
him this. If she wished she were sitting at the table next door being
heartily kissed by Roger Davies, why had she agreed to come out with
him?
He said nothing. Their cherub threw another handful of confetti
over them; some of it landed in the last cold dregs of coffee Harry had
been about to drink.
“I came in here with Cedric last year,” said Cho.
In the second or so it took for him to take in what she had said,
Harry’s insides had become glacial. He could not believe she wanted
to talk about Cedric now, while kissing couples surrounded them and
a cherub floated over their heads.
Cho’s voice was rather higher when she spoke again.
“I’ve been meaning to ask you for ages. . . . Did Cedric — did he
m-m-mention me at all before he died?”
This was the very last subject on earth Harry wanted to discuss, and
least of all with Cho.
“Well — no —” he said quietly. “There — there wasn’t time for
him to say anything. Erm . . . so . . . d’you . . . d’you get to see a lot of
Quidditch in the holidays? You support the Tornados, right?”
His voice sounded falsely bright and cheery. To his horror, he saw
that her eyes were swimming with tears again, just as they had been after the last D.A. meeting before Christmas.
“Look,” he said desperately, leaning in so that nobody else could
overhear, “let’s not talk about Cedric right now. . . . Let’s talk about
something else. . . .”
But this, apparently, was quite the wrong thing to say.
“I thought,” she said, tears spattering down onto the table. “I
thought you’d u-u-understand! I need to talk about it! Surely you
n-need to talk about it t-too! I mean, you saw it happen, d-didn’t
you?”
Everything was going nightmarishly wrong; Roger Davies’ girlfriend had even unglued herself to look around at Cho crying.
“Well — I have talked about it,” Harry said in a whisper, “to Ron
and Hermione, but —”
“Oh, you’ll talk to Hermione Granger!” she said shrilly, her face
now shining with tears, and several more kissing couples broke apart
to stare. “But you won’t talk to me! P-perhaps it would be best if
we just . . . just p-paid and you went and met up with Hermione
G-Granger, like you obviously want to!”
Harry stared at her, utterly bewildered, as she seized a frilly napkin
and dabbed at her shining face with it.
“Cho?” he said weakly, wishing Roger would seize his girlfriend
and start kissing her again to stop her goggling at him and Cho.
“Go on, leave!” she said, now crying into the napkin. “I don’t know
why you asked me out in the first place if you’re going to make
arrangements to meet other girls right after me. . . . How many are
you meeting after Hermione?”
“It’s not like that!” said Harry, and he was so relieved at finally understanding what she was annoyed about that he laughed, which he
realized a split second too late was a mistake.
Cho sprang to her feet. The whole tearoom was quiet, and everybody was watching them now.
“I’ll see you around, Harry,” she said dramatically, and hiccuping
slightly she dashed to the door, wrenched it open, and hurried off into
the pouring rain.
“Cho!” Harry called after her, but the door had already swung shut
behind her with a tuneful tinkle.
There was total silence within the tea shop. Every eye was upon
Harry. He threw a Galleon down onto the table, shook pink confetti
out of his eyes, and followed Cho out of the door.
It was raining hard now, and she was nowhere to be seen. He simply did not understand what had happened; half an hour ago they had
been getting along fine.
“Women!” he muttered angrily, sloshing down the rain-washed
street with his hands in his pockets. “What did she want to talk about
Cedric for anyway? Why does she always want to drag up a subject
that makes her act like a human hosepipe?”
He turned right and broke into a splashy run, and within minutes
he was turning into the doorway of the Three Broomsticks. He knew
he was too early to meet Hermione, but he thought it likely there
would be someone in here with whom he could spend the intervening
time. He shook his wet hair out of his eyes and looked around. Hagrid
was sitting alone in a corner, looking morose.
“Hi, Hagrid!” he said, when he had squeezed through the crammed
tables and pulled up a chair beside him.
Hagrid jumped and looked down at Harry as though he barely recognized him. Harry saw that he had two fresh cuts on his face and several new bruises.
“Oh, it’s you, Harry,” said Hagrid. “You all righ’?”
“Yeah, I’m fine,” lied Harry; in fact, next to this battered and
mournful-looking Hagrid, he felt he did not have much to complain
about. “Er — are you okay?”
“Me?” said Hagrid. “Oh yeah, I’m grand, Harry, grand. . . .”
He gazed into the depths of his pewter tankard, which was the size
of a large bucket, and sighed. Harry did not know what to say to him.
They sat side by side in silence for a moment. Then Hagrid said
abruptly, “In the same boat, you an’ me, aren’ we, Harry?”
“Er —” said Harry.
“Yeah . . . I’ve said it before. . . . Both outsiders, like,” said Hagrid,
nodding wisely. “An’ both orphans. Yeah . . . both orphans.”
He took a great swig from his tankard.
“Makes a diff’rence, havin’ a decent family,” he said. “Me dad was
decent. An’ your mum an’ dad were decent. If they’d lived, life woulda
bin diff’rent, eh?”
“Yeah . . . I s’pose,” said Harry cautiously. Hagrid seemed to be in
a very strange mood.
“Family,” said Hagrid gloomily. “Whatever yeh say, blood’s important. . . .”
And he wiped a trickle of it out of his eye.
“Hagrid,” said Harry, unable to stop himself, “where are you getting all these injuries?”
“Eh?” said Hagrid, looking startled. “Wha’ injuries?”
“All those!” said Harry, pointing at Hagrid’s face.
“Oh . . . tha’s jus’ normal bumps an’ bruises, Harry,” said Hagrid
dismissively. “I got a rough job.”
He drained his tankard, set it back upon the table, and got to his
feet.
“I’ll be seein’ yeh, Harry. . . . Take care now. . . .”
And he lumbered out of the pub looking wretched and then disappeared into the torrential rain. Harry watched him go, feeling miserable. Hagrid was unhappy and he was hiding something, but he
seemed determined not to accept help. What was going on? But before Harry could think about the matter any further, he heard a voice
calling his name.
“Harry! Harry, over here!”
Hermione was waving at him from the other side of the room. He
got up and made his way toward her through the crowded pub. He
was still a few tables away when he realized that Hermione was not
alone; she was sitting at a table with the unlikeliest pair of drinking
mates he could ever have imagined: Luna Lovegood and none other
than Rita Skeeter, ex-journalist on the Daily Prophet and one of
Hermione’s least favorite people in the world.
“You’re early!” said Hermione, moving along to give him room to
sit down. “I thought you were with Cho, I wasn’t expecting you for
another hour at least!”
“Cho?” said Rita at once, twisting around in her seat to stare avidly
at Harry. “A girl?”
She snatched up her crocodile-skin handbag and groped within it.
“It’s none of your business if Harry’s been with a hundred girls,”
Hermione told Rita coolly. “So you can put that away right now.”
Rita had been on the point of withdrawing an acid-green quill from
her bag. Looking as though she had been forced to swallow Stinksap,
she snapped her bag shut again.
“What are you up to?” Harry asked, sitting down and staring from
Rita to Luna to Hermione.
“Little Miss Perfect was just about to tell me when you arrived,”
said Rita, taking a large slurp of her drink. “I suppose I’m allowed to
talk to him, am I?” she shot at Hermione.
“Yes, I suppose you are,” said Hermione coldly.
Unemployment did not suit Rita. The hair that had once been set
in elaborate curls now hung lank and unkempt around her face. The
scarlet paint on her two-inch talons was chipped and there were a couple of false jewels missing from her winged glasses. She took another
great gulp of her drink and said out of the corner of her mouth,
“Pretty girl, is she, Harry?”
“One more word about Harry’s love life and the deal’s off and that’s
a promise,” said Hermione irritably.
“What deal?” said Rita, wiping her mouth on the back of her hand.
“You haven’t mentioned a deal yet, Miss Prissy, you just told me to turn
up. Oh, one of these days . . .” She took a deep shuddering breath.
“Yes, yes, one of these days you’ll write more horrible stories about
Harry and me,” said Hermione indifferently. “Find someone who
cares, why don’t you?”
“They’ve run plenty of horrible stories about Harry this year
without my help,” said Rita, shooting a sideways look at him over the
top of her glass and adding in a rough whisper, “How has that made
you feel, Harry? Betrayed? Distraught? Misunderstood?”
“He feels angry, of course,” said Hermione in a hard, clear voice.
“Because he’s told the Minister of Magic the truth and the Minister’s
too much of an idiot to believe him.”
“So you actually stick to it, do you, that He-Who-Must-Not-BeNamed is back?” said Rita, lowering her glass and subjecting Harry to
a piercing stare while her finger strayed longingly to the clasp of the
crocodile bag. “You stand by all this garbage Dumbledore’s been
telling everybody about You-Know-Who returning and you being the
sole witness — ?”
“I wasn’t the sole witness,” snarled Harry. “There were a dozen-odd
Death Eaters there as well. Want their names?”
“I’d love them,” breathed Rita, now fumbling in her bag once more
and gazing at him as though he was the most beautiful thing she had
ever seen. “A great bold headline: ‘Potter Accuses . . .’ A subheading:
‘Harry Potter Names Death Eaters Still Among Us.’ And then, beneath a
nice big photograph of you: ‘Disturbed teenage survivor of You-KnowWho’s attack, Harry Potter, 15, caused outrage yesterday by accusing respectable and prominent members of the Wizarding community of being
Death Eaters. . . .’ ”
The Quick-Quotes Quill was actually in her hand and halfway to
her mouth when the rapturous expression died out of her face.
“But of course,” she said, lowering the quill and looking daggers at
Hermione, “Little Miss Perfect wouldn’t want that story out there,
would she?”
“As a matter of fact,” said Hermione sweetly, “that’s exactly what
Little Miss Perfect does want.”
Rita stared at her. So did Harry. Luna, on the other hand, sang,
“Weasley Is Our King” dreamily under her breath and stirred her
drink with a cocktail onion on a stick.
“You want me to report what he says about He-Who-Must-NotBe-Named?” Rita asked Hermione in a hushed voice.
“Yes, I do,” said Hermione. “The true story. All the facts. Exactly as
Harry reports them. He’ll give you all the details, he’ll tell you the
names of the undiscovered Death Eaters he saw there, he’ll tell you
what Voldemort looks like now — oh, get a grip on yourself,” she
added contemptuously, throwing a napkin across the table, for at the
sound of Voldemort’s name, Rita had jumped so badly that she had
slopped half her glass of firewhisky down herself.
Rita blotted the front of her grubby raincoat, still staring at
Hermione. Then she said baldly, “The Prophet wouldn’t print it. In
case you haven’t noticed, nobody believes his cock-and-bull story.
Everyone thinks he’s delusional. Now, if you let me write the story
from that angle —”
“We don’t need another story about how Harry’s lost his marbles!”
said Hermione angrily. “We’ve had plenty of those already, thank you!
I want him given the opportunity to tell the truth!”
“There’s no market for a story like that,” said Rita coldly.
“You mean the Prophet won’t print it because Fudge won’t let
them,” said Hermione irritably.
Rita gave Hermione a long, hard look. Then, leaning forward
across the table toward her, she said in a businesslike tone, “All right,
Fudge is leaning on the Prophet, but it comes to the same thing. They
won’t print a story that shows Harry in a good light. Nobody wants to
read it. It’s against the public mood. This last Azkaban breakout has
got people quite worried enough. People just don’t want to believe
You-Know-Who’s back.”
“So the Daily Prophet exists to tell people what they want to hear,
does it?” said Hermione scathingly.
Rita sat up straight again, her eyebrows raised, and drained her
glass of firewhisky.
“The Prophet exists to sell itself, you silly girl,” she said coldly.
“My dad thinks it’s an awful paper,” said Luna, chipping into the
conversation unexpectedly. Sucking on her cocktail onion, she gazed
at Rita with her enormous, protuberant, slightly mad eyes. “He publishes important stories that he thinks the public needs to know. He
doesn’t care about making money.”
Rita looked disparagingly at Luna.
“I’m guessing your father runs some stupid little village newsletter?” she said. “ ‘Twenty-five Ways to Mingle with Muggles’ and
the dates of the next Bring-and-Fly Sale?”
“No,” said Luna, dipping her onion back into her gillywater, “he’s
the editor of The Quibbler.”
Rita snorted so loudly that people at a nearby table looked around
in alarm.
“ ‘Important stories he thinks the public needs to know’?” she said
witheringly. “I could manure my garden with the contents of that rag.”
“Well, this is your chance to raise the tone of it a bit, isn’t it?” said
Hermione pleasantly. “Luna says her father’s quite happy to take
Harry’s interview. That’s who’ll be publishing it.”
Rita stared at them both for a moment and then let out a great
whoop of laughter.
“The Quibbler!” she said, cackling. “You think people will take him
seriously if he’s published in The Quibbler?”
“Some people won’t,” said Hermione in a level voice. “But the
Daily Prophet’s version of the Azkaban breakout had some gaping
holes in it. I think a lot of people will be wondering whether there isn’t
a better explanation of what happened, and if there’s an alternative
story available, even if it is published in a” — she glanced sideways at
Luna, “in a — well, an unusual magazine — I think they might be
rather keen to read it.”
Rita did not say anything for a while, but eyed Hermione shrewdly,
her head a little to one side.
“All right, let’s say for a moment I’ll do it,” she said abruptly. “What
kind of fee am I going to get?”
“I don’t think Daddy exactly pays people to write for the magazine,” said Luna dreamily. “They do it because it’s an honor, and, of
course, to see their names in print.”
Rita Skeeter looked as though the taste of Stinksap was strong in
her mouth again as she rounded on Hermione. “I’m supposed to do
this for free?”
“Well, yes,” said Hermione calmly, taking a sip of her drink. “Otherwise, as you very well know, I will inform the authorities that you are
an unregistered Animagus. Of course, the Prophet might give you
rather a lot for an insider’s account of life in Azkaban. . . .”
Rita looked as though she would have liked nothing better than to
seize the paper umbrella sticking out of Hermione’s drink and thrust
it up her nose.
“I don’t suppose I’ve got any choice, have I?” said Rita, her voice
shaking slightly. She opened her crocodile bag once more, withdrew a
piece of parchment, and raised her Quick-Quotes Quill.
“Daddy will be pleased,” said Luna brightly. A muscle twitched in
Rita’s jaw.
“Okay, Harry?” said Hermione, turning to him. “Ready to tell the
public the truth?”
“I suppose,” said Harry, watching Rita balancing the QuickQuotes Quill at the ready on the parchment between them.
“Fire away, then, Rita,” said Hermione serenely, fishing a cherry
out of the bottom of her glass.

C H A P T E R T W E N T Y - S I X
SEEN AND UNFORESEEN

Luna said vaguely that she did not know how soon Rita’s interview
with Harry would appear in The Quibbler, that her father was expecting a lovely long article on recent sightings of Crumple-Horned
Snorkacks. “And, of course, that’ll be a very important story, so
Harry’s might have to wait for the following issue,” said Luna.
Harry had not found it an easy experience to talk about the night
when Voldemort had returned. Rita had pressed him for every little
detail, and he had given her everything he could remember, knowing
that this was his one big opportunity to tell the world the truth. He
wondered how people would react to the story. He guessed that it
would confirm a lot of people in the view that he was completely insane, not least because his story would be appearing alongside utter
rubbish about Crumple-Horned Snorkacks. But the breakout of Bellatrix Lestrange and her fellow Death Eaters had given Harry a burning desire to do something, whether it worked or not. . . .
“Can’t wait to see what Umbridge thinks of you going public,” said
Dean, sounding awestruck at dinner on Monday night. Seamus was
shoveling down large amounts of chicken-and-ham pie on Dean’s
other side, but Harry knew he was listening.
“It’s the right thing to do, Harry,” said Neville, who was sitting opposite him. He was rather pale, but went on in a low voice, “It must
have been . . . tough . . . talking about it. . . . Was it?”
“Yeah,” mumbled Harry, “but people have got to know what
Voldemort’s capable of, haven’t they?”
“That’s right,” said Neville, nodding, “and his Death Eaters too . . .
People should know. . . .”
Neville left his sentence hanging and returned to his baked potato.
Seamus looked up, but when he caught Harry’s eye he looked quickly
back at his plate again. After a while Dean, Seamus, and Neville departed for the common room, leaving Harry and Hermione at the
table waiting for Ron, who had not yet had dinner because of Quidditch practice.
Cho Chang walked into the hall with her friend Marietta. Harry’s
stomach gave an unpleasant lurch, but she did not look over at the
Gryffindor table and sat down with her back to him.
“Oh, I forgot to ask you,” said Hermione brightly, glancing over at
the Ravenclaw table, “what happened on your date with Cho? How
come you were back so early?”
“Er . . . well, it was . . .” said Harry, pulling a dish of rhubarb
crumble toward him and helping himself to seconds, “a complete fiasco, now you mention it.”
And he told her what had happened in Madam Puddifoot’s Tea
Shop.
“. . . so then,” he finished several minutes later, as the final bit of
crumble disappeared, “she jumps up, right, and says ‘I’ll see you
around, Harry,’ and runs out of the place!” He put down his spoon
and looked at Hermione. “I mean, what was all that about? What was
going on?”
Hermione glanced over at the back of Cho’s head and sighed. “Oh,
Harry,” she said sadly. “Well, I’m sorry, but you were a bit tactless.”
“Me, tactless?” said Harry, outraged. “One minute we were getting
on fine, next minute she was telling me that Roger Davies asked her
out, and how she used to go and snog Cedric in that stupid tea
shop — how was I supposed to feel about that?”
“Well, you see,” said Hermione, with the patient air of one explaining that one plus one equals two to an overemotional toddler,
“you shouldn’t have told her that you wanted to meet me halfway
through your date.”
“But, but,” spluttered Harry, “but — you told me to meet you at
twelve and to bring her along, how was I supposed to do that without
telling her — ?”
“You should have told her differently” said Hermione, still with
that maddeningly patient air. “You should have said it was really annoying, but I’d made you promise to come along to the Three Broomsticks, and you really didn’t want to go, you’d much rather spend the
whole day with her, but unfortunately you thought you really ought
to meet me and would she please, please come along with you, and
hopefully you’d be able to get away more quickly? And it might have
been a good idea to mention how ugly you think I am too,” Hermione added as an afterthought.
“But I don’t think you’re ugly,” said Harry, bemused.
Hermione laughed.
“Harry, you’re worse than Ron. . . . Well, no, you’re not,” she
sighed, as Ron himself came stumping into the Hall splattered with
mud and looking grumpy. “Look — you upset Cho when you said
you were going to meet me, so she tried to make you jealous. It was
her way of trying to find out how much you liked her.”
“Is that what she was doing?” said Harry as Ron dropped onto the
bench opposite them and pulled every dish within reach toward him-
self. “Well, wouldn’t it have been easier if she’d just asked me whether
I liked her better than you?”
“Girls don’t often ask questions like that,” said Hermione.
“Well, they should!” said Harry forcefully. “Then I could’ve just
told her I fancy her, and she wouldn’t have had to get herself all
worked up again about Cedric dying!”
“I’m not saying what she did was sensible,” said Hermione, as
Ginny joined them, just as muddy as Ron and looking equally disgruntled. “I’m just trying to make you see how she was feeling at the
time.”
“You should write a book,” Ron told Hermione as he cut up his
potatoes, “translating mad things girls do so boys can understand
them.”
“Yeah,” said Harry fervently, looking over at the Ravenclaw table.
Cho had just got up; still not looking at him, she left the Great Hall.
Feeling rather depressed, he looked back at Ron and Ginny. “So, how
was Quidditch practice?”
“It was a nightmare,” said Ron in a surly voice.
“Oh come on,” said Hermione, looking at Ginny, “I’m sure it
wasn’t that —”
“Yes, it was,” said Ginny. “It was appalling. Angelina was nearly in
tears by the end of it.”
Ron and Ginny went off for baths after dinner; Harry and Hermione returned to the busy Gryffindor common room and their usual
pile of homework. Harry had been struggling with a new star chart for
Astronomy for half an hour when Fred and George turned up.
“Ron and Ginny not here?” asked Fred, looking around as he
pulled up a chair and, when Harry shook his head, he said, “Good.
We were watching their practice. They’re going to be slaughtered.
They’re complete rubbish without us.”
“Come on, Ginny’s not bad,” said George fairly, sitting down next
to Fred. “Actually, I dunno how she got so good, seeing how we never
let her play with us. . . .”
“She’s been breaking into your broom shed in the garden since the
age of six and taking each of your brooms out in turn when you
weren’t looking,” said Hermione from behind her tottering pile of Ancient Rune books.
“Oh,” said George, looking mildly impressed. “Well — that’d explain it.”
“Has Ron saved a goal yet?” asked Hermione, peering over the top
of Magical Hieroglyphs and Logograms.
“Well, he can do it if he doesn’t think anyone’s watching him,” said
Fred, rolling his eyes. “So all we have to do is ask the crowd to turn
their backs and talk among themselves every time the Quaffle goes up
his end on Saturday.”
He got up again and moved restlessly to the window, staring out
across the dark grounds.
“You know, Quidditch was about the only thing in this place worth
staying for.”
Hermione cast him a stern look.
“You’ve got exams coming!”
“Told you already, we’re not fussed about N.E.W.T.s,” said Fred.
“The Snackboxes are ready to roll, we found out how to get rid of
those boils, just a couple of drops of murtlap essence sorts them, Lee
put us onto it. . . .”
George yawned widely and looked out disconsolately at the cloudy
night sky.
“I dunno if I even want to watch this match. If Zacharias Smith
beats us I might have to kill myself.”
“Kill him, more like,” said Fred firmly.
“That’s the trouble with Quidditch,” said Hermione absentmindedly, once again bent over her Rune translation, “it creates all this bad
feeling and tension between the Houses.”
She looked up to find her copy of Spellman’s Syllabary and caught
Fred, George, and Harry looking at her with expressions of mingled
disgust and incredulity on their faces.
“Well, it does!” she said impatiently. “It’s only a game, isn’t it?”
“Hermione,” said Harry, shaking his head, “you’re good on feelings
and stuff, but you just don’t understand about Quidditch.”
“Maybe not,” she said darkly, returning to her translation again, “but
at least my happiness doesn’t depend on Ron’s goalkeeping ability.”
And though Harry would rather have jumped off the Astronomy
Tower than admit it to her, by the time he had watched the game the
following Saturday he would have given any number of Galleons not
to care about Quidditch either.
The very best thing you could say about the match was that it was
short; the Gryffindor spectators had to endure only twenty-two minutes of agony. It was hard to say what the worst thing was: Harry
thought it was a close-run contest between Ron’s fourteenth failed save,
Sloper missing the Bludger but hitting Angelina in the mouth with his
bat, and Kirke shrieking and falling backward off his broom as Zacharias Smith zoomed at him carrying the Quaffle. The miracle was that
Gryffindor only lost by ten points: Ginny managed to snatch the Snitch
from right under Hufflepuff Seeker Summerby’s nose, so that the final
score was two hundred and forty versus two hundred and thirty.
“Good catch,” Harry told Ginny back in the common room, where
the atmosphere closely resembled that of a particularly dismal funeral.
“I was lucky,” she shrugged. “It wasn’t a very fast Snitch and Summerby’s got a cold, he sneezed and closed his eyes at exactly the wrong
moment. Anyway, once you’re back on the team —”
“Ginny, I’ve got a lifelong ban.”
“You’re banned as long as Umbridge is in the school,” Ginny corrected him. “There’s a difference. Anyway, once you’re back, I think
I’ll try out for Chaser. Angelina and Alicia are both leaving next year
and I prefer goal-scoring to Seeking anyway.”
Harry looked over at Ron, who was hunched in a corner, staring at
his knees, a bottle of butterbeer clutched in his hand.
“Angelina still won’t let him resign,” Ginny said, as though reading
Harry’s mind. “She says she knows he’s got it in him.”
Harry liked Angelina for the faith she was showing in Ron, but at
the same time thought it would really be kinder to let him leave the
team. Ron had left the pitch to another booming chorus of “Weasley
Is Our King” sung with great gusto by the Slytherins, who were now
favorites to win the Quidditch Cup.
Fred and George wandered over.
“I haven’t got the heart to take the mickey out of him, even,” said
Fred, looking over at Ron’s crumpled figure. “Mind you . . . when he
missed the fourteenth . . .”
He made wild motions with his arms as though doing an upright
doggy-paddle.
“Well, I’ll save it for parties, eh?”
Ron dragged himself up to bed shortly after this. Out of respect for
his feelings, Harry waited a while before going up to the dormitory
himself, so that Ron could pretend to be asleep if he wanted to. Sure
enough, when Harry finally entered the room Ron was snoring a little
too loudly to be entirely plausible.
Harry got into bed, thinking about the match. It had been immensely frustrating watching from the sidelines. He was quite impressed by Ginny’s performance but he felt that if he had been playing
he could have caught the Snitch sooner. . . . There had been a moment when it had been fluttering near Kirke’s ankle; if she hadn’t hesitated, she might have been able to scrape a win for Gryffindor. . . .
Umbridge had been sitting a few rows below Harry and Hermione.
Once or twice she had turned squatly in her seat to look at him, her
wide toad’s mouth stretched in what he thought had been a gloating
smile. The memory of it made him feel hot with anger as he lay there
in the dark. After a few minutes, however, he remembered that he was
supposed to be emptying his mind of all emotion before he slept, as
Snape kept instructing him at the end of every Occlumency lesson.
He tried for a moment or two, but the thought of Snape on top of
memories of Umbridge merely increased his sense of grumbling resentment, and he found himself focusing instead on how much he
loathed the pair of them. Slowly, Ron’s snores died away, replaced by
the sound of deep, slow breathing. It took Harry much longer to get
to sleep; his body was tired, but it took his brain a long time to close
down.
He dreamed that Neville and Professor Sprout were waltzing
around the Room of Requirement while Professor McGonagall
played the bagpipes. He watched them happily for a while, then decided to go and find the other members of the D.A. . . .
But when he left the room he found himself facing, not the tapestry of Barnabas the Barmy, but a torch burning in its bracket on a
stone wall. He turned his head slowly to the left. There, at the far end
of the windowless passage, was a plain, black door.
He walked toward it with a sense of mounting excitement. He had
the strangest feeling that this time he was going to get lucky at last,
and find the way to open it. . . . He was feet from it and saw with a
leap of excitement that there was a glowing strip of faint blue light
down the right-hand side. . . . The door was ajar. . . . He stretched
out his hand to push it wide and —
Ron gave a loud, rasping, genuine snore, and Harry awoke abruptly
with his right hand stretched in front of him in the darkness, to open
a door that was hundreds of miles away. He let it fall with a feeling of
mingled disappointment and guilt. He knew he should not have seen
the door, but at the same time, felt so consumed with curiosity about
what was behind it that he could not help feeling annoyed with Ron.
. . . If he could have saved his snore for just another minute . . .
They entered the Great Hall for breakfast at exactly the same moment
as the post owls on Monday morning. Hermione was not the only
person eagerly awaiting her Daily Prophet: Nearly everyone was eager
for more news about the escaped Death Eaters, who, despite many reported sightings, had still not been caught. She gave the delivery owl
a Knut and unfolded the newspaper eagerly while Harry helped himself to orange juice; as he had only received one note during the entire
year he was sure, when the first owl landed with a thud in front of
him, that it had made a mistake.
“Who’re you after?” he asked it, languidly removing his orange
juice from underneath its beak and leaning forward to see the recipient’s name and address:
Harry Potter
Great Hall
Hogwarts School
Frowning, he made to take the letter from the owl, but before he
could do so, three, four, five more owls had fluttered down beside it
and were jockeying for position, treading in the butter, knocking over
the salt, and each attempting to give him their letters first.
“What’s going on?” Ron asked in amazement, as the whole of
Gryffindor table leaned forward to watch as another seven owls
landed amongst the first ones, screeching, hooting, and flapping their
wings.
“Harry!” said Hermione breathlessly, plunging her hands into the
feathery mass and pulling out a screech owl bearing a long, cylindrical
package. “I think I know what this means — open this one first!”
Harry ripped off the brown packaging. Out rolled a tightly furled
copy of March’s edition of The Quibbler. He unrolled it to see his own
face grinning sheepishly at him from the front cover. In large red letters across his picture were the words:
HARRY POTTER SPEAKS OUT AT LAST:
THE TRUTH ABOUT HE-WHO-MUST-NOT-BE-NAMED
AND THE NIGHT I SAW HIM RETURN
“It’s good, isn’t it?” said Luna, who had drifted over to the
Gryffindor table and now squeezed herself onto the bench between
Fred and Ron. “It came out yesterday, I asked Dad to send you a free
copy. I expect all these,” she waved a hand at the assembled owls still
scrabbling around on the table in front of Harry, “are letters from
readers.”
“That’s what I thought,” said Hermione eagerly, “Harry, d’you
mind if we — ?”
“Help yourself,” said Harry, feeling slightly bemused.
Ron and Hermione both started ripping open envelopes.
“This one’s from a bloke who thinks you’re off your rocker,” said
Ron, glancing down his letter. “Ah well . . .”
“This woman recommends you try a good course of Shock Spells at
St. Mungo’s,” said Hermione, looking disappointed and crumpling
up a second.
“This one looks okay, though,” said Harry slowly, scanning a long
letter from a witch in Paisley. “Hey, she says she believes me!”
“This one’s in two minds,” said Fred, who had joined in the letteropening with enthusiasm. “Says you don’t come across as a mad person, but he really doesn’t want to believe You-Know-Who’s back so he
doesn’t know what to think now. . . . Blimey, what a waste of parchment . . .”
“Here’s another one you’ve convinced, Harry!” said Hermione excitedly. “ ‘Having read your side of the story I am forced to the conclusion that the Daily Prophet has treated you very unfairly. . . . Little
though I want to think that He-Who-Must-Not-Be-Named has returned, I am forced to accept that you are telling the truth. . . .’ Oh
this is wonderful!”
“Another one who thinks you’re barking,” said Ron, throwing a
crumpled letter over his shoulder, “but this one says you’ve got her
converted, and she now thinks you’re a real hero — she’s put in a photograph too — wow —”
“What is going on here?” said a falsely sweet, girlish voice.
Harry looked up with his hands full of envelopes. Professor Umbridge was standing behind Fred and Luna, her bulging toad’s eyes
scanning the mess of owls and letters on the table in front of Harry.
Behind her he saw many of the students watching them avidly.
“Why have you got all these letters, Mr. Potter?” she asked slowly.
“Is that a crime now?” said Fred loudly. “Getting mail?”
“Be careful, Mr. Weasley, or I shall have to put you in detention,”
said Umbridge. “Well, Mr. Potter?”
Harry hesitated, but he did not see how he could keep what he had
done quiet; it was surely only a matter of time before a copy of The
Quibbler came to Umbridge’s attention.
“People have written to me because I gave an interview,” said
Harry. “About what happened to me last June.”
For some reason he glanced up at the staff table as he said this. He
had the strangest feeling that Dumbledore had been watching him a
second before, but when he looked, Dumbledore seemed to be absorbed in conversation with Professor Flitwick.
“An interview?” repeated Umbridge, her voice thinner and higher
than ever. “What do you mean?”
“I mean a reporter asked me questions and I answered them,” said
Harry. “Here —”
And he threw the copy of The Quibbler at her. She caught it and
stared down at the cover. Her pale, doughy face turned an ugly, patchy
violet.

 581 
“When did you do this?” she asked, her voice trembling slightly.
“Last Hogsmeade weekend,” said Harry.
She looked up at him, incandescent with rage, the magazine shaking in her stubby fingers.
“There will be no more Hogsmeade trips for you, Mr. Potter,” she
whispered. “How you dare . . . how you could . . .” She took a deep
breath. “I have tried again and again to teach you not to tell lies. The
message, apparently, has still not sunk in. Fifty points from Gryffindor and another week’s worth of detentions.”
She stalked away, clutching The Quibbler to her chest, the eyes of
many students following her.
By mid-morning enormous signs had been put up all over the
school, not just on House notice boards, but in the corridors and classrooms too.
— by order of —
The High Inquisitor of Hogwarts
Any student found in possession of the magazine The Quibbler will be expelled.
The above is in accordance with
Educational Decree Number Twenty-seven.
Signed:
high inquisitor
For some reason, every time Hermione caught sight of one of these
signs she beamed with pleasure.
“What exactly are you so happy about?” Harry asked her.
“Oh Harry, don’t you see?” Hermione breathed. “If she could have
done one thing to make absolutely sure that every single person in this
school will read your interview, it was banning it!”
And it seemed that Hermione was quite right. By the end of that
day, though Harry had not seen so much as a corner of The Quibbler
anywhere in the school, the whole place seemed to be quoting the interview at each other; Harry heard them whispering about it as they
queued up outside classes, discussing it over lunch and in the back of
lessons, while Hermione even reported that every occupant of the cubicles in the girls’ toilets had been talking about it when she nipped in
there before Ancient Runes.
“And then they spotted me, and obviously they know I know you,
so they were bombarding me with questions,” Hermione told Harry,
her eyes shining, “and Harry, I think they believe you, I really do, I
think you’ve finally got them convinced!”
Meanwhile Professor Umbridge was stalking the school, stopping
students at random and demanding that they turn out their books
and pockets. Harry knew she was looking for copies of The Quibbler,
but the students were several steps ahead of her. The pages carrying
Harry’s interview had been bewitched to resemble extracts from textbooks if anyone but themselves read it, or else wiped magically blank
until they wanted to peruse it again. Soon it seemed that every single
person in the school had read it.
The teachers were, of course, forbidden from mentioning the interview by Educational Decree Number Twenty-six, but they found
ways to express their feelings about it all the same. Professor Sprout
awarded Gryffindor twenty points when Harry passed her a watering
can; a beaming Professor Flitwick pressed a box of squeaking sugar
mice on him at the end of Charms, said “Shh!” and hurried away; and
Professor Trelawney broke into hysterical sobs during Divination and
announced to the startled class, and a very disapproving Umbridge,
that Harry was not going to suffer an early death after all, but would
live to a ripe old age, become Minister of Magic, and have twelve
children.
But what made Harry happiest was Cho catching up with him as
he was hurrying along to Transfiguration the next day. Before he knew
what had happened her hand was in his and she was breathing in his
ear, “I’m really, really sorry. That interview was so brave . . . it made
me cry.”
He was sorry to hear she had shed even more tears over it, but very
glad they were on speaking terms again, and even more pleased when
she gave him a swift kiss on the cheek and hurried off again. And unbelievably, no sooner had he arrived outside Transfiguration than
something just as good happened: Seamus stepped out of the queue to
face him.
“I just wanted to say,” he mumbled, squinting at Harry’s left knee,
“I believe you. And I’ve sent a copy of that magazine to me mam.”
If anything more was needed to complete Harry’s happiness, it was
Malfoy, Crabbe, and Goyle’s reactions. He saw them with their heads
together later that afternoon in the library, together with a weedylooking boy Hermione whispered was called Theodore Nott. They
looked around at Harry as he browsed the shelves for the book he
needed on Partial Vanishment, and Goyle cracked his knuckles threateningly and Malfoy whispered something undoubtedly malevolent to
Crabbe. Harry knew perfectly well why they were acting like this: He
had named all of their fathers as Death Eaters.
“And the best bit is,” whispered Hermione gleefully as they left the
library, “they can’t contradict you, because they can’t admit they’ve
read the article!”
To cap it all, Luna told him over dinner that no copy of The Quibbler had ever sold out faster.
“Dad’s reprinting!” she told Harry, her eyes popping excitedly. “He
can’t believe it, he says people seem even more interested in this than
the Crumple-Horned Snorkacks!”
Harry was a hero in the Gryffindor common room that night; daringly, Fred and George had put an Enlargement Charm on the front
cover of The Quibbler and hung it on the wall, so that Harry’s giant
head gazed down upon the proceedings, occasionally saying things
like “The Ministry are morons” and “Eat dung, Umbridge” in a
booming voice. Hermione did not find this very amusing; she said it
interfered with her concentration, and ended up going to bed early
out of irritation. Harry had to admit that the poster was not quite as
funny after an hour or two, especially when the talking spell had
started to wear off, so that it merely shouted disconnected words like
“Dung” and “Umbridge” at more and more frequent intervals in a
progressively higher voice. In fact it started to make his head ache and
his scar began prickling uncomfortably again. To disappointed moans
from the many people who were sitting around him, asking him to relive his interview for the umpteenth time, he announced that he too
needed an early night.
The dormitory was empty when he reached it. He rested his forehead for a moment against the cool glass of the window beside his
bed; it felt soothing against his scar. Then he undressed and got into
bed, wishing his headache would go away. He also felt slightly sick.
He rolled over onto his side, closed his eyes, and fell asleep almost at
once. . . .
He was standing in a dark, curtained room lit by a single branch of
candles. His hands were clenched on the back of a chair in front of
him. They were long-fingered and white as though they had not seen
sunlight for years and looked like large, pale spiders against the dark
velvet of the chair.
Beyond the chair, in a pool of light cast upon the floor by the candles, knelt a man in black robes.
“I have been badly advised, it seems,” said Harry, in a high, cold
voice that pulsed with anger.
“Master, I crave your pardon. . . .” croaked the man kneeling on
the floor. The back of his head glimmered in the candlelight. He
seemed to be trembling.
“I do not blame you, Rookwood,” said Harry in that cold, cruel
voice.
He relinquished his grip upon the chair and walked around it,
closer to the man cowering upon the floor, until he stood directly over
him in the darkness, looking down from a far greater height than
usual.
“You are sure of your facts, Rookwood?” asked Harry.
“Yes, My Lord, yes . . . I used to work in the department after —
after all. . . .”
“Avery told me Bode would be able to remove it.”
“Bode could never have taken it, Master. . . . Bode would have
known he could not. . . . Undoubtedly that is why he fought so hard
against Malfoy’s Imperius Curse. . . .”
“Stand up, Rookwood,” whispered Harry.
The kneeling man almost fell over in his haste to obey. His face was
pockmarked; the scars were thrown into relief by the candlelight. He
remained a little stooped when standing, as though halfway through a
bow, and he darted terrified looks up at Harry’s face.
“You have done well to tell me this,” said Harry. “Very well . . . I
have wasted months on fruitless schemes, it seems. . . . But no matter
. . . We begin again, from now. You have Lord Voldemort’s gratitude,
Rookwood. . . .”
“My Lord . . . yes, My Lord,” gasped Rookwood, his voice hoarse
with relief.
“I shall need your help. I shall need all the information you can give
me.”
“Of course, My Lord, of course . . . anything . . .”
“Very well . . . you may go. Send Avery to me.”
Rookwood scurried backward, bowing, and disappeared through a
door.
Left alone in the dark room, Harry turned toward the wall. A
cracked, age-spotted mirror hung on the wall in the shadows. Harry
moved toward it. His reflection grew larger and clearer in the darkness.
. . . A face whiter than a skull . . . red eyes with slits for pupils . . .
“NOOOOOOOOO!”
“What?” yelled a voice nearby.
Harry flailed around madly, became entangled in the hangings, and
fell out of his bed. For a few seconds he did not know where he was;
he was convinced that he was about to see the white, skull-like face
looming at him out of the dark again, then Ron’s voice spoke very
near to him.
“Will you stop acting like a maniac, and I can get you out of here!”
Ron wrenched the hangings apart, and Harry stared up at him in
the moonlight, as he lay flat on his back, his scar searing with pain.
Ron looked as though he had just been getting ready for bed; one arm
was out of his robes.
“Has someone been attacked again?” asked Ron, pulling Harry
roughly to his feet. “Is it Dad? Is it that snake?”
“No — everyone’s fine —” gasped Harry, whose forehead felt as
though it was on fire again. “Well . . . Avery isn’t. . . . He’s in trouble.
. . . He gave him the wrong information. . . . He’s really angry. . . .”
Harry groaned and sank, shaking, onto his bed, rubbing his scar.
“But Rookwood’s going to help him now. . . . He’s on the right
track again. . . .”
“What are you talking about?” said Ron, sounding scared. “D’you
mean . . . did you just see You-Know-Who?”
“I was You-Know-Who,” said Harry, and he stretched out his
hands in the darkness and held them up to his face to check that they
were no longer deathly white and long-fingered. “He was with Rookwood, he’s one of the Death Eaters who escaped from Azkaban, remember? Rookwood’s just told him Bode couldn’t have done it. . . .”
“Done what?”
“Remove something. . . . He said Bode would have known he
couldn’t have done it. . . . Bode was under the Imperius Curse. . . . I
think he said Malfoy’s dad put it on him. . . .”
“Bode was bewitched to remove something?” Ron said. “But —
Harry, that’s got to be —”
“The weapon,” Harry finished the sentence for him. “I know.”
The dormitory door opened; Dean and Seamus came in. Harry
swung his legs back into bed. He did not want to look as though anything odd had just happened, seeing as Seamus had only just stopped
thinking Harry was a nutter.
“Did you say,” murmured Ron, putting his head close to Harry’s on
the pretense of helping himself to water from the jug on his bedside
table, “that you were You-Know-Who?”
“Yeah,” said Harry quietly.
Ron took an unnecessarily large gulp of water. Harry saw it spill
over his chin onto his chest.
“Harry,” he said, as Dean and Seamus clattered around noisily,
pulling off their robes, and talking, “you’ve got to tell —”
“I haven’t got to tell anyone,” said Harry shortly. “I wouldn’t have
seen it at all if I could do Occlumency. I’m supposed to have learned
to shut this stuff out. That’s what they want.”
By “they” he meant Dumbledore. He got back into bed and rolled
over onto his side with his back to Ron and after a while he heard Ron’s
mattress creak as he lay back down too. His scar began to burn; he bit
hard on his pillow to stop himself making a noise. Somewhere, he
knew, Avery was being punished. . . .
Harry and Ron waited until break next morning to tell Hermione exactly what had happened. They wanted to be absolutely sure they
could not be overheard. Standing in their usual corner of the cool and
breezy courtyard, Harry told her every detail of the dream he could
remember. When he had finished, she said nothing at all for a few
moments, but stared with a kind of painful intensity at Fred and
George, who were both headless and selling their magical hats from
under their cloaks on the other side of the yard.
“So that’s why they killed him,” she said quietly, withdrawing her
gaze from Fred and George at last. “When Bode tried to steal this
weapon, something funny happened to him. I think there must be
defensive spells on it, or around it, to stop people from touching it.
That’s why he was in St. Mungo’s, his brain had gone all funny and he
couldn’t talk. But remember what the Healer told us? He was recovering. And they couldn’t risk him getting better, could they? I mean,
the shock of whatever happened when he touched that weapon probably made the Imperius Curse lift. Once he’d got his voice back, he’d
explain what he’d been doing, wouldn’t he? They would have known
he’d been sent to steal the weapon. Of course, it would have been easy
for Lucius Malfoy to put the curse on him. Never out of the Ministry,
is he?”
“He was even hanging around that day I had my hearing,” said
Harry. “In the — hang on . . .” he said slowly. “He was in the Department of Mysteries corridor that day! Your dad said he was probably trying to sneak down and find out what happened in my hearing,
but what if —”
“Sturgis,” gasped Hermione, looking thunderstruck.
“Sorry?” said Ron, looking bewildered.
“Sturgis Podmore,” said Hermione, breathlessly. “Arrested for trying to get through a door. Lucius Malfoy got him too. I bet he did it
the day you saw him there, Harry. Sturgis had Moody’s Invisibility
Cloak, right? So what if he was standing guard by the door, invisible,
and Malfoy heard him move, or guessed he was there, or just did the
Imperius Curse on the off chance that a guard was there? So when
Sturgis next had an opportunity — probably when it was his turn on

 589 
guard duty again — he tried to get into the department to steal the
weapon for Voldemort — Ron, be quiet — but he got caught and
sent to Azkaban. . . .”
She gazed at Harry.
“And now Rookwood’s told Voldemort how to get the weapon?”
“I didn’t hear all the conversation, but that’s what it sounded like,”
said Harry. “Rookwood used to work there. . . . Maybe Voldemort’ll
send Rookwood to do it?”
Hermione nodded, apparently still lost in thought. Then, quite
abruptly, she said, “But you shouldn’t have seen this at all, Harry.”
“What?” he said, taken aback.
“You’re supposed to be learning how to close your mind to this sort
of thing,” said Hermione, suddenly stern.
“I know I am,” said Harry. “But —”
“Well, I think we should just try and forget what you saw,” said
Hermione firmly. “And you ought to put in a bit more effort on your
Occlumency from now on.”
Harry was so angry with her that he did not talk to her for the rest
of the day, which proved to be another bad one. When people were
not discussing the escaped Death Eaters in the corridors today, they
were laughing at Gryffindor’s abysmal performance in their match
against Hufflepuff; the Slytherins were singing “Weasley Is Our King”
so loudly and frequently that by sundown Filch had banned it from
the corridors out of sheer irritation.
The week did not improve as it progressed: Harry received two
more D’s in Potions, was still on tenterhooks that Hagrid might get
the sack, and could not stop himself from dwelling on the dream in
which he had seen Voldemort, though he did not bring it up with Ron
and Hermione again because he did not want another telling-off from
Hermione. He wished very much that he could have talked to Sirius
about it, but that was out of the question, so he tried to push the matter to the back of his mind.
Unfortunately, the back of his mind was no longer the secure place
it had once been.
“Get up, Potter.”
A couple of weeks after his dream of Rookwood, Harry was to be
found, yet again, kneeling on the floor of Snape’s office, trying to clear
his head. He had just been forced, yet again, to relive a stream of very
early memories he had not even realized he still had, most of them
concerning humiliations Dudley and his gang had inflicted upon him
in primary school.
“That last memory,” said Snape. “What was it?”
“I don’t know,” said Harry, getting wearily to his feet. He was finding it increasingly difficult to disentangle separate memories from the
rush of images and sound that Snape kept calling forth. “You mean
the one where my cousin tried to make me stand in the toilet?”
“No,” said Snape softly. “I mean the one concerning a man kneeling in the middle of a darkened room. . . .”
“It’s . . . nothing,” said Harry.
Snape’s dark eyes bored into Harry’s. Remembering what Snape
had said about eye contact being crucial to Legilimency, Harry
blinked and looked away.
“How do that man and that room come to be inside your head,
Potter?” said Snape.
“It —” said Harry, looking everywhere but at Snape, “it was — just
a dream I had.”
“A dream,” repeated Snape.
There was a pause during which Harry stared fixedly at a large dead
frog suspended in a purple liquid in its jar.
“You do know why we are here, don’t you, Potter?” said Snape in a
low, dangerous voice. “You do know why I am giving up my evenings
to this tedious job?”
“Yes,” said Harry stiffly.
“Remind me why we are here, Potter.”
“So I can learn Occlumency,” said Harry, now glaring at a dead eel.
“Correct, Potter. And dim though you may be” — Harry looked
back at Snape, hating him — “I would have thought that after two
months’ worth of lessons you might have made some progress. How
many other dreams about the Dark Lord have you had?”
“Just that one,” lied Harry.
“Perhaps,” said Snape, his dark, cold eyes narrowing slightly, “perhaps you actually enjoy having these visions and dreams, Potter.
Maybe they make you feel special — important?”
“No, they don’t,” said Harry, his jaw set and his fingers clenched
tightly around the handle of his wand.
“That is just as well, Potter,” said Snape coldly, “because you are
neither special nor important, and it is not up to you to find out what
the Dark Lord is saying to his Death Eaters.”
“No — that’s your job, isn’t it?” Harry shot at him.
He had not meant to say it; it had burst out of him in temper. For
a long moment they stared at each other, Harry convinced he had
gone too far. But there was a curious, almost satisfied expression on
Snape’s face when he answered.
“Yes, Potter,” he said, his eyes glinting. “That is my job. Now, if you
are ready, we will start again. . . .”
He raised his wand. “One — two — three — Legilimens!”
A hundred dementors were swooping toward Harry across the lake
in the grounds. . . . He screwed up his face in concentration. . . .
They were coming closer. . . . He could see the dark holes beneath
their hoods . . . yet he could also see Snape standing in front of him,
his eyes fixed upon Harry’s face, muttering under his breath. . . . And
somehow, Snape was growing clearer, and the dementors were growing fainter . . .
Harry raised his own wand.
“Protego!”
Snape staggered; his wand flew upward, away from Harry — and
suddenly Harry’s mind was teeming with memories that were not
his — a hook-nosed man was shouting at a cowering woman, while a
small dark-haired boy cried in a corner. . . . A greasy-haired teenager
sat alone in a dark bedroom, pointing his wand at the ceiling, shooting down flies. . . . A girl was laughing as a scrawny boy tried to
mount a bucking broomstick —
“ENOUGH!”
Harry felt as though he had been pushed hard in the chest; he took
several staggering steps backward, hit some of the shelves covering
Snape’s walls and heard something crack. Snape was shaking slightly,
very white in the face.
The back of Harry’s robes were damp. One of the jars behind him
had broken when he fell against it; the pickled slimy thing within was
swirling in its draining potion.
“Reparo!” hissed Snape, and the jar sealed itself once more. “Well,
Potter . . . that was certainly an improvement. . . .” Panting slightly,
Snape straightened the Pensieve in which he had again stored some of
his thoughts before starting the lesson, almost as though checking that
they were still there. “I don’t remember telling you to use a Shield
Charm . . . but there is no doubt that it was effective. . . .”
Harry did not speak; he felt that to say anything might be dangerous. He was sure he had just broken into Snape’s memories, that he had
just seen scenes from Snape’s childhood, and it was unnerving to think
that the crying little boy who had watched his parents shouting was actually standing in front of him with such loathing in his eyes. . . .
“Let’s try again, shall we?” said Snape.
Harry felt a thrill of dread: He was about to pay for what had just
happened, he was sure of it. They moved back into position with the
desk between them, Harry feeling he was going to find it much harder
to empty his mind this time. . . .
“On the count of three, then,” said Snape, raising his wand once
more. “One — two —”
Harry did not have time to gather himself together and attempt to
clear his mind, for Snape had already cried “Legilimens!”
He was hurtling along the corridor toward the Department of Mysteries, past the blank stone walls, past the torches — the plain black
door was growing ever larger; he was moving so fast he was going to
collide with it, he was feet from it and he could see that chink of faint
blue light again —
The door had flown open! He was through it at last, inside a blackwalled, black-floored circular room lit with blue-flamed candles, and
there were more doors all around him — he needed to go on — but
which door ought he to take — ?
“POTTER!”
Harry opened his eyes. He was flat on his back again with no
memory of having gotten there; he was also panting as though he really had run the length of the Department of Mysteries corridor, really
had sprinted through the black door and found the circular room. . . .
“Explain yourself!” said Snape, who was standing over him, looking furious.
“I . . . dunno what happened,” said Harry truthfully, standing up.
There was a lump on the back of his head from where he had hit the
ground and he felt feverish. “I’ve never seen that before. I mean, I told
you, I’ve dreamed about the door . . . but it’s never opened before. . . .”
“You are not working hard enough!”
For some reason, Snape seemed even angrier than he had done two
minutes before, when Harry had seen into his own memories.
“You are lazy and sloppy, Potter, it is small wonder that the Dark
Lord —”
“Can you tell me something, sir?” said Harry, firing up again.
“Why do you call Voldemort the Dark Lord, I’ve only ever heard
Death Eaters call him that —”
Snape opened his mouth in a snarl — and a woman screamed from
somewhere outside the room.
Snape’s head jerked upward; he was gazing at the ceiling.
“What the — ?” he muttered.
Harry could hear a muffled commotion coming from what he
thought might be the entrance hall. Snape looked around at him,
frowning.
“Did you see anything unusual on your way down here, Potter?”
Harry shook his head. Somewhere above them, the woman
screamed again. Snape strode to his office door, his wand still held at
the ready, and swept out of sight. Harry hesitated for a moment, then
followed.
The screams were indeed coming from the entrance hall; they grew
louder as Harry ran toward the stone steps leading up from the dungeons. When he reached the top he found the entrance hall packed.
Students had come flooding out of the Great Hall, where dinner was
still in progress, to see what was going on. Others had crammed themselves onto the marble staircase. Harry pushed forward through a knot
of tall Slytherins and saw that the onlookers had formed a great ring,
some of them looking shocked, others even frightened. Professor
McGonagall was directly opposite Harry on the other side of the hall;
she looked as though what she was watching made her feel faintly
sick.
Professor Trelawney was standing in the middle of the entrance hall
with her wand in one hand and an empty sherry bottle in the other,
looking utterly mad. Her hair was sticking up on end, her glasses were
lopsided so that one eye was magnified more than the other; her innumerable shawls and scarves were trailing haphazardly from her
shoulders, giving the impression that she was falling apart at the
seams. Two large trunks lay on the floor beside her, one of them upside down; it looked very much as though it had been thrown down
the stairs after her. Professor Trelawney was staring, apparently terrified, at something Harry could not see but that seemed to be standing
at the foot of the stairs.
“No!” she shrieked. “NO! This cannot be happening. . . . It cannot
. . . I refuse to accept it!”
“You didn’t realize this was coming?” said a high girlish voice,
sounding callously amused, and Harry, moving slightly to his right,
saw that Trelawney’s terrifying vision was nothing other than Professor
Umbridge. “Incapable though you are of predicting even tomorrow’s
weather, you must surely have realized that your pitiful performance
during my inspections, and lack of any improvement, would make it
inevitable you would be sacked?”
“You c-can’t!” howled Professor Trelawney, tears streaming down
her face from behind her enormous lenses, “you c-can’t sack me! I’ve
b-been here sixteen years! H-Hogwarts is m-my h-home!”
“It was your home,” said Professor Umbridge, and Harry was revolted to see the enjoyment stretching her toadlike face as she watched
Professor Trelawney sink, sobbing uncontrollably, onto one of her
trunks, “until an hour ago, when the Minister of Magic countersigned
the order for your dismissal. Now kindly remove yourself from this
hall. You are embarrassing us.”
But she stood and watched, with an expression of gloating enjoyment, as Professor Trelawney shuddered and moaned, rocking backward and forward on her trunk in paroxysms of grief. Harry heard a
sob to his left and looked around. Lavender and Parvati were both crying silently, their arms around each other. Then he heard footsteps.
Professor McGonagall had broken away from the spectators, marched
straight up to Professor Trelawney and was patting her firmly on the
back while withdrawing a large handkerchief from within her robes.
“There, there, Sibyll . . . Calm down. . . . Blow your nose on this.
. . . It’s not as bad as you think, now. . . . You are not going to have to
leave Hogwarts. . . .”
“Oh really, Professor McGonagall?” said Umbridge in a deadly
voice, taking a few steps forward. “And your authority for that statement is . . . ?”
“That would be mine,” said a deep voice.
The oak front doors had swung open. Students beside them scuttled out of the way as Dumbledore appeared in the entrance. What he
had been doing out in the grounds Harry could not imagine, but
there was something impressive about the sight of him framed in the
doorway against an oddly misty night. Leaving the doors wide behind
him, he strode forward through the circle of onlookers toward the
place where Professor Trelawney sat, tearstained and trembling, upon
her trunk, Professor McGonagall alongside her.
“Yours, Professor Dumbledore?” said Umbridge with a singularly
unpleasant little laugh. “I’m afraid you do not understand the position. I have here” — she pulled a parchment scroll from within her
robes — “an Order of Dismissal signed by myself and the Minister of
Magic. Under the terms of Educational Decree Number Twenty-three,
the High Inquisitor of Hogwarts has the power to inspect, place upon
probation, and sack any teacher she — that is to say, I — feel is not
performing up to the standard required by the Ministry of Magic. I
have decided that Professor Trelawney is not up to scratch. I have dismissed her.”
To Harry’s very great surprise, Dumbledore continued to smile. He
looked down at Professor Trelawney, who was still sobbing and choking on her trunk, and said, “You are quite right, of course, Professor
Umbridge. As High Inquisitor you have every right to dismiss my
teachers. You do not, however, have the authority to send them away
from the castle. I am afraid,” he went on, with a courteous little bow,
“that the power to do that still resides with the headmaster, and it is
my wish that Professor Trelawney continue to live at Hogwarts.”
At this, Professor Trelawney gave a wild little laugh in which a hiccup was barely hidden.
“No — no, I’ll g-go, Dumbledore! I sh-shall l-leave Hogwarts and
s-seek my fortune elsewhere —”
“No,” said Dumbledore sharply. “It is my wish that you remain,
Sibyll.”
He turned to Professor McGonagall.
“Might I ask you to escort Sibyll back upstairs, Professor
McGonagall?”
“Of course,” said McGonagall. “Up you get, Sibyll. . . .”
Professor Sprout came hurrying forward out of the crowd and
grabbed Professor Trelawney’s other arm. Together they guided her
past Umbridge and up the marble stairs. Professor Flitwick went scurrying after them, his wand held out before him; he squeaked, “Locomotor trunks!” and Professor Trelawney’s luggage rose into the air and
proceeded up the staircase after her, Professor Flitwick bringing up the
rear.
Professor Umbridge was standing stock-still, staring at Dumbledore, who continued to smile benignly.
“And what,” she said in a whisper that nevertheless carried all
around the entrance hall, “are you going to do with her once I appoint
a new Divination teacher who needs her lodgings?”
“Oh, that won’t be a problem,” said Dumbledore pleasantly. “You
see, I have already found us a new Divination teacher, and he will prefer lodgings on the ground floor.”
“You’ve found — ?” said Umbridge shrilly. “You’ve found? Might I
remind you, Dumbledore, that under Educational Decree Twentytwo —”
“— the Ministry has the right to appoint a suitable candidate if —
and only if — the headmaster is unable to find one,” said Dumbledore. “And I am happy to say that on this occasion I have succeeded.
May I introduce you?”
He turned to face the open front doors, through which night mist
was now drifting. Harry heard hooves. There was a shocked murmur
around the hall and those nearest the doors hastily moved even farther
backward, some of them tripping over in their haste to clear a path for
the newcomer.
Through the mist came a face Harry had seen once before on a
dark, dangerous night in the Forbidden Forest: white-blond hair and
astonishingly blue eyes, the head and torso of a man joined to the
palomino body of a horse.
“This is Firenze,” said Dumbledore happily to a thunderstruck
Umbridge. “I think you’ll find him suitable.”
